THE  ROLE  OF  TECHNOLOGY  IN
REDUCING  ILLEGAL  FILESHARING:

A  UNIVERSITY  PERSPECTIVE

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JUNE  5,  2007

Serial No. 110–34

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

35–706PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2007

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
VACANCY

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

June  5,  2007

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Bart  Gordon,  Chairman,  Committee  on  Science
and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Ralph  M.  Hall,  Minority  Ranking  Member,
Committee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .........
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson, Member, Com-
mittee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Russ  Carnahan,  Member,  Committee
on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .............................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Harry  E.  Mitchell,  Member,  Com-
mittee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .................
Statement  by  Representative  F.  James  Sensenbrenner  Jr.,  Member,  Com-
mittee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .................

Witnesses:

Dr.  Charles  A.  Wight,  Associate  Vice  President  for  Academic  Affairs  and

Undergraduate Studies, University of Utah, Salt Lake City

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Adrian  Sannier,  Vice  President  and  University  Technology  Officer,  Ari-

zona State University

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................

Mr. Vance Ikezoye, President and CEO, Audible Magic Corporation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Ms.  Cheryl  Asper  Elzy,  Dean  of  University  Libraries  and  Federal  Copyright

Agent, Illinois State University

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr. Gregory A. Jackson, Vice President and Chief Information Officer, Univer-

sity of Chicago

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

8
9

10
11

12

12

13

11

14
15
17

17
19
21

21
23
26

26
28
35

35
37
41
42

(III)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Dr.  Charles  A.  Wight,  Associate  Vice  President  for  Academic  Affairs  and
Undergraduate Studies, University of Utah, Salt Lake City ...........................
Dr.  Adrian  Sannier,  Vice  President  and  University  Technology  Officer,  Ari-
zona State University ..........................................................................................
Mr. Vance Ikezoye, President and CEO, Audible Magic Corporation .................
Ms.  Cheryl  Asper  Elzy,  Dean  of  University  Libraries  and  Federal  Copyright
Agent, Illinois State University ..........................................................................
Dr. Gregory A. Jackson, Vice President and Chief Information Officer, Univer-
sity of Chicago ......................................................................................................

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Statement by Mr. Safwat Fahmy, CEO and Founder, SafeMedia Corporation .
Republican Briefing Memo ......................................................................................

Page

54

57
60

63

70

74
78

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

THE  ROLE  OF  TECHNOLOGY  IN  REDUCING  IL-
LEGAL  FILESHARING:  A  UNIVERSITY  PER-
SPECTIVE

TUESDAY,  JUNE  5,  2007

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The Committee met, pursuant to call, at 2:05 p.m., in Room 2318
of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Bart  Gordon  [Chair-
man of the Committee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

The Role of Technology in

Reducing Illegal Filesharing:

A University Perspective

TUESDAY, JUNE 5, 2007

2:00 P.M.–4:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

On Tuesday, June 5, 2007, the Committee on Science and Technology of the U.S.
House of Representatives will hold a hearing to learn about the experiences of uni-
versities that have implemented technological measures to reduce copyright-infring-
ing  filesharing  on  their  campus  networks.  University  representatives  and  a  leading
technologist  will  discuss  the  nature  of  these  technologies,  their  potentials  and  limi-
tations,  techniques  for  evaluating  and  testing  them  in  realistic  settings,  and  their
experiences using them.
2. Witnesses
Dr. Charles Wight is the Associate Vice President for Academic Affairs and Under-
graduate Studies at the University of Utah.
Dr. Adrian Sannier is the Vice President and University Technology Officer at Ar-
izona State University, on leave from Iowa State University.
Mr. Vance Ikezoye is the President and CEO of Audible Magic Corporation of Los
Gatos, California.
Ms.  Cheryl  Asper  Elzy  is  the  Dean  of  University  Libraries  at  Illinois  State  Uni-
versity and a member of the management team of ISU’s Digital Citizen Project.
Dr. Greg Jackson is the Vice President and Chief Information Officer at the Uni-
versity of Chicago.

3. Brief Overview

• Most colleges and universities provide high-speed Internet access to their stu-
dents,  faculty  and  staff.  These  campus  networks  are  intended  for  education
and research, but they are often used for entertainment or other purposes as
well. Over the past several years, free peer-to-peer (P2P) filesharing programs
have  made  it  easy  for  college  and  university  students  to  illegally  download
and share copyrighted music, movies, and other content via their campus net-
work  connections.  In  2005,  copyright-infringing  filesharing  in  the  U.S.  cost
the  movie  industry  $500  million,  an  estimated  44  percent  of  which  was  due
to college and university students. In 2006, some 1.3 billion music tracks were
downloaded  illegally  in  the  U.S.  by  college  students,  compared  with  approxi-
mately 500 million legal downloads.

• Under  the  ‘‘safe  harbor’’  provision  of  the  Digital  Millennium  Copyright  Act
(DMCA)  of  1998,  colleges  and  universities  are  not  held  liable  for  copyright-
infringing filesharing conducted on their campus networks, provided that they
cooperate with copyright holders to identify and deal with users on their net-
works who illegally share copyrighted materials.

• Many  college  and  university  campuses  have  adopted  technological  measures
to prevent illegal filesharing on their networks. These measures fall into two
general  categories:  ‘‘traffic-shaping’’  systems,  which  control  the  speed  of  net-
work  transmissions  based  on  where  in  the  network  they  originate  and  what
computer program sends them; and ‘‘network-filtering’’ systems, which specifi-
cally identify and block transmissions that contain copyrighted material. The
use of traffic-shaping technology is relatively common, and a majority of cam-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

puses  now  employ  it  to  improve  the  performance  of  their  campus  networks.
Network-filtering technologies have not yet been as widely adopted.

4. Issues and Concerns
What  has  been  the  overall  experience  of  campuses  that  have  implemented
technological measures to reduce illegal filesharing? A significant majority of
U.S.  campuses  are  using  traffic-shaping  systems  to  control  and  modify  the  rate  of
file transmission on their networks. Campuses ‘‘shape’’ the traffic on their networks
by  modifying  the  rate  at  which  different  types  of  files  are  transmitted,  based  on
which part of campus the data is coming from, what type of program is transmitting
the data, and other factors. Most campuses have had a positive experience with this
type  of  technology  and  do  not  report  any  significant  complaints  or  concerns  about
its use. A smaller number of campuses have deployed network-filtering systems that
specifically identify and block copyrighted materials in transmitted files. The experi-
ence  of  these  universities  with  these  technologies  will  be  valuable  input  for  other
campuses that are considering which technological measures are appropriate to take
in  reducing  illegal  filesharing,  and  also  in  discovering  what  technical  issues  may
arise in the deployment of these technologies on campus networks.
Have technological measures been successful in reducing illegal filesharing
on  campuses?  Campuses  that  have  adopted  technical  means  to  reduce  illegal
filesharing  can  measure  their  impact  by  the  change  in  the  number  of  copyright-in-
fringement complaints they receive under the terms of the Digital Millennium Copy-
right  Act  (DMCA).  A  number  of  universities  report  major  reductions  in  these  com-
plaints after installing network-filtering technologies. For instance, Wittenberg Uni-
versity  in  Ohio  estimates  that  its  DMCA  complaints  dropped  from  50  per  year  to
about  three  after  installing  a  network-filtering  technology  from  Audible  Magic  Cor-
poration. The University of Florida reports a drop from approximately 50 copyright-
violation  complaints  per  month  to  zero  after  deploying  a  network-filtering  system
now  sold  by  Red  Lambda,  Inc.  The  University  of  Portland  installed  a  network-fil-
tering  system  two  years  ago,  and  currently  blocks  millions  of  copyright-violating
files per month, resulting in a 70 percent reduction in DMCA complaints. Campuses
using  traffic-shaping  technologies  alone  do  not  report  experiencing  as  significant  a
reduction in DMCA complaints.
Do technologies to reduce illegal filesharing affect the speed and reliability
of  campus  networks?  Campus  networks  can  be  relatively  complex,  and  must  be
able to transmit large amounts of data for research and educational purposes with-
out  major  delays.  Most  universities  agree  that  traffic-shaping  technology  improves,
rather than harms, the performance of their networks by giving preference to digital
traffic from classrooms and labs during peak usage hours and controlling large-scale
characteristics of network transmission. In fact, a number of universities have been
able  to  delay  expensive  upgrades  to  their  network  infrastructure  because  of  traffic-
shaping  systems.  However,  there  is  some  argument  over  whether  network-filtering
technology has a degrading effect on a network. Some universities have argued that
it  will  slow  down  network  speeds  and  reduce  the  reliability  of  the  network.  Others
report  that  network-filtering  systems  increase  the  speed  of  their  network  for  legiti-
mate  transmissions  by  eliminating  large  amounts  of  illegal  usage,  thus  freeing  up
network resources. After installing network-filtering systems, Wittenberg University
experienced  a  63  percent  reduction  in  network  traffic,  the  University  of  Florida  ex-
perienced  a  40  percent  reduction  of  inbound  traffic  and  an  85  percent  reduction  of
outbound  traffic,  and  the  University  of  Portland  experienced  at  least  a  50  percent
reduction in overall network traffic. The experiences of campuses that are currently
deploying  both  traffic-shaping  and  network-filtering  technologies  will  help  clarify
the  impact  they  have  on  network  performance.  Realistic  testing  with  scientific
metrics,  as  is  being  performed  at  Illinois  State  University,  will  also  yield  valuable
data for evaluating these claims.
Do network-filtering technologies interfere with legitimate uses of campus
networks?  Since  network-filtering  technologies  aim  to  specifically  identify  copy-
right-infringing content in data transmissions, there is a concern that they may in-
correctly  identify  legitimate  content  that  happens  to  be  transmitted  by  peer-to-peer
(P2P)  filesharing  protocols,  and  thus  interfere  with  educational  or  research  uses  of
the  network.  BitTorrent,  a  popular  protocol  for  transferring  large  files,  is  used  to
illegally  transfer  copyrighted  movies,  but  it  is  also  used  to  download  copies  of  the
freely  distributed  Linux  operating  system,  transfer  satellite  photos  from  NASA’s
Visible  Earth  website,  and  exchange  many  other  legal  files.  The  OCKHAM  Initia-
tive,  a  collaboration  among  Emory  University,  the  University  of  Notre  Dame,  Or-
egon  State  University,  and  Virginia  Tech,  recently  received  a  grant  from  the  Na-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

tional Science Foundation (NSF) to use P2P filesharing protocols to promote digital
libraries for research and educational purposes. And Pennsylvania State University
has  developed  and  begun  using  LionShare,  a  legal  and  secure  peer-to-peer
filesharing  program  to  transfer  academic  and  personal  files  among  institutions
around  the  world.  If  network-filtering  systems  incorrectly  identify  these  legitimate
network  transmissions  as  copyright-infringing,  they  would  interfere  with  appro-
priate  and  necessary  usage  of  campus  networks  and  prevent  educational  and  re-
search activities. This issue is another area in which realistic testing with scientific
metrics  in  the  vein  of  the  Illinois  State  University  Digital  Citizen  Project  can  pro-
vide important data.
Are  anti-illegal-downloading  technologies  vulnerable  to  hackers  or  other
technological counter-measures? There is a concern among universities that net-
work-filtering technologies may be quickly defeated by hackers, both on and off cam-
pus.  Encrypting  copyright-infringing  files  before  they  are  transmitted  may  cir-
cumvent the detection step of network-filtering systems and allow users to continue
illegal  filesharing  in  spite  of  the  installation  of  these  technologies.  While  it  is  clear
that any technological system is ultimately vulnerable to continual technological ad-
vances, understanding the ways in which network-filtering systems can be kept up-
dated  to  respond  to  technological  challenges  will  be  important  for  evaluating  the
long-term utility of technical means to reduce illegal downloading. A useful parallel
to this issue can be found in the growth and distribution of anti-virus and anti-spam
software,  the  original  versions  of  which  would  be  entirely  impotent  in  today’s  net-
work environment. Continual updates in reaction to changes in the digital landscape
have  not  only  kept  these  programs  effective,  they  have  allowed  them  to  improve
their  accuracy  in  eliminating  viruses  and  spam  and  thus  enhanced  the  utility  of
most  networks  on  which  they  are  installed.  No  responsible  network  administrator
would today operate a system without anti-virus and anti-spam technology installed.
Do  technologies  to  reduce  illegal  downloading  compromise  privacy  of  net-
works?  Privacy  on  computer  networks  is  a  significant  concern,  and  to  the  extent
that  it  is  compatible  with  legal  usage  it  must  be  protected.  Many  universities  are
concerned  that  the  component  of  network-filtering  systems  that  identifies  copy-
righted material violates the privacy of users of the network, by more closely exam-
ining the content of their transmitted files. It is important to understand the meth-
ods  by  which  these  technologies  identify  copyright-infringing  files,  and  whether
these  methods  are  more  invasive  to  privacy  of  transmissions  than  other  network
maintenance  operations,  such  as  filtering  e-mail  for  spam  and  examining
downloaded  files  for  possible  viruses  or  computer  worms.  University  witnesses  at
the  hearing  can  provide  insight  about  privacy  concerns  that  may  have  arisen  on
their campuses when they deployed network-filtering technologies.

5. Background
Definitions and technical background

‘‘Illegal filesharing’’ is a broad term for the digital distribution of files that contain
copyright-protected  material,  such  as  music,  movies,  and  some  software.  Illegal
filesharing is usually accomplished with computer programs that create peer-to-peer
(P2P) network connections linking many individual computers. A variety of P2P pro-
grams,  such  as  Kazaa,  LimeWire,  eDonkey,  and  Morpheus  are  available  for  free
download from their distributors’ websites.

After a user installs a P2P program (called a ‘‘client application’’) onto their com-
puter,  he  or  she  runs  the  application  to  connect  to  the  computers  of  other  users  of
that particular P2P software. The client application allows users to ‘‘share’’ files lo-
cated  on  their  computer  hard  drives.  Once  users  make  files  available  for  sharing
with each other, anyone who uses the same software to connect to the P2P network
may  locate  and  download  desired  files  easily  and  at  no  cost.  For  example,  a  user
of  the  LimeWire  client  application  can  directly  access  files  saved  on  another
LimeWire  user’s  computer  hard  drive.  Alternatively,  a  user  can  search  for  a  par-
ticular  file  name,  such  as  an  MP3  song  title,  across  all  the  computers  connected  to
the  LimeWire  network,  and  then  download  a  copy  of  that  file  onto  his  or  her  com-
puter.

It  is  important  to  note  that  downloading  music,  movies  and  software  over  the
Internet  is  not  itself  illegal,  as  long  as  users  pay  legal  fees.  For  instance,  Apple’s
iTunes  Store  allows  users  to  legally  purchase  and  download  music  for  their  iPod
player,  and  services  such  as  MovieLink  and  CinemaNow  allow  users  to  buy  and
download  movies.  There  are  also  legal  downloading  sites  for  college  and  university
students  that  are  supported  by  advertising  revenue  or  blanket  subscription  fees,
such  as  Ruckus  and  Cdigix.  However,  using  programs  such  as  LimeWire  to  share

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

copyrighted  material  does  not  involve  any  royalty  payment  to  the  copyright  owner,
and is therefore illegal.
Impact on college and university networks

Illegal  filesharing  has  become  common  at  many  colleges  and  universities  across
the country. According to a 2006 survey by the University of Richmond’s Intellectual
Property Institute, 34 percent of college students illegally download music from P2P
networks. NPD Group, a leading entertainment research firm, found in a recent sur-
vey  that  more  than  two-thirds  of  music  acquired  by  college  students  was  obtained
illegally, and that students are more than twice as likely as the general population
to  use  P2P  networks  to  download  music.  A  2005  study  by  L.E.K.  Consulting  found
that  44  percent  of  U.S.  losses  to  the  movie  industry  from  illegal  filesharing  were
due to college students.

Under  the  ‘‘safe  harbor’’  provisions  of  the  1998  Digital  Millennium  Copyright  Act
(DMCA),  colleges  and  universities  are  not  liable  for  copyright  violations  committed
using their networks, as long as they cooperate with copyright holders who file com-
plaints  that  their  copyrighted  material  is  being  illegally  transmitted  over  the  cam-
pus  network.  Over  the  past  two  years,  the  music  industry  has  sent  almost  60,000
copyright-infringement  notices  to  over  1,000  schools.  This  has  created  a  significant
administrative burden for the schools to process and respond to these claims. In ad-
dition, over 1,000 lawsuits have been brought against students at over 130 schools,
and the cost of dealing with these claims can be quite high.

Illegal  filesharing  has  had  a  major  impact  on  the  performance  of  campus  net-
works.  Shortly  before  the  University  of  Florida  deployed  its  network-filtering  sys-
tem,  its  dormitory  network  was  at  95  percent  of  total  transmission  capacity.  Prior
to  installing  its  network-filtering  system,  the  University  of  Portland  found  that  its
network  was  transmitting  files  at  100  percent  capacity.  Many  other  campuses  face
a similar problem with increased campus demand for network access, and a number
are finding that illegal filesharing is an unexpectedly large fraction of this demand.
This  has  important  consequences  for  campus  decisions  about  the  appropriate  level
of resources to invest in network expansions and upgrades.
Technological measures to prevent illegal filesharing

Colleges and universities can take a number of technological steps to help reduce
illegal filesharing on their campus networks. These generally fall into two categories
of  technologies  that  can  be  installed  on  the  campus  network.  The  first  category  en-
compasses hardware and software systems known as ‘‘traffic shapers,’’ which modify
the rate at which certain files are transmitted over the network. Traffic-shaping sys-
tems  prioritize  the  transmission  speed  of  files  based  on  a  number  of  factors,  such
as  where  on  the  network  the  transmitted  files  originate  (files  from  laboratory  com-
puters  may  receive  faster  transmission  than  those  from  dorm  computers)  or  what
software  program  is  sending  the  files  (files  from  known  research  software  may  be
given  faster  transmission  than  data  from  games  or  other  entertainment  software).
Traffic-shaping  systems  can  also  establish  a  maximum  data  transmission  amount
per day for users, so that users who ‘‘hog’’ transmission time can be prevented from
overusing  the  network.  While  traffic-shaping  systems  do  not  specifically  identify  or
target  files  that  contain  copyrighted  material,  they  can  reduce  the  flow  of  data  to
and  from  computers  that  tend  to  transmit  or  receive  copyright-infringing  trans-
missions,  making  illegal  filesharing  slower  and  more  difficult.  According  to  a  2005
survey  by  EDUCAUSE,  almost  90  percent  of  campuses  use  some  form  of  traffic-
shaping technologies on their networks. Traffic-shaping products include Packeteer’s
PacketShaper,  Allot  Communication’s  NetEnforcer, 
and  APconnections’
NetEqualizer.

The second category of technologies available to campus networks to reduce illegal
filesharing encompasses systems known as ‘‘network filters’’. These technologies use
a  variety  of  techniques  to  more  closely  examine  transmissions  on  the  network  and
specifically  determine  whether  they  contain  copyrighted  materials.  They  can  gen-
erally  be  configured  to  either  block  the  transmission  of  files  that  are  found  to  con-
tain these materials, or simply to log the infringing transmission and send warning
notices  to  the  user(s)  involved.  One  of  the  methods  employed  by  network-filtering
technologies  to  detect  copyrighted  material  is  known  as  ‘‘fingerprinting,’’  in  which
various  characteristics  of  music  tracks  and  movies  (a  ‘‘fingerprint’’  of  the  content)
are  stored  in  a  database,  and  transmitted  files  are  compared  against  this  database
to detect a match. A second method is based on analyzing the transmission patterns
of  data  on  the  network  and  statistically  comparing  them  with  previously  identified
infringing network traffic. Network-filtering systems are not yet widely deployed by
colleges  and  universities,  although  a  growing  number  of  schools  are  beginning  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

adopt them. Network-filter products include Audible Magic’s CopySense, Red Lamb-
da’s cGRID::Integrity, and SafeMedia’s Clouseau.
Reactions from the university community

Most colleges and universities have embraced the adoption of traffic-shaping tech-
nologies.  Their  use  of  these  systems  is  motivated  partly  by  concerns  about  illegal
filesharing  and  partly  by  the  desire  to  make  their  networks  more  efficient.  Many
campuses  have  responded  to  the  illegal  filesharing  issue  with  educational  and
awareness  campaigns  for  their  students,  to  teach  them  that  filesharing  using  most
free  P2P  software  applications  is  illegal  and  could  expose  them  to  legal  action.  A
smaller number of campuses (roughly 100 by the end of 2006) have begun providing
legal  alternatives  for  downloading  music  and  movies.  These  legitimate  services  in-
clude  Ruckus,  Cdigix,  and  Napster,  and  are  funded  either  by  advertising  revenue,
flat student fees per semester, or other financing models. Education campaigns often
include  a  component  to  teach  students  who  are  using  P2P  applications  for  illegal
filesharing about the existence of these legal sites.

In contrast to attitudes towards traffic-shaping systems, education, and legitimate
download  services,  many  universities  have  raised  objections  to  installing  network-
filtering  technologies.  These  objections  are  based  on  policy,  financial,  and  technical
rationales,  and  have  spurred  a  significant  debate  on  the  issue  of  the  appropriate
role for network-filtering systems in dealing with illegal downloading.

Policy  objections  to  network-filtering  systems  are  based  on  arguments  that  their
use  violates  privacy,  by  inspecting  network  transmissions  too  closely.  There  is  also
an  argument  that  network-filtering  systems  compromise  academic  freedom,  by
blocking or impeding the free transmission of data. These policy issues, while valid,
must  be  considered  in  the  context  of  other  network-management  policies  in  place
on  virtually  all  campus  networks,  including  the  use  of  anti-spam  and  anti-virus  fil-
ters,  which  examine  the  content  of  transmitted  files  for  unwanted  commercial  con-
tent (spam) or malicious software (viruses and worms). If the behavior of anti-spam
and anti-virus software is not considered invasive of privacy or counter to academic
freedom,  then  to  the  extent  that  network-filtering  systems  examine  content  in  a
similar fashion, they should not be considered so either.

Financial  objections  to  network-filtering  technologies  generally  involve  concerns
that  it  would  be  too  expensive  to  purchase  systems  with  sufficient  capability  to  ef-
fectively  reduce  illegal  filesharing  on  campus  networks,  and/or  that  it  would  be  too
expensive to pay for maintenance and upgrades to these systems. In addressing this
issue, it is useful to consider the relative costs campuses currently pay for their net-
work  management,  and  place  the  cost  of  network-filtering  systems  in  this  context.
While  campuses  differ,  in  the  case  of  many  campuses  using  network-filtering  sys-
tems,  the  costs  associated  with  these  technologies  are  significantly  less  than  that
of  other  network  management  activities.  In  addition,  network-filtering  systems  can
relieve  pressure  on  campus  networks  clogged  with  a  mix  of  legitimate  and  illegit-
imate traffic, and thus eliminate or defer the need for expensive network-expansion
projects.  For  example,  the  University  of  Florida  was  able  to  defer  a  $2  million  net-
work upgrade for over two years by installing a network-filtering system and reduc-
ing a large amount of network traffic that was determined to be illegal. Wittenberg
University  estimates  that  it  saves  between  $20,000  and  $25,000  annually  on  net-
work  usage  because  of  its  network-filtering  system.  Campuses  also  realize  savings
by not having to process as many DMCA complaints: the University of Florida saved
roughly 3000 work-hours in the first year after installing its system, and Wittenberg
University  estimates  it  eliminated  90  percent  of  its  complaint-processing  time
(roughly 45 work-hours per year) by using its network-filtering technology.

Finally, technical objections to network filters are grounded in the argument that
they  are  imperfect,  and  do  not  detect  and  stop  all  illegal  filesharing  on  a  network.
The objections also include concerns that network-filtering systems will be defeated
by  technical  attacks,  such  as  a  move  to  encrypted  data  transmission  for  illegal
filesharing  or  other  work-arounds.  While  these  systems  are  indeed  imperfect  in  the
sense  that  they  do  not  prevent  100  percent  of  illegal  transmissions,  an  important
analogy  can  be  made  to  the  adoption  and  deployment  of  the  first  firewalls,  spam
filters  and  virus  filters,  which  were  and  continue  to  be  imperfect  technologies,  yet
today  form  a  critical  digital  defense  across  campus  and  commercial  networks  that
no  responsible  network  administrator  would  fail  to  employ.  An  adoption  standard
based on technical perfection is inconsistent with other technology adoption policies
and is ultimately counter-productive.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

Chairman  GORDON.  This  hearing  will  come  to  order,  and  good
afternoon  to  everyone.  Welcome  to  today’s  hearing  entitled  The
Role  of  Technology  in  Reducing  Illegal  Filesharing:  A  University
Perspective. Today we are going to be addressing the issue of illegal
filesharing  on  university  computer  networks.  This  practice,  which
is also known as digital piracy, is costing the entertainment indus-
try billions of dollars and thousands of jobs.

I  would  also  note  that  illegal  filesharing  isn’t  just  about  royalty
fees.  It  clogs  campus  networks  and  interferes  with  the  educational
and research mission of universities. It wastes resources that could
have  gone  to  laboratories,  classrooms,  and  equipment,  and  it  is
teaching a generation of college students that it is all right to steal
music,  movies,  and  other  content  because  it  is  easy  to  download
them  on  the  Internet.  That  is  wrong,  and  it  needs  to  be  stopped.
Our  committee  is  not  the  first  to  address  this  issue.  Under  the
leadership of my friend Lamar Smith the Judiciary Committee held
a  series  of  hearings  on  this  topic  in  the  last  Congress.  The  Edu-
cation  Committee  has  also  held  a  hearing  on  this  issue.  However,
those hearings focused on the legal and regulatory structure as was
appropriate  given  the  jurisdiction  of  the  Committees.  The  focus  of
today’s  hearing  is  on  technology  to  help  prevent  illegal  filesharing.
In  today’s  digital  world  we  generally  rely  on  technology  to  com-
bat illegal activities. It is illegal to send spam or to hack into a sys-
tem to steal data. And though regulations attempt to stop these il-
legal  activities,  regulations  alone  are  not  enough.  Systems  from
large corporate networks to home desktop computers use anti-spam
and anti-virus software firewalls.

Do these technologies stop all illegal activities? Of course not, but
they  do  prevent  the  bulk  of  bad  things  from  happening,  and  the
technologies  have  improved  even  as  the  sophistication  of  the
spammers and hackers has increased. The Science and Technology
Committee has a long history of holding hearings and moving legis-
lation  about  technologies  that  are  used  to  combat  these  illegal  ac-
tivities.

I  believe  the  case  of  illegal  filesharing  is  exactly  the  same.  We
can’t  rely  on  laws  and  regulations  alone  to  fix  the  problem.  Tech-
nology  will  be  the  first  line  of  defense,  and  I  am  hopeful  that  our
work  here  will  contribute  to  the  beginning  of  real  action  on  this
problem. I don’t want to be holding this same hearing in the 111th
Congress.

Our  witnesses  will  focus  on  the  use  of  technology  to  combat  ille-
gal  filesharing.  Some  of  them  will  discuss  how  their  campuses  de-
cided  to  use  technology  to  reduce  digital  piracy.  I  hope  to  learn
about  their  experiences  with  these  technologies  and  how  well  they
have  worked.  I  am  also  interested  in  learning  about  the  tech-
nologies  themselves;  how  they  stop  copyrighted  files  from  being  il-
legally  shared  and  what  technical  issues  there  may  be  for  imple-
menting  them  on  campus  networks.  And  I  am  looking  forward  to
hearing  about  an  important  cooperative  project  between  higher
education and the entertainment community to rigorously test and
evaluate these technologies in an objective, scientific manner.

I  want  to  thank  our  panelists  for  taking  time  from  their  busy
schedules  to  appear  before  us  today.  One  of  our  nation’s  greatest
strengths  is  our  education  system,  and  America’s  universities  are

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

the  envy  of  the  world.  Their  mission  is  to  educate  students,  and
they should not condone or look the other way when their computer
networks  are  used  as  clearing  houses  for  digital  piracy  and  illegal
filesharing.  Universities  do  not  condone  piracy  of  computer  soft-
ware, textbooks, or academic research articles, and they should not
treat entertainment intellectual property any differently.

It  is  my  hope  that  by  working  together  we  can  fix  the  problem

of digital piracy on our campuses.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Gordon follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BART GORDON

Good morning. Welcome to today’s hearing entitled ‘‘The Role of Technology in Re-

ducing Illegal Filesharing: A University Perspective.’’

Today  we  are  going  to  be  addressing  the  issue  of  illegal  filesharing  on  university
computer  networks.  This  practice,  which  is  also  known  as  digital  piracy,  is  costing
the  entertainment  industry  billions  of  dollars  and  thousands  of  jobs.  Many  of  the
people  affected  by  it  are  my  constituents,  who  live  near  and  work  in  Nashville,  the
recording  capital  of  America.  They  are  the  ones  who  first  brought  this  issue  to  my
attention.

I would also note that illegal filesharing isn’t just about royalty fees. It clogs cam-
pus  networks  and  interferes  with  the  educational  and  research  mission  of  univer-
sities.

It  wastes  resources  that  could  have  gone  to  laboratories,  classrooms,  and  equip-
ment.  And  it  is  teaching  a  generation  of  college  students  that  it’s  all  right  to  steal
music,  movies,  and  other  content,  because  it’s  easy  to  download  them  on  the  Inter-
net. That’s wrong, and it must be stopped.

Our  committee  is  not  the  first  to  address  this  issue.  Under  the  leadership  of  my
friend Lamar Smith, the Judiciary Committee held a series of hearings on this topic
in  the  last  Congress.  The  Education  Committee  has  also  held  a  hearing  on  this
issue. However, those hearings focused on the illegality and regulatory structure, as
was  appropriate  given  the  jurisdiction  of  those  Committees.  The  focus  of  today’s
hearing is on technology to help prevent illegal filesharing.

In  today’s  digital  world,  we  generally  rely  on  technology  to  combat  illegal  activi-
ties.  It’s  illegal  to  send  spam  or  to  hack  into  a  system  and  steal  data.  And  though
regulations  attempt  to  stop  these  illegal  activities,  regulations  alone  are  surely  not
enough.  Systems  from  large  corporate  networks  to  home  desktop  computers  use
anti-spam and anti-virus software and firewalls.

Do these technologies stop all illegal activities? Of course not. But they do prevent
the  bulk  of  bad  things  from  happening.  And  the  technologies  have  improved,  even
as  the  sophistication  of  the  spammers  and  hackers  has  increased.  The  Science  &
Technology Committee has along history of holding hearings and moving legislation
on technologies that are used to combat these illegal activities.

I  believe  the  case  of  illegal  filesharing  is  exactly  the  same.  We  can’t  rely  on  laws
and regulations alone to fix the problem. Technology will be the first line of defense.
I’m hopeful that our work here today will contribute to the beginnings of real action
on this problem. I don’t want to be holding this same hearing in the 111th Congress.
Our  witnesses  will  focus  on  the  use  of  technology  to  combat  illegal  filesharing.
Some  of  them  will  discuss  how  their  campuses  decided  to  use  technical  methods  to
reduce  digital  piracy,  and  I  hope  to  learn  about  their  experiences  with  these  tech-
nologies and how well they have worked.

I am also interested in learning about the technologies themselves—how they stop
copyrighted  files  from  being  illegally  shared,  and  what  technical  issues  there  may
be for implementing them on campus networks.

And  I  am  looking  forward  to  hearing  about  an  important  cooperative  project  be-
tween  higher  education  and  the  entertainment  community  to  rigorously  test  and
evaluate these technologies in an objective, scientific manner.

I want to thank our panelists for taking time from their busy schedules to appear

before us today.

One  of  our  nation’s  greatest  strengths  is  our  educational  system,  and  American

universities are the envy of the world.

Their  mission  is  to  educate  students,  and  they  should  not  condone  or  look  the
other  way  when  their  computer  networks  are  used  as  clearinghouses  for  digital  pi-
racy and illegal filesharing. Universities do not condone the piracy of computer soft-
ware, textbooks, or academic research articles, and they should not treat entertain-
ment intellectual property any differently.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

It  is  my  hope  that  by  working  together  we  can  fix  the  problem  of  digital  piracy

on campuses.

10

Chairman  GORDON.  And  now  I  would  like  to  yield  to  my  friend,

Mr. Hall.

Mr.  HALL.  And  I  assure  you  that  I  will  call  a  hearing  in  the
111th if we need to, and I will confer with you in the kind of man-
ner that you have with me, and I thank you for it.

Thank you, Chairman Gordon, for convening this very Full Com-
mittee hearing today. I would like to echo your welcome to our dis-
tinguished  panel  today,  and  I  thank  all  of  you  for  taking  time  to
come  to  Washington  to  discuss  how  we  can  reduce  digital  piracy.
The  breadth  of  experience  and  expertise  here  today  I  think  is
going  to  get  us  a  long  way  in  understanding  the  problem  of  copy-
right  infringement  and  hopefully  eliminate  some  of  the  next  steps
for the community.

In particular I would like to welcome Dr. Greg Jackson, the Chief
Information Officer of the University of Chicago, and former Direc-
tor  of  Academic  Computing  for  the  Massachusetts  Institute  of
Technology.  Dr.  Jackson  has  also  served  on  advisory  boards  for
major  information  technology  industry  firms  and  helped  usher  in
the  next  generation  of  Internet  technologies  with  the  National
Lambda  Rail  and  Internet  2  and  I  thank  you,  Dr.  Jackson,  and  I
look  forward  to  hearing  from  you  and  all  of  your  talented  col-
leagues here today.

Piracy  of  digital  available  media  has  become  a  large  concern  as
more and more intellectual and creative works are available in eas-
ily  transferred  digital  format  and  access  to  high  bandwidth  net-
works has spread. High-speed Internet connections used to be lim-
ited  to  major  universities  and  government  research  labs.  Now,  rel-
atively  cheap  broadband  access  is  available,  including  over  50  mil-
lion  residential  high-speed  connections.  Through  this  combination
illegal filesharing of music, movies, software, and other contents is
easier than ever, literally at the click of a button.

This  rampant  disregard  for  copyright  law  absolutely  needs  to
end.  A  number  of  other  committees  have  set,  have  met  to  discuss
aspects of this problem. The hearing today will examine for us one
detail of the larger intellectual property enforcement debate, focus-
ing  on  the  efficacy  of  technological  solutions  to  stopping  illegal
filesharing.

Colleges  and  universities  hold  a  unique  perspective  being  both
creators  of  intellectual  property,  Internet  service  providers  to  a
large  and  technically  savvy  group  of  students  and  staff,  and
custodians  of  some  of  the  fastest  cutting-edge  networks  in  the  Na-
tion. From reading our witnesses’ testimony, it is clear that no sin-
gle silver bullet solution is available to stop unauthorized distribu-
tion of digital media while allowing authorized traffic.

The  variety  of  campus  network  needs  and  policies  with  respect
to  the  proper  role  of  the  institution  in  policing  users  leads  to  a
highly diverse environment. However, recent work and cooperation
among  higher  education,  copyright  holders,  and  technology  compa-
nies  has  helped  build  an  understanding  of  these  varied  require-
ments and given us insight into how we might proceed in the end.
The  technologies  we  will  discuss  today  are  going  to  form  part  of  a
larger  anti-piracy  solution  that  also  includes  legal  alternatives,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

education,  and  adequate  protections  of  privacy  and  consumer
rights.

And if I have any time left I yield to the gentleman, Mr. Sensen-

brenner.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hall follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RALPH M. HALL

Thank  you,  Chairman  Gordon,  for  convening  this  Full  Committee  hearing  today.
I’d  like  to  echo  your  welcome  to  our  distinguished  panel  today.  Thank  you  all  for
taking the time to come to Washington to discuss how we can reduce digital piracy.
The breadth of experience and expertise here today will get us a long way in under-
standing the problem of copyright infringement and hopefully illuminate some next
steps for the community.

In particular, I’d like to welcome Dr. Greg Jackson, the Chief Information Officer
of  the  University  of  Chicago  and  former  Director  of  Academic  Computing  for  the
Massachusetts  Institute  of  Technology.  Dr.  Jackson  has  also  served  on  advisory
boards for major IT industry firms and helped usher in the next generation of Inter-
net  technologies  with  National  LambdaRail  and  Internet2.  Thank  you  Dr.  Jackson,
I’ll look forward to hearing from you and all of your talented colleagues here today.
Piracy of digitally available media has become a large concern as more and more
intellectual  and  creative  works  are  available  in  easily-transferred,  digital  format
and access to high bandwidth networks has spread. High speed Internet connections
used  to  be  limited  to  major  universities  and  government  research  labs.  Now,  rel-
atively  cheap  broadband  access  is  available,  including  over  fifty  million  residential
high speed connections. Through this combination, illegal filesharing of music, mov-
ies, software, and other content is easier than ever—literally at the click of a button.
This rampant disregard for copyright law needs to end.

A  number  of  other  committees  have  met  to  discuss  aspects  of  this  problem.  This
hearing  will  examine  one  detail  of  the  larger  intellectual  property  enforcement  de-
bate,  focusing  on  the  efficacy  of  technological  solutions  to  stopping  illegal
filesharing. Colleges and universities hold a unique perspective, being both creators
of  intellectual  property,  Internet  service  providers  to  a  large  and  technically  savvy
group of students and staff, and custodians of some of the fastest, cutting edge net-
works in the Nation.

From reading our witnesses testimony, it is clear that no single, silver-bullet solu-
tion  is  available  to  stop  unauthorized  distribution  of  digital  media  while  allowing
authorized  traffic.  The  variety  of  campus  network  needs  and  policies  with  respect
to the proper role of the institution in policing users leads to a highly diverse envi-
ronment.  However,  recent  work  and  cooperation  among  higher  education,  copyright
holders, and technology companies has helped build an understanding of these var-
ied  requirements  and  given  us  insight  into  how  we  might  proceed.  In  the  end,  the
technologies  we’ll  discuss  today  will  form  part  of  a  larger  anti-piracy  solution  that
also  includes  legal  alternatives,  education,  and  adequate  protections  of  privacy  and
consumer rights.

Chairman  GORDON.  I  was  going  to  suggest  that.  Mr.  Sensen-
brenner has an appointment to chew someone out, and so we don’t
want to stand in his way, and we would like for him to——

Mr. SENSENBRENNER. It is the State Department on issuing pass-

ports. So there is a big problem with that.

First  of  all,  I  thank  both  the  Chair  and  the  gentleman  from

Texas for yielding.

When  I  was  the  Chair  of  the  Judiciary  Committee,  I  was  really
an intellectual property hawk, and I was the one that directed Con-
gressman Smith to have the series of hearings in the last Congress
relative  to  the  copyright  law  and  the  enforcement  of  the  copyright
law.

This  hearing  closes  the  loop  on  this,  because  obviously  we  are
never  going  to  be  able  to  get  100  percent  enforcement  given  the
massive  popularity  of  the  Internet  and  the  new  technologies  for
filesharing,  and  that  is  why  the  technologies  are  important  to  be
able to prevent this from happening in the first place.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

I am a graduate of Stanford University. So is my son, and when
I  went  out  to  visit  my  son  during  his  time  out  at  Stanford,  I  fre-
quently checked in with the front office, and one of the things that
I  talked  about  there  was  the  problem  of  filesharing  on  university
campuses.  This  was  several  years  ago,  and  at  that  time  the  esti-
mate was given to me that about 80 percent of the broadband that
the  university  purchased,  again,  with  the  money  that  came  from
tuition  and  elsewhere,  was  used  for  filesharing,  and  only  20  per-
cent was being used for legitimate research of other academic pur-
poses.

This is a staggering figure, and to say that filesharing on univer-
sity  campuses  does  not  drive  up  the  cost  of  education  is  just  flat
out  false.  And  the  more  we  can  do  to  have  the  technology  to  pre-
vent  this  from  happening  in  the  first  place,  the  better  off  the  kids
who  don’t  fileshare  will  be  in  terms  of  not  seeing  one  tuition  in-
crease  piled  on  top  of  another  tuition  increase,  and  in  the  case  of
public  universities,  administrators  having  a  good  go  at  the  legisla-
ture to get more taxpayers’ dollars to be used to pay for this.

So  I  welcome  this  hearing  today.  I  am  sorry  I  have  to  go  leave
to  chew  the  Director  of  Counselor  Affairs  out,  but  anybody  who
wants  to  travel  overseas  pretty  soon  and  who  doesn’t  have  a  pass-
port yet, will know that I am doing the Lord’s work there while you
are doing the Lord’s work here. So thank you.

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Sensenbrenner.  We  should

have called you as a witness.

If there are other Members who wish to submit additional open-

ing statements, your statements will be added to the record.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Johnson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE EDDIE BERNICE JOHNSON

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I  would  like  to  welcome  here  today  the  witnesses  for  today’s  hearing  to  explore
technologies  used  by  colleges  and  universities  to  reduce  copyright-infringing
filesharing on campus.

Universities  historically  have  upheld  strict  standards  in  terms  of  ethical  conduct,
opposing  plagiarism,  and  supporting  moral  values  when  it  comes  to  the  process  of
research and higher education.

Again,  universities  are  positioned  to  take  a  leadership  role  in  the  practice  of  re-
ducing  illegal  mass  copying  of  music  and  videos  in  which  it  is  against  the  law  to
reproduce and share the files.

Always  at  the  cutting  edge  of  technology  policy  discussions,  the  Committee  on
Science and Technology is eager to learn more about current best-practices on cam-
pus.  We  want  to  hear  examples  of  excellence  in  protecting  the  copyrights  of  music
and videos on campus.

Such  technologies  save  the  music  and  movie  industries  from  costly  losses  due  to

illegal filesharing, and they enforce current copyright laws.

While  these  technologies  have  great  potential  for  widespread  adoption  and  use,
they  also  have  limitations.  The  Committee  hopes  to  hear  more  about  these  limita-
tions and how they can be overcome.

Other  pertinent  issues  include  whether  the  technologies  compromise  the  privacy
of  campus  computer  networks  and  otherwise  interfere  with  legitimate  uses  of  cam-
pus computer networks.

Again, welcome to today’s witnesses. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I yield back.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Carnahan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RUSS CARNAHAN

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  hosting  this  hearing  to  explore  approaches  to  the
reduction  of  illegal  filesharing  on  the  campus  networks  of  universities  around  the
country.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

Copyright-infringing  filesharing  costs  the  movie,  music,  and  software  industries
hundreds of millions of dollars each year, and I look forward to examining ways that
Congress can help to counteract this worrying trend.

Numerous studies by intellectual property and consulting firms over the past few
years  have  shown  that  college  students  account  for  a  disproportionately  large  per-
centage  of  illegal  downloads  on  peer-to-peer  networks.  Increasingly,  the  high-speed
Internet  networks  provided  by  universities  for  the  purposes  of  education  and  re-
search are becoming the domains of digital piracy and illicit filesharing by students.
Today’s  hearing  focuses  on  the  important  task  of  bolstering  the  technology  avail-
able  to  universities  for  controlling  the  copyright-protected  material  being  trans-
mitted across their campus networks. I am eager to hear our witnesses’ assessments
of  the  counter-measures  implemented  thus  far  so  that  we  can  reflect  on  the  suc-
cesses  and  inefficiencies  of  the  technologies  and  seek  to  make  modifications  for  im-
provement. Your first-hand experiences are vital to protecting the copyrights of mu-
sicians,  producers,  and  software  engineers,  as  well  as  maximizing  the  performance
of university networks.

To all the witnesses—thank you for taking time out of your busy schedules to ap-

pear before us today. I look forward to hearing your testimony.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Mitchell follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE HARRY E. MITCHELL

Thank you Mr. Chairman.
I would like to extend a special welcome today to Dr. Adrian Sannier, Vice Presi-
dent  and  University  Technology  Officer  at  Arizona  State  University.  Dr.  Sannier
made  a  special  trip  to  Washington  today  to  represent  Arizona  State  University,  a
groundbreaking research university in my hometown of Tempe, AZ.

Dr. Sannier is an integral part of ASU’s mission to become a ‘‘New American Uni-
versity’’ and as such and it does not surprise me to know that the University Tech-
nology Office is at the forefront of peer-to-peer filesharing issues.

The purpose of today’s hearing is to learn about the experiences universities have
had combating illegal filesharing on campus. Illegal filesharing on campus networks
puts many of our universities in a unique position. Students disregarding copyright
protections may be liable for legal action, an incentive for many universities to block
filesharing  on  their  networks  and  protect  students.  At  the  same  time  legal
filesharing (such as research) should be allowed and privacy protected.

Many universities are in a difficult position when it comes to solutions for illegal
filesharing and some have implemented technological measures to reduce copyright-
infringing filesharing on their networks.

ASU  is  one  of  the  first  universities  in  the  country  to  implement  technology  to
track  and  block  illegal  filesharing  and  Dr.  Sannier  will  share  his  insight  about
ASU’s  experience  with  Audible  Magic  Corporations’s  anti-piracy  technology—from
what has worked to the school’s concerns about existing technologies.

I  look  forward  to  Dr.  Sannier’s  testimony  and  learning  about  the  experiences  of

other universities around the country.
I yield back the balance of my time.
Chairman  GORDON.  And  now  I  would  like  to  recognize  Mr.

Matheson to introduce our first witness.

Mr.  MATHESON.  Well,  thank  you,  Chairman  Gordon,  and  I  do
want  to  introduce  a  constituent  of  mine,  Dr.  Charles  Wight  from
the University of Utah. He has been a member of the faculty at the
University of Utah since 1984, and he has many roles he has taken
there, but among the many roles he serves as Associate Vice Presi-
dent  for  Academic  Affairs  and  Undergraduate  Studies.  And  in  this
role he is responsible for the university’s continuing education unit,
its  general  education  program,  and  for  development  of  policies  for
educational technology and online courses.

He  serves  on  the  university’s  academic  leadership  team  and  as-
sists  the  Chief  Information  Officer,  Dr.  Steven  Hess,  in  the  devel-
opment  of  institutional  policies  regarding  institutional  data  access
and  security.  And  in  2001,  he  chaired  a  committee  that  wrote  the
current  institutional  policy  governing  copyright  ownership  for
works created using resources of the University of Utah.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

So I want to welcome him as a witness, and Mr. Chairman, I will

yield back.

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you  very  much,  and  our  second  wit-
ness  is  Dr.  Adrian  Sannier,  the  Vice  President  and  University
Technology Officer at Arizona State University, which is in the dis-
trict of Mr. Harry Mitchell, and Mr. Mitchell had a conflict, but he
sends his best, and I understand you are going to be meeting with
him later. He is another valued Member of this committee.

And our third witness is Mr. Vance Ikezoye, President and CEO

of Audible Magic Corporation of Los Gatos, California.

Our  fourth  witness  is  Ms.  Cheryl  Elzy,  the  Dean  of  University
Libraries at Illinois State University and a member of the manage-
ment team of the Digital Citizen Project.

And  Mr.  Hall  has  already  introduced  the  Republican  witness
today, and so we are all glad you are here. As our witnesses know,
your  statements  will  be  made  a  part  of  the  record,  and  we  hope
that you can summarize. We try to keep it within five minutes, but
we  want  to  be  sure  that  you  feel  comfortable  getting  your  full
point.

And then we will introduce our Members for five minutes. So we

will now start with Dr. Wight.
STATEMENT  OF  DR.  CHARLES  A.  WIGHT,  ASSOCIATE  VICE
PRESIDENT  FOR  ACADEMIC  AFFAIRS  AND  UNDER-
GRADUATE  STUDIES,  UNIVERSITY  OF  UTAH,  SALT  LAKE
CITY
Dr.  WIGHT.  Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  am
pleased  to  appear  today  to  share  some  of  the  experiences  of  the
University of Utah in reducing illegal peer-to-peer sharing of music
and video files.

My  name  is  Chuck  Wight,  and  I  serve  as  Associate  Vice  Presi-
dent  for  Academic  Affairs  and  Undergraduate  Studies  at  the  Uni-
versity of Utah.

First of all, I want to stress that respect for copyrights lies at the
heart  of  what  universities  do.  Students  and  faculty  enjoy  the  pro-
tection  of  intellectual  property  that  we  create  every  day  through
scholarly  research.  As  teachers,  we  enjoy  special  privileges  from
the Doctrine of Fair Use, which permits limited use of copyrighted
materials for non-profit educational purposes.

Therefore,  when  members  of  our  community  abuse  copyrights  of
others, whether it is plagiarism or through peer-to-peer filesharing,
we take this very seriously.

At  the  University  of  Utah  we  have  adopted  a  two-pronged  ap-
proach  to  reducing  illegal  peer-to-peer  filesharing.  First  of  all,  we
continuously  monitor  our  networks  to  identify  high  bandwidth
users  in  all  areas  of  the  campus  network.  Each  week  every  local
area  network  manager  receives  a  report  of  the  top  talkers  on  his
or her local area network. Each LAN manager is responsible for as-
sessing  whether  the  high  bandwidth  activity  is  an  appropriate  use
of  university  resources,  and  if  not,  that  person  is  responsible  for
correcting the situation.

In the part of our network that serves the student residences, we
run  the  Audible  Magic  software,  which  monitors  network  traffic  to
detect  and  block  the  transmission  of  copyrighted  works  that  are

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

registered  with  Audible  Magic.  These  are  mostly  music  recordings
and movies.

In  addition,  we  automatically  terminate  network  access  to  any
student computer that has a total volume of outgoing network traf-
fic  that  exceeds  two  gigabytes  in  a  single  day.  Whenever  this  hap-
pens,  someone  from  our  information  security  office  follows  up  with
the user to determine whether or not the network activity was ap-
propriate. That person then takes action to either restrict the activ-
ity or to allow it to continue.

This  two-pronged  approach  to  the  peer-to-peer  filesharing  prob-
lem  has  been  very  successful  for  us.  We  reduced  the  number  of
DMCA  copyright  abuse  notices  from  RIAA,  MPAA,  and  others  by
more than 90 percent. We currently deal with only two or three no-
tices per week. After implementing this strategy about three years
ago,  the  university  saved  about  $1.2  million  per  year  in  Internet
bandwidth charges.

In addition, we saved an estimated $70,000 per year in personnel
costs  that  would  have  otherwise  been  required  to  investigate  and
respond to copyright abuse complaints. Every time our information
security  office  investigates  a  valid  complaint  or  finds  an  instance
of  illegal  filesharing  activity,  the  user  must  agree  in  writing  to
abide by the university’s acceptable use policy in order to have his
or  her  network  access  restored.  The  rate  of  repeat  offenses  is  low.
In more than ten years there have been only three instances where
a user’s network access was permanently revoked.

It  is  important  to  realize  that  there  is  no  software  or  other  net-
work  monitoring  technology  that  can  identify  illegal  transmission
of  copyrighted  material  with  100  percent  reliability.  Port  shifting
and  encryption  are  just  two  of  the  many  effective  strategies  that
peer-to-peer filesharing programs use to overcome almost any tech-
nology solution to this problem.

That  is  why  it  is  important  to  use  multiple  strategies,  for  exam-
ple,  Audible  Magic  combined  with  network  traffic  volume  moni-
toring,  for  detecting  suspected  violations.  It  is  also  important  for
the  university  to  contact  users  personally  in  each  case  to  make  a
detailed assessment of the situation.

Our approach is largely, though not 100 percent, effective for re-
ducing  illegal  filesharing  activities  on  our  campus.  It  allows  us  to
block  some  content  automatically,  and  it  allows  us  to  ensure  that
our  network  bandwidth  resources  are  used  appropriately,  while  at
the same time respecting the privacy of individual users.

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Wight follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHARLES A. WIGHT

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  am  pleased  to  appear  today  to
share some of the experiences of the University of Utah in reducing the illegal shar-
ing  of  digital  copyrighted  materials.  My  name  is  Charles  Wight,  and  I  currently
serve  as  Associate  Vice  President  for  Academic  Affairs  and  Undergraduate  Studies
at  the  University  of  Utah.  In  this  capacity  I  am  responsible  for,  or  I  am  otherwise
engaged  in,  creating  and  implementing  a  wide  range  of  university  policies  dealing
with  educational  technology,  online  courses,  Internet  security,  copyright  policy,  in-
stitutional data access, and student behavior.

Copyright  law  is  essential  to  many  of  the  core  functions  of  universities.  Faculty,
staff and students enjoy protection of the intellectual property that is created every
day through the process of scholarly research. Teachers also derive enormous benefit

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

from  the  doctrine  of  Fair  Use  (sections  107  through  118  of  the  Copyright  Act,  Title
17  of  United  States  Code),  which  permits  limited  free  use  of  copyrighted  materials
for nonprofit educational purposes. Therefore, we are concerned whenever members
of our university community are engaged in activities that violate the copyrights of
others.

The University of Utah employs two independent technology solutions on its cam-
pus  network  to  address  the  problem  of  illegal  filesharing.  The  first  is  continuous
monitoring  of  network  traffic  to  identify  high-bandwidth  users  in  all  areas  of  cam-
pus.  The  second  is  a  network  monitoring  program  called  Audible  Magic,  which  de-
tects  and  blocks  transmission  of  unencrypted  copyrighted  music  and  video  record-
ings  from  computers  in  the  student  residence  halls.  The  decision  to  use  these  tech-
nologies  for  detecting  suspected  cases  of  copyright  abuse  through  peer-to-peer
filesharing  was  made  by  its  Chief  Information  Officer,  Dr.  Stephen  Hess,  in  con-
sultation with the University administration and the University’s Information Tech-
nology  Council,  a  broadly  based  oversight  committee  composed  of  faculty  and  staff
from  all  major  areas  of  the  campus.  The  University’s  Information  Security  Office
(ISO) implements the policies.

The  ISO  network  monitoring  software  automatically  generates  daily  reports  for
the manager of each local area network (LAN), typically for a department or college
within  the  university.  The  report  lists  all  of  the  computers  connected  to  that  LAN
for  which  the  volume  of  outgoing  network  traffic  exceeded  one  gigabyte  (GB)  over
a 24 hour period. Each LAN manager is responsible for assessing the type of infor-
mation being sent and whether the use of network resources is consistent with uni-
versity policy and applicable laws. In most cases, the traffic is associated with legiti-
mate  teaching  and  research  functions  of  the  university.  However,  in  some  cases,
LAN  managers  are  able  to  identify  computers  that  are  transmitting  large  amounts
of  data  inappropriately.  It  is  the  responsibility  of  the  LAN  manager  to  isolate  the
offending  computer  from  the  campus  network  and  to  contact  the  user  or  adminis-
trator of the machine to make a detailed assessment of the situation.

The  ISO  also  runs  Audible  Magic  network  monitoring  software  in  the  local  area
network  serving  our  student  residence  halls,  where  the  potential  for  illegal
filesharing  is  high.  The  software  is  designed  to  detect  transmission  of  copyrighted
materials  registered  with  Audible  Magic  by  looking  for  particular  patterns  of  bits
crossing  the  network,  somewhat  like  software  designed  to  detect  computer  viruses.
Whenever  Audible  Magic  detects  the  transmission  of  a  protected  work,  the  trans-
mission  is  automatically  reset,  preventing  the  protected  work  from  being  shared.
Additionally,  network  access  is  cut  off  automatically  if  the  total  volume  of  outgoing
network  traffic  from  a  student  computer  in  the  residence  halls  exceeds  two  GB  per
day.

Currently, the ISO deals with suspected cases of abuse of network resources about
two  or  three  times  each  week.  Approximately  70  percent  of  the  instances  occur  in
the  area  of  our  network  that  serves  the  student  residence  halls.  If  the  ISO  finds
that  a  user  violated  the  university’s  Information  Resources  Policy  (http://
www.admin.utah.edu/ppmanual/1/1-15.html), then the ISO representative reviews
that  policy  with  the  user.  The  user  must  then  provide  a  signed  statement  agreeing
to abide by the policy as well as applicable federal and State laws. Only then is the
user’s  access  to  the  network  restored.  Students  who  violate  the  policy  more  than
once are referred to the Dean of Students and the Student Behavior Committee for
disciplinary action.

This  two-pronged  technology  solution  has  been  effective  for  minimizing  the
amount  of  illegal  copyright  violations  on  campus  through  peer-to-peer  filesharing.
In the past 10 years, there have been only three instances in which it was necessary
to  permanently  revoke  a  user’s  access  to  the  university  network.  Since  we  began
using the Audible Magic network monitoring software more than two years ago, the
number of copyright abuse notices received from the Recording Industry Association
of  America  (RIAA)  and  the  Motion  Picture  Association  of  America  (MPAA)  has  de-
clined  by  more  than  90  percent.  The  strategy  also  pays  financial  dividends  for  the
university. By focusing attention on high-bandwidth users, the University has saved
enormous amounts of money that would have otherwise been required to build net-
work  capacity  to  support  illegal  activities.  Our  ISO  currently  spends  only  about
three  person-hours  per  week  dealing  with  network  abuse  issues.  Without  the  two
technology solutions in place, it is likely that it would require at least one additional
full-time employee to respond to complaints.

It is important to note that there is no software or other network monitoring tech-
nology  that  can  identify  illegal  transmission  of  copyrighted  material  with  100  per-
cent  reliability.  Audible  Magic  only  detects  transmission  of  works  that  are  reg-
istered with the company. Furthermore, it cannot detect the transmission if the ses-
sion is encrypted (e.g., with the BitTorrent peer-to-peer filesharing software). Moni-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

toring network traffic volume can identify large bandwidth users, but does not nec-
essarily indicate illegal activities. That is why it is important to employ at least two
independent  strategies  (e.g.,  network  traffic  volume  and  Audible  Magic)  for  detect-
ing  suspected  violations.  It  is  equally  important  to  reserve  judgment  in  each  case
until after making personal contact with the user or administrator of a suspect com-
puter  to  assess  whether  or  not  the  use  of  university  network  resources  is  appro-
priate.

In  conclusion,  the  University  of  Utah  currently  employs  a  two-part  strategy  of
monitoring  local  network  traffic  volume  across  its  entire  network  and  operating
filesharing  detection  software  in  the  local  area  networks  serving  the  student  resi-
dent halls. This strategy is largely, though not 100 percent, effective for identifying
inappropriate  peer-to-peer  filesharing  activities  involving  copyright  infringement.
The strategy protects the privacy of individuals while at the same time flagging sus-
picious  activities  electronically.  When  suspected  cases  of  network  abuse  are  de-
tected,  university  officials  follow  up  with  individual  computer  users  to  determine
whether  or  not  the  activity  is  appropriate,  and  they  take  any  actions  necessary  to
ensure that our network resources and the Internet are used responsibly.

BIOGRAPHY FOR CHARLES A. WIGHT

Professor  Charles  Wight  has  been  a  member  of  the  University  of  Utah  faculty
since  1984.  His  primary  academic  appointment  is  in  the  Chemistry  Department,
where  he  and  his  research  group  perform  research  on  the  chemical  reactions  and
combustion of high explosives and solid rocket propellants. Chuck is the Deputy Di-
rector  of  the  University  of  Utah  Center  for  Simulation  of  Accidental  Fires  and  Ex-
plosions, a large multi-disciplinary center for high-performance computing and sim-
ulation.  Chuck  serves  as  Associate  Vice  President  for  Academic  Affairs  and  Under-
graduate  Studies.  In  this  role,  he  is  responsible  for  operating  the  University’s  Con-
tinuing Education unit, its General Education program, and for development of poli-
cies  for  educational  technology  and  online  courses.  He  serves  on  the  University’s
Academic  Leadership  Team  and  assists  the  Chief  Information  Officer,  Dr.  Stephen
Hess, in the development of institutional policies regarding institutional data access
and  security.  In  2001,  Chuck  chaired  a  committee  that  wrote  the  current  institu-
tional  policy  governing  copyright  ownership  for  works  created  using  University  of
Utah resources.

Chairman GORDON. And Dr. Sannier, you are recognized.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  ADRIAN  SANNIER,  VICE  PRESIDENT  AND
UNIVERSITY  TECHNOLOGY  OFFICER,  ARIZONA  STATE  UNI-
VERSITY
Dr.  SANNIER.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Gordon,  Ranking  Member
Hall,  and  distinguished  Members  of  the  Committee  for  giving  me
this  opportunity  to  describe  for  you  Arizona  State  University’s  use
of  technology  to  reduce  the  incidence  of  copyright  infringing
filesharing on its campus networks.

My name is Adrian Sannier, and I am the University Technology
Officer  at  Arizona  State  University  responsible  for  the  governance
of  the  network,  among  other  duties.  As  one  of  the  Nation’s  largest
universities with over 65,000 students attending its four campuses
in  the  metropolitan  Phoenix  area,  ASU  provides  its  students,  fac-
ulty,  and  staff  with  an  extensive  and  evolving  array  of  computing
and communication services. These services have become a core en-
abler  of  the  university’s  academic  and  research  missions  and  will
continue to do so in the foreseeable future.

To  govern  the  legitimate  use  of  these  services,  ASU  has  devel-
oped an acceptable use policy for its computing and communication
services  that  expressly  forbids  their  use  to  transfer  or  exchange
files  when  that  transfer  or  exchange  would  infringe  on  copyright.
Users  of  the  university’s  computing  and  communication  services
must electronically agree to this policy as a condition of connection.
The  policy  explicitly  forbids  the  use  of  university  communications

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

or  computing  infrastructure  for  any  unlawful  communications,  in-
cluding  threats  of  violence,  obscenity,  child  pornography,  copyright
infringement, and harassing communications.

I  am  pleased  to  report  that  despite  some  reports  to  the  contrary
in  the  popular  press,  ASU  has  a  relatively  low  rate  of  complaint
about  the  illegitimate  use  of  its  network  from  copyright  holders
such  as  the  RIAA.  ASU’s  complaint  rate,  which  is  the  number  of
individuals  alleged  to  have  distributed  copyrighted  content  per
thousand  students,  is  less  than  half  of  one  percent,  the  lowest
among  the  25  institutions  for  which  the  RIAA  released  data  this
past spring.

In a recent letter to university presidents around the Nation, the
RIAA  outlined  a  set  of  four  best  practices  that  they  recommended
that  universities  employ  to  prevent  or  reduce  student  exposure  to
lawsuits. ASU was an early adopter of these practices, and they are
the cornerstones of our successful containment efforts.

The  first  recommended  practice  is  education.  ASU  incorporates
education  about  the  illegitimate  use  of  networks  in  our  new  stu-
dent  orientations,  our  residence  hall  orientations,  and  our  twice
yearly information security orientations.

The  second  recommended  practice  is  to  offer  students  a  legiti-
mate online service as an alternative to illegitimate filesharing. Be-
ginning  in  July  of  2005,  ASU  was  an  early  adopter  of  one  such
service,  a  digital  entertainment  network  designed  specifically  for
college  students  known  as  Ruckus.  ASU’s  subscription  provides  its
students  with  downloadable  access,  legal  downloadable  access,  to
2.75  million  songs,  full-length  feature  films,  short-form  video,
sports clips, and music videos, as well as access to a social network
site focused on the network.

The  third  recommended  practice  is  to  take  appropriate  discipli-
nary  action  when  students  are  found  to  be  engaging  in  infringing
conduct online. And so in addition to sanctions available under ap-
plicable  law,  ASU,  and  regents’  policy,  ASU  can  impose  temporary
or  permanent  reduction  or  elimination  of  access  privileges  to  com-
puting  and  communication  accounts,  networks,  or  ASU-adminis-
tered computing rooms, services, or facilities in the event of infrac-
tions.

The  RIAA’s  final  recommendation  encourages  universities  to  im-
plement technical solutions to restrict, filter, or curtail peer-to-peer
filesharing. Any technical solution must balance the rights of copy-
right  holders  with  the  legitimate  uses  of  the  university’s  network
and its users’ expectations of privacy and academic freedom.

Beginning in December of 2000, ASU’s first attempt at such a so-
lution  was  a  packet-shaping  solution.  The  packet-shaping  solution
restricted  the  amount  of  bandwidth  available  to  peer-to-peer
filesharing to a portion of the network bandwidth so that we could
contain  how  much  filesharing  was  being  done.  But  by  2006,  the
amount of illegitimate network traffic had grown so high that rein-
vesting  in  that  solution,  which  had  cost  the  university  about
$250,000, seemed the wrong alternative.

After  evaluating  several  different  products  and  approaches,  we
have  finally  settled  on  Audible  Magic’s  CopySense  Network  Appli-
ance.  The  CopySense  product  does  not  disable  peer-to-peer  net-
working  services  or  restrict  the  bandwidth  available  to  them.  In-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

stead, the CopySense Appliance treats copyrighted material as if it
were a computer virus on a P2P network. It works by blocking the
exchange  of  copyrighted  content  while  allowing  legitimate  files  to
transfer  unobstructed.  While  our  technical  team  was  skeptical  of
this  approach  at  first,  our  initial  tests  convinced  us  that  the
CopySense approach would provide us with a viable solution.

We  installed  the  CopySense  solution  in  spring  semester  without
fanfare.  It  was  configured  to  reject  any  traffic  identified  as  reg-
istered  commercial  music,  likely  commercial  music,  commercial
film  and  TV,  or  likely  commercial  software,  and  it  began  rejecting
about  between  five  and  10  percent  of  the  overall  network  band-
width immediately, identifying that traffic as the exchange of copy-
righted material.

Overall I would classify our adoption of CopySense as one of the
easiest  technical  adoptions  we  have  undertaken  and  that  it  has
thus far caused very little disruption in our community.

The list price is just over $200,000, and so that as a pioneer ref-
erence  account,  we  will  probably  end  up  spending  closer  to  half  of
that for an implementation of ASU’s scale.

While we at ASU are pleased with our new technical solution, we
remain concerned about the potential for ongoing arms races. Peer-
to-peer  services  have  evolved  to  defeat  counter  measures  before,
and  it  would  be  foolhardy  to  think  that  they  won’t  continue  to  do
so.  And  as  long  as  these  arms  races  continue,  universities  will  be
called upon to continue to expend resources in the defense of copy-
right that they might spend otherwise.

We,  therefore,  applaud  the  progress  that  many  in  the  market
have  made  in  developing  new  and  more  effective  business  models
for the consumer-friendly distribution of electronic content and look
forward to the day that these improved services make copyright-in-
fringing file exchange unattractive to all but the fringe of our com-
munity.

Thanks again for this opportunity to share Arizona State Univer-

sity’s experiences with you.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Sannier follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF ADRIAN SANNIER

Thank  you,  Chairman  Gordon,  Ranking  Member  Hall,  and  other  Members  of  the
Committee  for  giving  me  an  opportunity  to  describe  for  you  Arizona  State  Univer-
sity’s use of technology to reduce the incidence of copyright-infringing filesharing on
its campus networks.

As  one  of  the  Nation’s  largest  universities,  with  over  65,000  students  attending
its four campuses in the metropolitan Phoenix area, ASU provides its students, fac-
ulty  and  staff  with  an  extensive  and  evolving  array  of  computing  and  communica-
tions  services.  These  services  have  become  a  core  enabler  of  the  University’s  aca-
demic and research missions.

To govern the legitimate use of these services, ASU developed an Acceptable Use
Policy for its computing and communication services that expressly forbids their use
to transfer or exchange files when that transfer or exchange would infringe on copy-
right.  Users  of  the  University’s  computing  and  communication  services  must  elec-
tronically  agree  to  this  policy  as  a  condition  of  connection.  The  policy  explicitly  for-
bids  the  use  of  university  communications  or  computing  infrastructure  for  any  un-
lawful communications, including ‘‘threats of violence, obscenity, child pornography,
copyright infringement and harassing communications.’’

I am pleased to report that, despite some news reports to the contrary in the pop-
ular  press,  ASU  has  a  relatively  low  rate  of  complaint  about  the  illegitimate  use
of  its  network  from  copyright  holders  such  as  the  RIAA.  ASU’s  complaint  rate,
which  is  the  number  of  individuals  alleged  to  have  distributed  copyrighted  content

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

per thousand students, was only 0.52 percent, the lowest among the 25 institutions
for which the RIAA released data this past Spring.

In  a  recent  letter  to  University  Presidents  around  the  Nation,  the  RIAA  outlined
a  set  of  four  best  practices  that  they  recommend  universities  employ  to  prevent  or
reduce  student  exposure  to  lawsuits  and/or  Digital  Millennium  Copyright  Act  no-
tices.  ASU  was  an  early  adopter  of  each  of  these  best  practices,  and  they  are  the
cornerstones of ASU’s successful containment efforts.

The  first  recommended  practice  is  to  educate  students  about  the  do’s  and  don’ts
of  downloading  and  copying  music  and  other  copyrighted  works.  ASU  incorporates
these topics as part of our new student orientations, our residence hall orientations
and our twice yearly information security week orientations.

The  second  recommended  practice  is  to  offer  students  a  legitimate  online  service,
one that provides an inexpensive alternative to illegal filesharing. Beginning in July
of 2005, ASU was an early adopter of one such service, a digital entertainment net-
work designed specifically for college students known as Ruckus. ASU’s subscription
provides its students with downloadable access to 2.75 million songs, full-length fea-
ture  films,  short-form  video,  sports  clips,  and  music  videos,  as  well  as  access  to  a
social network site focused on the network.

The  third  recommended  practice  is  to  take  appropriate  disciplinary  action  when
students  are  found  to  be  engaging  in  infringing  conduct  online.  Under  the  terms  of
ASU’s Acceptable Use Policy,

upon  receiving  notice  of  a  violation,  ASU  may  temporarily  suspend  a  user’s
privileges or move or delete the allegedly offending material pending further pro-
ceedings.  A  person  accused  of  a  violation  is  notified  of  the  charge  and  has  an
opportunity to respond before ASU imposes a permanent sanction.

In addition to sanctions available under applicable law and ASU and regents’ poli-
cies, ASU may impose a temporary or permanent reduction or elimination of access
privileges  to  computing  and  communication  accounts,  networks,  ASU-administered
computing rooms, and other services or facilities.

The RIAA’s final recommendation encourages universities to implement a network
technical solution to restrict, filter, or curtail peer-to-peer filesharing. Any technical
solution must balance the rights of copyright holders with the legitimate uses of the
university’s  network  and  its  users’  expectations  of  privacy  and  academic  freedom.
Beginning  in  December  of  2000,  ASU’s  first  attempt  at  a  solution  was  a  network
monitoring  solution  from  Packeteer.  ASU  used  the  Packeteer  product  to  monitor
network data streams and use the protocol information contained in the streams to
prioritize  traffic.  This  allowed  ASU  the  amount  of  university  bandwidth  devoted  to
peer-to-peer traffic to be strictly limited. Over a five year period, ASU invested more
than  $250,000  in  the  installation  and  maintenance  of  this  solution,  which  was  pur-
chased  and  maintained  solely  for  its  role  in  protecting  the  interests  of  copyright
holders.  In  2006,  as  the  legitimate  traffic  volumes  continued  to  increase,  requiring
a  concomitant  increase  in  investment  in  Packeteer,  ASU  began  to  look  for  a  dif-
ferent solution.

After  evaluating  several  different  products  and  approaches,  we  have  finally  set-
tled on Audible Magic’s CopySense Network Appliance. The CopySense product does
not  disable  peer-to-peer  networking  services  or  restrict  the  bandwidth  available  to
them.  Instead,  the  CopySense  Appliance  treats  copyrighted  material  as  if  it  were  a
computer virus on a P2P network. It works by blocking the exchange of copyrighted
content while allowing legitimate files to transfer unobstructed. While our technical
team  was  skeptical  of  the  approach  at  first,  our  initial  tests  convinced  us  that  the
CopySense approach would provide us with a viable solution.

We installed the CopySense in spring semester without fanfare. It was configured
to  reject  any  traffic  identified  as  registered  commercial  music,  likely  commercial
music, likely commercial film and TV, or likely commercial software. It began reject-
ing  about  five  percent  of  the  overall  network  bandwidth  immediately,  identifying
that traffic as the exchange of copyrighted material. Despite the interruption in net-
work  transmission,  there  was  no  noticeable  increase  in  calls  to  our  help  desk,  and
we  received  no  complaints  about  network  performance  for  legitimate  purposes  at-
tributable to the CopySense product.

Overall I would classify our adoption of CopySense as one of the easiest technical
adoptions we have undertaken and that it has thus far caused very little disruption
in our community.

The list price for the CopySense product at ASU’s scale is just over $200,000, but
ASU expects its costs this year, as a Pioneer Reference Account, to be closer to one-
half that price.

While  we  at  ASU  are  pleased  with  our  new  technical  solution,  we  remain  con-
cerned  about  the  potential  for  an  ongoing  ‘‘arms  races.’’  Peer-to-peer  services  have

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

evolved to defeat effective counter-measures before and it would be foolhardy to be-
lieve  that  no  further  evolution  is  possible.  As  long  as  this  ‘‘arms  race’’  continues,
universities will continue to be called upon to spend scarce resources procuring and
deploying  the  latest  technical  counter-measures  and  expending  time  and  energy  in
the protection of copyright at the expense of the value-added application of emerging
technologies to the core missions of the institution.

We therefore applaud the progress that Apple and others have made in developing
new  and  more  effective  business  models  for  the  consumer  friendly  distribution  of
electronic  content  and  look  forward  to  the  day  that  these  improved  services  make
copyright-infringing  file  exchange  unattractive  to  all  but  the  fringes  of  our  commu-
nity.

Thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  share  Arizona  State  University’s  experi-

ence with you.

BIOGRAPHY FOR ADRIAN SANNIER

Dr. Adrian Sannier was recently named Vice President and University Technology
Officer  at  Arizona  State  University.  The  former  Stanley  Professor  of  Interdiscipli-
nary Engineering at Iowa State University’s Department of Industrial and Manufac-
turing Systems Engineering, Sannier brings with him 17 years of experience in both
the  public  and  private  sectors.  At  Iowa  State,  Sannier  was  one  of  the  founders  of
the  Human  Computer  Interaction  program  and,  in  addition  to  research  and  teach-
ing,  was  Associate  Director  of  ISU’s  Virtual  Reality  Applications  Center.  Research
at VRAC focuses on the applications of immersive visualization and next generation
human/computer interfaces to challenges in science, technology and the humanities.
Prior  to  joining  the  Iowa  State  University  faculty  in  2001,  Sannier  was  Vice  Presi-
dent and General Manager of Engineering Animation, Inc., a leading provider of 3D
computer  graphics  software.  Sannier  led  a  group  of  200  programmers  and  artists,
who  created  products  for  a  diverse  group  of  companies,  from  Mattel  and  Disney  to
Ford and General Motors.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you, and Mr. Ikezoye.
STATEMENT OF MR. VANCE IKEZOYE, PRESIDENT AND CEO,

AUDIBLE MAGIC CORPORATION

Mr.  IKEZOYE.  Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Gordon,  Ranking  Mem-
ber  Hall,  and  distinguished  Members  of  the  Committee.  My  name
is  Vance  Ikezoye,  and  I  am  President  and  CEO  of  Audible  Magic
Corporation. Thank you for your invitation to appear today.

By way of background, Audible Magic provides solutions to iden-
tify  and  manage  electronic  media,  including  preventing  its  piracy.
My testimony here today is intended to provide an overview of the
technological aspects of this issue, not to advocate a specific public
policy position.

Audible  Magic  has  developed  a  technical  solution  called  the
CopySense Appliance. Our product provides universities the ability
to automate the education process, and enforce network use policies
related  to  copyright,  while  protecting  students’  privacy  and  aca-
demic access to technology.

We  introduced  this  solution  in  late  2003,  and  to  date  we  have
over  80  customers  worldwide.  We  have  over  70  higher  education
customers  that  range  in  size  from  as  few  as  150  students  to  large
public universities. Our experience has shown that the use of tech-
nology such as CopySense has significantly reduced piracy on cam-
puses. On one college campus, we saw within one month an 80 per-
cent decrease in total network traffic, a 71 percent decrease in the
number  of  users  of  filesharing  applications,  and  finally,  the
filesharing traffic itself dropped from 20 gigabytes per day to effec-
tively zero in less than one week.

CopySense  Appliance  was  designed  to  intelligently  detect  and
manage copyrighted content transfers over public filesharing appli-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

cations  like  BitTorrent  and  Gnutella.  Using  our  copyright  identi-
fication  technology,  the  system  matches  unknown  files  transferred
over  known  public  peer-to-peer  filesharing  applications  to  a  data-
base  of  copyrighted  materials  that  have  been  registered  by  the
copyright owners.

Our  design  philosophy  is  based  upon  the  belief  that  peer-to-peer
technology  is  not  the  problem.  Peer-to-peer  filesharing  networks
are  an  efficient  means  to  distribute  legitimate  materials  such  as
Linux software or even promote local unsigned artist’s music. How-
ever,  it  is  the  unauthorized  transfers  of  copyrighted  works,  whose
owners do not want their works copied, that is the problem.

Our product allows the technology to work for everyone. The sys-
tem  can  be  used  to  allow  content  owners,  such  as  a  local  garage
band,  to  designate  their  content  to  be  freely  distributed,  while  a
major  label  could  designate  their  content  to  be  blocked  from  dis-
tribution.  Our  product  ranges  in  price  from  $5,000  on  a  small  net-
work to about $100,000 for a larger university network, depending
on the bandwidth managed.

I  would  like  to  highlight  for  the  Committee  the  new  capabilities
introduced this year, which are specifically designed to support uni-
versities  in  their  mission  to  educate  students.  The  CopySense  sys-
tem provides universities the ability to influence student behaviors
through  a  graduated  series  of  student  communication  and  sanc-
tions.  The  CopySense  system  can  detect  student  violations  of  the
university’s  network  policies,  which  can  include  using  peer-to-peer
applications to download copyrighted music or movies.

Upon  detection  of  these  violations,  the  system  will  communicate
with  the  student  by  automatically  redirecting  the  student’s  Inter-
net  browser  to  a  university-maintained  website.  This  website  can
be  used  to  educate  the  student  on  their  violation  and  the  reasons
why  their  behavior  was  inappropriate.  These  pages  could  even  be
used to administer a copyright lesson and test. Because the system
triggers at the time of the violation, the system is able to leverage
the  teachable  moment  by  immediately  providing  feedback  to  the
student.

The  system  possesses  a  configurable  point  system  that  provides
an escalation in notifications or sanctions. The system could be con-
figured  to  direct  communications  privately  to  the  student  violating
the  school  policy.  Any  other  information  or  reports  could  be  re-
stricted  from  access  by  others.  In  this  way  the  system  can  comply
with most universities’ privacy policies.

I  would  like  to  point  out  that  no  technology  is  or  will  ever  be  a
100  percent  effective  solution,  no  matter  what  the  context.  But  I
will  also  propose  that  a  solution  does  not  have  to  be  100  percent
to be effective and to make a difference on campuses.

One issue we hear from larger universities is a concern that our
technology  cannot  handle  their  high  bandwidth  networks.  First,
our  technical  system  is  not  an  inline  device.  If  an  inline  device  is
not  fast  enough,  or  even  worse  fails,  it  can  slow  down  or  stop  net-
work traffic. The CopySense Appliance performs its matching activ-
ity in parallel with a real-time network traffic flow. The actual ex-
perience  of  our  customers  has  been  that  the  CopySense  Appliance
has no adverse impact on network performance.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

Secondly, we often get questions about our effectiveness; how can
we  match  and  identify  files  quickly  enough  to  stop  the  trans-
missions  of  offending  files  when  the  campus  networks  are  so  fast?
We  have  designed  a  very  sophisticated  solution  to  these  problems.
Let me briefly explain both the concern and how we handle it.

Files  transferred  over  networks  are  broken  up  into  discreet
chunks referred to as packets. In order to make a match, a portion
of the file will need to be reassembled and a number of packets col-
lected.  At  that  point  we  can  perform  the  match  using  our
fingerprinting technology.

You  might  be  thinking,  this  must  take  a  long  time,  and  so  on
high speed networks the system won’t ever match a file before the
offending file transfer has already occurred. Our technical approach
isolates  this  problem  to  only  the  first  time  we  see  the  file  being
transferred. The first time we encounter a file we have never seen
before, we must go through the process of using our fingerprinting
technology.  However,  once  this  occurs,  we  can  associate  the  file
with an identifier, which is like an ID number. This ID number can
be read from the data transmission very quickly and in more than
enough time to take action.

Can  technology  solve  the  problem  of  piracy  of  copyrighted  works
in  every  instance?  Can  technology  clear  all  university  and  college
campuses of illegal filesharing? Technology will never be the entire
solution. Technology is just one of the essential tools to combat pi-
racy  on  campuses  and  as  the  title  of  this  hearing  indicates  tech-
nology  can  reduce  the  number  of  violations  and  play  a  major  role
in supporting universities’ and colleges’ efforts to address this most
important issue.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ikezoye follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF VANCE IKEZOYE

Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Gordon,  Ranking  Member  Hall,  and  distinguished
Members  of  the  Committee.  My  name  is  Vance  Ikezoye  and  I  am  President  and
CEO  of  Audible  Magic  Corporation.  Thank  you  for  your  invitation  to  appear  today
to  discuss  the  important  issue  of  using  technology  to  reduce  digital  copyright  viola-
tions on university and college campuses.

By  way  of  background,  I  am  a  co-founder  of  Audible  Magic.  I  have  a  Bachelor’s
degree in Engineering from the University of California, Berkeley and a MBA from
the  University  of  Pennsylvania,  Wharton  School.  My  work  experience  includes  13
years  at  Hewlett-Packard.  Audible  Magic  was  founded  in  1999  and  is  based  in  Los
Gatos,  California.  We  provide  technologies,  services,  and  easy-to-use  solutions  to
identify  and  manage  electronic  media,  including  preventing  its  piracy.  Our  cus-
tomers  include  legitimate  peer-to-peer  networks  such  as  iMesh  and  Kazaa,  and
video sharing and social community sites like MySpace and Microsoft Soapbox. Art-
ists, publishers and content owners desiring to protect or manage their copyrighted
music,  video  or  software  register  in  Audible  Magic’s  continually  updated  database.
The  electronic  fingerprint  and  ownership  information  database  currently  exceeds
five  million  works  and  is  one  of  the  largest  collections  of  its  kind  in  the  world.  My
testimony here today is intended to provide an overview of the technological aspects
of this issue, not to advocate a specific public policy position.

Audible Magic has developed a technical solution called the CopySense Appliance.
Our product provides universities the ability to automate the education process, en-
force  network-use  policies  related  to  copyright,  while  protecting  students’  privacy
and academic access to technology.
Technology’s Effectiveness on Campuses

We  introduced  this  solution  in  late  2003  and  to  date  have  over  80  customers
worldwide including about 70 university and college customers. Our university cus-
tomers  span  all  corners  of  the  United  States  and  range  in  size  from  as  few  as  150
students  to  large  public  universities.  In  addition,  we  hope  to  soon  have  one  of  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

highest  enrollment  universities  in  the  United  States  as  a  customer.  Both  private
and  public  institutions  use  the  CopySense  Appliance  as  a  solution  to  illegal  peer-
to-peer  filesharing  on  campus.  Our  experience  in  over  70  universities  and  colleges
has shown that use of technology such as CopySense has significantly reduced piracy
on  campuses.  On  one  college  campus,  we  saw  within  one  month  an  80  percent  de-
crease in total network traffic, a 71 percent decrease in the number of users of peer-
to-peer  filesharing  applications,  and  finally  the  peer-to-peer  filesharing  traffic
dropped from 20 GB per day to effectively zero in less than one week.

The  CopySense  Appliance  was  designed  to  intelligently  detect  and  manage  copy-
righted  content  transfers  over  networks  by  individuals  using  popular  public
filesharing applications like BitTorrent and Gnutella. Since 2003, we have continued
to  improve  our  product  and  have  focused  on  developing  features  to  support  the
needs  of  universities  and  other  educational  institutions.  Our  solution  is  a  turnkey,
hardware  product  that  is  easily  installed  on  the  network  of  a  university  and  pro-
vides automated detection and enforcement of copyright policies that are defined by
the university administration. I will talk later about the new features we have inte-
grated which provide tools to support the education of students in this area of copy-
right.

Using  our  copyright  identification  technology,  the  system  matches  unknown  files
transferred over known public peer-to-peer filesharing applications to a database of
copyrighted  materials  that  have  been  registered  by  the  copyright  owners.  Since  we
focus on known public peer-to-peer filesharing applications, private communications
such as e-mail pass by unaffected.

Our design philosophy is based upon the belief that peer-to-peer filesharing tech-
nology  is  not  the  problem.  In  fact,  peer-to-peer  technology  is  powerful  and  will  be
utilized  increasingly  in  mainstream  applications  in  the  future.  Peer-to-peer
filesharing networks themselves are an efficient means to distribute legitimate ma-
terials  such  as  Linux  software  or  even  promote  local  unsigned  artists’  music.  How-
ever,  it  is  the  unauthorized  transfers  of  copyrighted  works,  whose  owners  do  not
want their works copied that is the problem.

Our  product  allows  the  technology  to  work  for  everyone.  The  system  can  be  used
to  allow  content  owners,  such  as  a  local  garage  band,  to  designate  their  content  to
be freely distributed, while a major label or movie studio could designate their con-
tent  to  be  blocked  from  distribution.  All  other  content  passes  through  unimpeded
without affecting the network’s performance or reliability.

Our  product  ranges  in  price  from  $5,000,  on  a  small  network,  to  $100,000  for  a
large  university  network,  depending  on  the  network  bandwidth  managed.  Our  cus-
tomers  have  found  that  we  can  provide  a  cost-effective  solution  that  can  save  them
significant  costs  of  bandwidth  while  providing  better  service  to  their  users.  As  an
example,  one  of  our  customers  is  a  small  technical  high  school,  which  uses  a  DSL
connection,  like  many  people  have  in  their  homes,  and  it  found  our  product  to  dra-
matically improve its users’ satisfaction in a cost-effective manner.
New Tools to Support Education of Students

I would like to highlight for the Committee the new capabilities of the CopySense
Appliance, introduced this year, which are specially designed to support universities
in  their  mission  to  educate  students.  The  CopySense  system  provides  universities
the  ability  to  influence  student  behaviors  through  a  graduated  series  of  student
communications  and  sanctions.  The  CopySense  system  can  detect  students’  viola-
tions of the university’s network policies and apply automated sanctions to the viola-
tors,  which  are  defined  by  the  university  administration.  The  university  can  con-
figure  the  product  to  detect  specific  behavioral  violations,  which  can  include  using
peer-to-peer applications to download copyrighted music or movies.

Upon detection of these violations, the system will communicate with the student
by  automatically  redirecting  the  student’s  Internet  browser  to  a  website  which  the
university maintains. This website can be used to educate the student on their vio-
lation  and  the  reasons  why  their  behavior  was  inappropriate—these  pages  could
even be used to administer a web-based copyright lesson and test. Because the sys-
tem  triggers  at  the  time  of  the  violation,  the  system  is  able  to  leverage  the  ‘teach-
able moment’ by immediately providing feedback to the student.

The  system  possesses  a  configurable  point  system  that  provides  an  escalation  in
the  notifications  or  sanctions.  As  an  example,  if  a  student  was  a  serious  repeat  of-
fender, the system could block the student’s web, e-mail, or Internet access for pre-
set periods of time.

The system could be configured to direct communications privately to the student
violating the school policy. Any other information or reports could be restricted from
access  by  others  unless  configured  and  specified  by  the  University.  In  this  way  the
system can comply with most universities’ privacy policies.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Concerns About Technical Effectiveness

25

Before  I  get  into  specific  issues  that  are  commonly  brought  up  about  network
technologies,  I  would  like  to  point  out  that  no  technology  is  or  will  ever  be  a  100
percent  effective  solution  no  matter  what  the  context.  But  I  will  also  propose  that
a solution does not have to be 100 percent to be effective and make a difference on
campuses.

Our design principle is that the system should not be over-reaching. Adopting this
design  principle,  by  definition,  says  that  our  system  will  not  be  a  100  percent  solu-
tion.  As  an  example,  we  may  not  be  able  to  identify  or  even  detect  100  percent  of
the  filesharing  traffic  on  the  network.  In  order  to  detect  100  percent  of  the  traffic,
our  system  would  have  to  be  installed  on  every  segment  and  device  on  the  net-
work—and this could dramatically increase costs. However, as I suggest, if we focus
on feedback in an effort to educate students, we might begin to achieve the end re-
sult of correcting improper behaviors.

A  critical  concern  of  any  technology  relates  to  privacy.  We  have  designed  the
CopySense  system  so  that  it  can  be  configured  to  restrict  access  to  information  in
a  manner  consistent  with  a  university’s  privacy  policy.  If  so  configured,  the  univer-
sity  could  treat  this  system  as  a  black  box  as  they  do  their  other  network  equip-
ment.  This  black  box  operates  automatically  without  access  by  unauthorized  per-
sonnel.  In  this  way,  the  system’s  educational  features  could  be  configured  so  that
only the student is notified of detection of their inappropriate behavior.

The second aspect of the system design with respect to privacy is that the system
matches only copyrighted items in a database that are transferred over known pub-
lic  filesharing  networks.  All  other  communications  such  as  e-mail  and  web  traffic
go by unimpeded and without inspection. Our product operates in a manner similar
to  anti-virus  products  or  even  spam  filters.  Only  our  registry  contains  fingerprints
of copyright works rather than fingerprints of viruses or spam.

From  one  perspective,  our  product  is  much  less  invasive  from  a  privacy  point  of
view  than  spam-filtering  technology.  Our  product  only  detects  the  transfer  of  copy-
righted works over public filesharing networks. Remember that these networks con-
nect  millions  of  anonymous  strangers  who  are  revealing  the  contents  of  their  com-
puters’ hard drives; it is a question if there is even an expectation of privacy under
these circumstances. Contrast that with spam-filtering technologies, which scan and
intercept private e-mail communications between known individuals.

One issue we hear from larger universities is the concern that our technology can-
not  handle  the  high-bandwidth  speeds  that  they  have  deployed  on  their  campuses.
First, from a network administrative point of view, our system is not an in-line de-
vice.  In-line  devices  are  problematic  since  all  the  data  traffic  needs  to  go  through
them. If the device is not fast enough or even worse, fails, it can slow down or stop
network  traffic.  As  a  device  that  is  not  in-line,  the  CopySense  appliance  operates
on  the  sidelines  and  performs  its  matching  activity  in  parallel  with  the  real  time
network  traffic  flow.  The  actual  experience  of  our  university  customers  has  been
that the CopySense appliance has no adverse impact on network performance.

Secondly,  we  often  get  questions  about  our  effectiveness—how  can  we  match  and
identify  files  quickly  enough  to  stop  the  transmissions  of  offending  files  when  the
campus networks are so fast? We have designed a very sophisticated solution to this
question. Let me briefly explain both the concern and how we handle it.

Files transferred over networks are broken up into discrete chunks referred to as
packets.  In  order  to  make  a  match  using  our  technology,  a  portion  of  the  file  will
need to be reassembled and a number of packets collected and buffered. Our system
in  the  course  of  its  operation  does  this  routinely.  Once  we  collect  and  reassemble
enough of the file, we can perform a match using our fingerprinting technology.

You  might  be  thinking,  ‘‘This  must  take  a  long  time  and  so  on  high-speed  net-
works  the  system  won’t  ever  match  a  file  before  the  offending  file  transfer  has  al-
ready occurred.’’ Our technical approach isolates this problem to only the first time
we see the file being transferred.

The first time our product comes across a file we have never seen before, we must
go  through  the  process  of  collecting  and  analyzing  the  file  using  our  fingerprinting
technology.  As  one  might  guess,  on  high-speed  networks  it  may  happen  too  fast  for
our technology. However, after this initial experience with the file, we can associate
the identity of the file with an identifier, which is like an ID number for files shared
over  these  networks.  This  ID  number  can  be  read  from  the  data  transmission  very
quickly—in more than enough time to take action. We maintain a local list of these
identifiers  in  every  system  installed.  Thus  in  most  cases,  this  list  can  be  used  to
accurately  match  files  transferred  even  over  high-speed  networks  in  plenty  of  time
to react.

I  also  want  to  point  out  that  our  CopySense  content  identification  solution  has
become  the  industry  standard,  not  only  in  the  university  network  community,  but

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

in  other  technology  settings,  including  legal  peer-to-peer  systems  and  user-gen-
erated content websites like MySpace, GoFish, and others. One of the many reasons
why our technology has been adopted is because it is highly accurate.

A  general  concern  raised  about  any  network  traffic  analysis  is  the  issue  of
encrypted filesharing networks. Encryption is a technique that is commonly used in
electronic  communications  to  scramble  what  would  otherwise  be  an  open,  readable
message. Encryption is most commonly used in financial transactions over the Inter-
net,  such  as  a  credit  card  transaction,  in  order  to  protect  the  privacy  and  security
of these transactions.

Peer-to-peer filesharing applications have adopted encryption, however, not to pro-
tect  the  privacy  of  the  users,  but  to  inhibit  network  management  of  peer-to-peer
traffic  and  to  prevent  detection  of  illegal  transfers  of  copyrighted-content  files.  The
reality  is  that  encryption  technology  can  prevent  the  detection  of  content  transfers
at  the  file  level  such  as  that  performed  by  our  product.  There  are  popular
filesharing  applications  that  use  various  levels  of  encryption  today.  However,  even
peer-to-peer filesharing applications that encrypt data often have some unique char-
acteristics  that  identify  the  transfers.  Our  product  deals  with  this  by  providing  the
university  the  ability  to  detect  and  block  the  use  of  encrypted  peer-to-peer
filesharing  applications.  This  in  combination  with  the  educational  features  of  the
system  is  intended  to  discourage  use  of  encrypted  filesharing  applications  and  mi-
grate users back to unencrypted filesharing applications.

The term ‘‘darknet’’ generally refers to filesharing application networks that limit
themselves  to  a  local  area  such  as  a  floor  within  a  dorm.  These  darknets  provide
students a mechanism for transferring copyrighted files without exposing their ille-
gal conduct to the university network systems or to the ‘‘light’’ of the outside world.
The strategy to address this usage is to understand that detecting and stopping all
darknet traffic is not the primary goal. The goal is to change the students’ behavior.
Therefore  even  statistical  detection,  perhaps  by  periodically  deploying  systems
around the campus network, like a radar speed detection trailer that is moved from
neighborhood  to  neighborhood,  can  be  an  effective  means  to  influence  students’  be-
havior.

Can  technology  solve  the  problem  of  piracy  of  copyrighted  works  in  every  in-
stance?  Can  technology  clear  all  university  and  college  campuses  of  illegal  peer-to-
peer filesharing? Technology will never be the entire solution. Technology is just one
of the essential tools to combat piracy on campuses, and as the title of this hearing
indicates,  technology  CAN  reduce  the  number  of  violations  and  play  a  major  role
in supporting universities’ and colleges’ efforts to address this most important issue.
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  and  I  will  be  happy  to

answer any questions you may have.

BIOGRAPHY FOR VANCE IKEZOYE

Vance Ikezoye co-founded Audible Magic in 1999. He has over twenty years of ex-
perience  in  high  technology  sales,  marketing,  and  technical  support  including  thir-
teen  years  at  Hewlett-Packard  Company.  At  HP  he  was  involved  in  both  the  com-
puter systems and medical products businesses. After HP, Ikezoye joined Trade Re-
porting  and  Data  Exchange  Incorporated,  a  VC-funded  information  company  start-
up,  where  he  served  for  five  years  in  the  positions  of  Vice  President  of  Sales,  Mar-
keting,  International,  and  Business  Development.  During  that  time,  he  developed
distribution  channels  in  the  U.S.,  Europe,  South  America,  and  Asia.  Ikezoye  holds
a  Bachelor’s  degree  in  Engineering  from  U.C.  Berkeley  and  an  MBA  from  the  Uni-
versity of Pennsylvania, Wharton School.

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you,  and  Dean  Elzy,  you  are  recog-

nized for five minutes.
STATEMENT  OF  MS.  CHERYL  ASPER  ELZY,  DEAN  OF  UNIVER-
SITY  LIBRARIES  AND  FEDERAL  COPYRIGHT  AGENT,  ILLI-
NOIS STATE UNIVERSITY
Ms. ELZY. Chairman Gordon, Congressman Hall, and Members of
the  Committee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  today  to  share  with
you about Illinois State University’s Digital Citizen Project.

Illinois State University is a typical university campus of 20,000
students, great faculty, and great kids. They are not inherently bad
people.  They  are  like  college  students  everywhere,  sharing  movies,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

music,  TV  shows,  games,  and  software,  a  good  deal  of  it  without
copyright permission. Our campus is no different.

I  described  the  Digital  Citizen  Project  in  detail  in  my  first  Con-
gressional  testimony  before  the  House  Subcommittee  on  21st  Cen-
tury Competitiveness last fall, but briefly, this project started back
in  2005,  when  we  received  nearly  500  copyright  violation  notices.
The  pivotal  moment  for  me  came  personally,  though,  when  we  re-
ceived  four  subpoenas  for  students  who  were  going  to  be  sued.  I
think I felt the situation more deeply because I, myself, have a son
at  Illinois  State.  What  would  I  think  or  how  would  I  react  if  this
was my child being sued? To tell the truth, I would be raising hell
with the university for not protecting my son. Why did they let him
do this? Why wasn’t someone watching?

But  what  could  ISU  do?  The  simple  answer  seemed  to  be  why
don’t  we  go  ask  them  what  they  want,  them  in  this  case  was  the
RIAA. So we did. Though no institution had actually come to them
before,  the  good  news  is  they  were  willing  to  talk,  and  that  28
months ago marked the beginning of our project.

From the first the project leaders felt it was crucial to work with
everyone,  literally  everyone  in  solving  this  issue.  We  have  worked
closely  with  RIAA  and  MPAA  as  our  main  long-term  project  advi-
sors and supporters. We are also partnering with EDUCAUSE and
the  American  Council  on  Education,  and  we  have  talked  to  the
American  Library  Association  and  the  Association  of  Public  Tele-
vision Stations. From the monitoring and enforcement industry we
have had Packeteer on campus for a long time, and we have talked
to  or  worked  directly  with  Audible  Magic,  Red  Lambda,  enterasys,
E–Telemetry,  Allot,  SafeMedia,  and  others.  We  are  investigating
still more like the Bradford Networks. Legal digital media services
we  have  met  with  include  Cdigix,  Ruckus,  Apple,  Napster,  Pass
Along, and XM Satellite Radio. New ones surface almost every day.
We  came  to  Capitol  Hill  on  five  occasions  and  met  with  the  staffs
of  dozens  of  Congressmen,  Senators,  and  committees,  both  Demo-
cratic  and  Republican.  We  have  gone  to  almost  a  dozen  agencies
looking  for  funding,  and  we  are  still  looking.  We  have  even  talked
at some length with the Electronic Freedom Foundation. They gave
us  what  we  considered  high  praise  when  they  said,  after  a  long
conference  call,  that  our  project  sounded  ‘‘as  good  as  they  could
hope for.’’

Digital  Citizen  is  designed  to  incorporate  education,  monitoring,
legal  digital  media  services,  fair  use  and  easier  copyright  permis-
sions, K–12 education and ethics training and rewards for good dig-
ital citizenship. Overall, the long-term goal of the project is to pro-
vide a consumer-reports-like study, if you will, on the services and
systems  that  are  out  there  or  just  coming  on  the  scene  so  higher
ed will be able to make informed, fiscally-responsible decisions.

As  to  funding,  well,  funding  is  hard  to  find.  We  were  fortunate
to  receive  grants  from  several  entertainment  companies  and  asso-
ciations,  but  new  and  different  approaches  like  ours  to  rapidly-
evolving challenges like campus piracy, don’t fit neatly into existing
grant categories. It is also hard to find funding because many find
it  easier  to  talk  about  the  symptom,  downloading,  than  to  fix  the
root problem, which is changing behaviors and culture.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

Our  project  timelines  were  originally  based  on  a  three-year
project; however, it has taken us two years to get sufficient funding
to  get  started.  We  have  only  now  begun  to  get  to  the  heart  of  the
research and analysis. Technically, our project has been funded for
18 months, and the clock began five months ago. Without new dol-
lars  the  project  will  end  July  1  next  year.  Our  early  research  and
data  so  far  confirmed  many  expected  outcomes  and  revealed  some
surprises.  Please  ask  me  about  those  later  if  you  would  like  to
know more.

If  decision-makers  from  other  campuses  came  to  us  today,  and
they have already started, to find out what to do, we wouldn’t have
an  answer.  It  is  too  early.  The  monitoring  technologies  don’t  seem
to  be  fully  ready  to  do  what  Congress  or  the  entertainment  indus-
try  wants  yet.  A  consumer  study  is  desperately  needed  so  side-by-
side  comparisons,  benefits,  and  features  can  be  determined.  Both
monitoring  systems  and  legal  digital  media  services  need  to  be
evaluated, and this all needs to happen now. A consumer study can
help the entertainment industry as well by providing reliable, test-
ed  feedback.  But  technology  is  not  the  answer.  The  911  Commis-
sion Report says that ‘‘Americans’ love affair with technology leads
them  to  also  regard  it  as  the  solution,  but  technology  produces  its
best  results  when  an  organization  has  the  doctrine,  structure,  and
incentives to exploit it.’’

Doctrines,  structure,  and  incentives.  That  is  what  ISU  has  put
together in the Digital Citizen Project. Your help is essential in di-
recting  the  conversations  toward  improvements  and  testing  of
emerging technologies, and support for the comprehensive efforts of
the  Digital  Citizen  Project  and  other  comprehensive  programs  like
ours, that will be invaluable.

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Asper Elzy follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHERYL ASPER ELZY

Chairman Gordon, Congressman Hall, and Members of the Committee:

Good  afternoon.  I  am  Cheryl  Elzy,  Illinois  State  University’s  Dean  of  University
Libraries  and  our  designated  agent  for  notification  of  claims  of  infringement  under
Section  512(c)  of  the  Digital  Millennium  Copyright  Act  (DMCA).  In  other  words,  I
am  the  DMCA  agent  on  campus.  Thank  you  for  the  invitation  to  appear  today  to
share with you Illinois State University’s plans to address peer-to-peer downloading
on  our  campus.  The  overall  project  has  come  to  be  known  as  the  Digital  Citizen
Project. In the hearing today I will share with you ISU’s story of how this program
came to be, what we’ve learned, and where we’re going.

But first, I’d like to thank the Committee for its word choices in titling this hear-
ing.  ‘‘Reducing’’  violations  is  realistically  probably  as  much  as  any  of  us  can  hope
for  whether  it’s  from  an  industry  perspective  or  a  technology  view  or  a  cultural
bias—at  least  at  this  time.  While  this  is  a  hearing  before  the  Science  and  Tech-
nology  Committee,  with  all  respect—technology  is  only  a  means  to  an  end  in  a
whole lot of ways. Illegal peer-to-peer downloading is NOT solely a technology prob-
lem.  It  doesn’t  have  a  ‘‘technology’’  solution  alone.  The  discussion  should  be  about
legal  access  to  materials  and  other  information  resources.  We  should  be  talking
about  connecting  users  with  the  right  tools.  An  added  focus  has  to  be  on  education
and  changing  behaviors.  How  we  do  that  is  what  the  Digital  Citizen  Project  has
been exploring for the past twenty eight months and will describe for you today.
ILLINOIS STATE UNIVERSITY AS AN INSTITUTION

By  way  of  background,  Illinois  State  University  is  an  institution  of  about  20,000
students with nearly 18,000 of those being undergraduates. The first public univer-
sity in Illinois, Illinois State University was founded in 1857 as a teacher education
institution,  a  tradition  still  very  much  in  evidence  today  as  Illinois  State  is  among

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

the  top  five  producers  of  classrooms  teachers  in  the  Nation  and  has  more  alumni
teaching in classrooms today than any other university in the country. Our institu-
tion  is  a  comprehensive  University  offering  more  than  160  major/minor  options  in
six colleges delivered by around 700 outstanding faculty. Students benefit from ‘‘the
small-school  feeling  they  get  from  this  large  university,  and  the  incredible  opportu-
nities they encounter.’’ (Yale Daily News Insider’s Guide to Colleges, 2000)

We  are  a  typical  campus:  great  students,  great  faculty,  never  enough  money  or
space or time. Like every other campus across the country, our students, our faculty
and  staff  are  not  inherently  bad  people.  They  don’t  carry  off  armloads  of  CDs  from
the  local  music  store.  They  aren’t  ripping  through  Blockbuster  with  dozens  of  mov-
ies  under  their  jackets.  But  studies  continue  to  show  that  college  students  every-
where share music, a good deal of it without copyright permission. Add to that mov-
ies,  videos,  and  television  programs.  And  games.  And  software.  Our  campus  is  no
different.

Technology today makes sharing movies and music easy. Everybody’s friends and
colleagues  download,  or  so  users  believe.  They  think  it’s  not  hurting  anyone  really.
It’s  anonymous,  quick,  direct,  and  easy.  There  is  no  one  easy  solution,  no  shrink-
wrap fix that will make the students stop or make this problem or the DMCA com-
plaints go away. We at ISU believe the solution to this overwhelming and all-perva-
sive problem lies in education coupled with enforcement of existing laws and direct
avenues  to  legal  ways  of  getting  the  tunes,  the  tracks,  the  games,  and  the  movies
that are an integral part of today’s student and faculty lives.

The scope of the problem is national. It’s worldwide. It’s not just higher education.
It’s  junior  high  and  high  schools.  Sometimes  even  grade  school,  as  early  as  third
grade  according  to  what  we’ve  finding.  My  purpose  here  today  is  not  to  talk  about
the global landscape or the national picture. I’m here to share what one typical uni-
versity with typical students is trying to do to address not just the symptom of the
problem—the illegal downloading of digital media, but its comprehensive root cause.
THE HISTORY OF THE DIGITAL CITIZEN PROJECT

I described the history, background, and varied parts of the Digital Citizen Project
in extensive detail in my first Congressional Testimony before the House Education
and  Workforce  Committee’s  Subcommittee  on  21st  Century  Competitiveness  in  a
hearing  entitled  ‘‘The  Internet  and  the  College  Campus:  How  the  Entertainment  In-
dustry  and  Higher  Education  are  Working  to  Combat  Illegal  Piracy’’  on  September
26,  2006. 
(http://republicans.edlabor.house.gov/archive/hearings/  109th/21st/
piracy092606/elzy.htm) I would be honored and pleased if you would check that tes-
timony if you need more information than is presented here.

To  describe  the  project  briefly,  though—during  the  winter  of  2005  we  at  ISU  be-
came progressively more dismayed as the number of copyright complaints began in-
creasing  dramatically.  In  2001,  2002,  and  2003  we  received  a  few  scattered  com-
plaints throughout the year, but nothing particularly overwhelming. By 2004 Illinois
State  was  seeing  a  little  more  DMCA  activity,  but  in  2005  everything  just  seemed
to explode across our screens. Sometimes there were days when we were getting 20
or 30 notices a day, several days a week, primarily from entertainment industry as-
sociations.  In  the  fiscal  year  ending  in  June  2005,  Illinois  State  University  had  re-
ceived  477  formal  DMCA  complaints  from  the  Business  Software  Alliance,  the  En-
tertainment  Software  Association,  Sony,  Fox,  NBC,  HBO,  MPAA,  and  RIAA.  The
problems  on  campus  were  stemming  from  activity  in  the  residence  halls,  Greek
houses,  other  places  on  campus,  and  dial-up  access.  Staff  time  to  manage  these  in-
creased  exponentially.  Our  student  judicial  office  saw  much  heavier  traffic  referred
to them for discipline. Follow-ups and tracking seemed to take forever.

Naturally we began asking questions among those working in the appropriate use
areas  on  campus.  Why  the  sudden  rise  in  numbers?  Were  our  students  doing  more
illegal  downloading  or  were  they  just  getting  caught?  Were  we  somehow  targets  of
new  enforcement  campaigns?  Why  the  rise  at  universities  when  the  problem  is  so
much  more  widespread?  What  was  all  this  costing  us?  How  much  costly  techno-
logical  bandwidth  was  this  taking  besides  the  obvious  investment  in  staff?  How
could we possibly be satisfied with simply reacting, instead of being proactive on the
part of our students?

The pivotal moment for me personally came when we received four subpoenas for
information  on  some  of  our  Illinois  State  University  students  who  were  going  to  be
sued in federal courts for copyright infringements. At that moment my campus was
faced with decisions with no options particularly attractive. Do we comply (as other
campuses  had)  or  do  we  fight  release  of  the  information  (as  still  other  campuses
had)?  Do  we  warn  the  students  about  the  subpoenas  or  do  we  stand  aside?  I  think
I felt this whole situation more deeply because I myself have a son attending Illinois
State.  What  would  I  think  or  how  would  I  react  if  this  was  my  child?  The  truth

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

is  I’d  be  raising  hell  with  the  University  for  not  protecting  my  son!  Why  did  they
let  him  do  this?  Why  did  they  make  it  possible  for  him  to  get  into  this  mess?  Why
didn’t they block this kind of thing? Why wasn’t someone watching?

The  university  complied  with  the  subpoenas  and  provided  the  information.  Then
we  stepped  back  to  think  and  to  plan.  What  could  we  do  to  protect  our  students
while  still  complying  with  the  law?  How  could  we  educate  and  direct  our  students?
What  could  we  do  to  police  ourselves?  The  rather  simple  solution  seemed  to  be,  lit-
erally  and  in  the  exact  words  I  used  back  in  February  two  years  ago,  ‘‘Why  don’t
we  go  ask  them  what  they  want  us  to  do?’’  ‘‘Them’’  in  this  case  was  the  Recording
Industry Association of America. So we did. Though no one, no institution had actu-
ally come to them before, the good news is that they were willing to talk. And that,
28 months ago, marked the beginning of our Digital Citizen Project.

One of our first steps was to find out what other institutions were doing to combat
illegal  downloading  and  reduce  DMCA  complaints  through  scholarly  literature,
through conferences, through the press. Today, over two years later, more and more
colleges  and  universities  are  taking  significant  steps  to  tackle  the 
illegal
downloading issues. But judging by what we could find in the professional literature
28  months  ago,  the  answer  then  appeared  to  be:  not  much.  We  knew  anecdotally
that some institutions were actually throwing the complaints away. A number of in-
stitutions  were  delivering  educational  or  public  service  campaigns,  often  with  a
unique  local  twist.  There  were  a  few  that  were  putting  up  a  legal  music  or  movie
service  or  two  and  hoping  students,  in  particular,  would  be  attracted  to  the  legal
approach.  A  few  other  universities  simply  shut  down  all  bandwidth  available  for
peer-to-peer  activities  of  any  kind,  legal  or  not.  Some  reported  limiting  the  amount
of  bandwidth  available  to  peer-to-peer  applications.  All  of  these  programs  reported
little or varying degrees of success. From our perspective, most universities and col-
leges seemed to be waiting for someone to prove to them that the problem was real
and needed attention. Others were waiting for ‘‘the’’ solution.
THE PROJECT DESIGN

Rather  than  confronting  campus  piracy  with  a  single  approach,  we  worked  with
RIAA and ultimately MPAA to develop a multi-faceted approach to combating piracy
on  campus.  Early  on  the  discussions  focused  on  three  things—monitoring  and  en-
forcement,  legal  services,  and  education—but  subtle  changes  began  to  emerge  very
quickly.  The  first  was  to  move  education  to  lead  the  list.  That  was  significant  to
us  as  educators.  A  critically  important  aspect  for  me  as  a  librarian  was  a  crystal
clear  definition  of  fair  use  of  media  in  the  classroom  along  with  easier  paths  for
copyright clearance of media we needed to use. Another addition to the program fo-
cused  on  K–12  education  and  ethics.  It  is  widely  accepted  that  downloading  behav-
iors  start  much  earlier  than  when  a  student  arrives  on  a  college  campus—and  in
fact student behaviors are learned in high school or before, at home from their par-
ents, at school, and at play. Finally, to attract students to a comprehensive program
of  legal,  ethical  online  behavior  we  wanted  to  offer  some  sort  of  rewards  for  good
digital citizenship.

Overall,  the  long-term  goal  of  ISU’s  Digital  Citizen  Project  is  to  create  a  nation-
ally recognized program that could be cost-effective, that is based on comparison and
research  of  the  products  currently  available,  and  that  is  replicable  on  other  college
campuses. We are far from there, but we’re laying a solid foundation. And we abso-
lutely  know  that  there  is  no  one-size-fits-all  institutional  solution.  Nor  is  there  a
one-size-fits-all  technology  solution.  Not  at  all.  But  if  a  central  place  for  education,
conversation,  trial,  and  admittedly  error  can  get  a  foothold,  then  all  of  higher  edu-
cation  benefits.  We  would  like  to  be  that  central  place  to  serve  as  a  resource  for
higher  education,  a  bridge  between  education  and  the  entertainment  community,  a
funnel for positive feedback and advice to vendors, and a repository for educational
materials  on  cyber-ethics,  legal  downloading,  and  system  or  software  implementa-
tion. We want to provide a ‘‘consumer report-like’’ study, if you will, on the services
and  systems  that  are  out  there  and  just  coming  on  the  scene  so  higher  ed  will  be
able  to  make  informed,  fiscally  responsible  decisions  on  what  to  do  on  each  of  the
4,000 campuses across the country.
THE PROJECT PARTICIPANTS AND CONTACTS

From  the  first  days  of  this  project  28  months  ago  the  project  leaders  felt  it  was
crucial  to  work  with  everyone—literally  everyone—in  solving  this  issue.  We  con-
tacted  associations.  We  talked  to  vendors.  We  went  to  conferences  to  make  other
contacts.  We  came  to  Capital  Hill  in  search  of  support.  We  have  talked  with  or
partnered  with  RIAA  and  MPAA  as  our  main  long-term  project  advisors  and  sup-
porters.  We  are  also  working  closely  with  EDUCAUSE  and  the  American  Council
on  Education,  and  we  have  talked  with  the  American  Library  Association  and  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

Association for Public Television Stations. From the monitoring and enforcement in-
dustry  we’ve  had  Packeteer  on  campus  for  a  long  time,  and  we  have  talked  to  or
worked with Audible Magic, Red Lambda, enterasys, e-Telemetry, Allot, SafeMedia,
and  others.  We’ve  investigated  still  more,  like  Branford  Networks.  Legal  digital
media  services  we’ve  met  with  include  Cdigix,  Ruckus,  Apple,  Napster,  Pass  Along,
and  XM  Satellite  Radio.  New  ones  surface  almost  every  day.  We  came  to  Capital
Hill  on  five  occasions  and  met  with  the  staffs  of  dozens  of  Congressmen,  Senators,
and  committees  both  Democratic  and  Republican.  We’ve  gone  to  almost  a  dozen
agencies looking for funding, and are still looking. We’ve even talked at some length
with  the  Electronic  Freedom  Foundation  (EFF).  They  gave  us  what  we  considered
high  praise  when  they  said,  after  a  long  conference  call,  that  our  project  sounded
‘‘as good as [they] could hope for.’’
DIGITAL CITIZEN PROJECT FUNDING

As  to  funding—the  biggest  financial  supporter  of  this  project  to  date  is  Illinois
State  University  itself.  The  University  has  contributed  staff  time  for  a  wide  range
of people working on the Digital Citizen Project from CIOs to network engineers to
researchers  and  staff,  salaries,  space,  equipment,  supplies,  and  more  with  an  esti-
mated value of over $450,000. Beyond that we’ve gotten formal research grants from
the  University,  federal  funds  in  the  form  of  a  $68,000  Library  Services  and  Tech-
nology Act (LSTA) grant through the Illinois State Library, and substantial support
through  the  entertainment  industry.  Specifically,  funding  has  come  to  the  project
from  Viacom,  Time/Warner,  NBC/Universal,  a  research  conglomerate  called
MovieLabs, RIAA, and MPAA. We are aggressively seeking public or higher ed fund-
ing to balance the support base of the project to avoid even the appearance of being
a ‘‘bought-and-paid-for study.’’ The data we produce and the findings we share must
be  real  and  must  be  defensible  academically.  We  must  remain  balanced,  unbiased,
and  neutral  in  order  to  work  productively  with  all  the  project  partners—some  of
whom  hate  each  other,  and  some  of  whom  are  suing  each  other.  Funding  is  hard
to  find  because  new  and  different  approaches—like  ours—to  rapidly  emerging  and
changing  challenges—like  campus  piracy—don’t  fit  neatly  into  existing  grant  cat-
egories.  It’s  also  hard  to  find  funding  because  most  find  it  easier  to  talk  about  the
symptoms (downloading) than to fix the root problems—changing behaviors and cul-
ture while adapting different business and marketing models. In a nutshell, we need
more funding and we need more time.
THE PROJECT TIMELINE

Regarding  time,  our  project  timelines  were  originally  based  on  a  three-year
project.  However,  it’s  taken  us  two  years  to  get  started.  We’ve  only  now  begun  to
get  to  the  heart  of  the  research  and  analysis.  Technically  and  specifically,  our
project  was  supported  under  our  current  research  agreement,  for  18  months.  The
clock began five months ago. Without new dollars, the project will end July 1, 2008.
To  date,  the  Digital  Citizen  Project  has  captured  network  data  using  Audible
Magic’s technology in August 2005, August 2006, and April 2007. Last summer, we
surveyed high school seniors coming to Illinois State about their downloading habits
and  preferences,  and  we’re  doing  that  again  starting  the  week  of  June  4.  We  have
completed  and  have  reports  on  a  number  of  focus  groups  organized  and  analyzed
by professors on our marketing faculty. We’ve just completed an extensive, in-depth
survey  of  campus 
faculty,  staff,  and  students  on  their  attitudes  toward
downloading—and  we’re  planning  two  more  studies  in  the  fall.  Perhaps  most  inter-
esting—we’re journaling the problems, issues, and surprises surrounding the imple-
mentation  of  the  project,  the  systems,  and  the  research.  And  if  anything  highlights
the changing landscape of this project, it is our experiences. For example—one firm
changed its business model five times in the last 28 months, moving from charging
our  campus  $40,000  for  its  service  to  being  free  and  directly  marketed  to  students.
Another  leader  went  out  of  the  downloading  business  all  together.  A  supplier  of
monitoring  systems  wanted  us  to  change  how  we  register  our  students  on  the  net-
work  rather  than  adapting  to  the  existing  environment.  We  discovered  in  working
with  another  vendor  that  to  get  the  data  we  wanted  with  one  company’s  network
monitoring  system,  required  not  a  single  box  but  multiple  ones—multiplying  the
projected expense beyond what any campus could afford. One system initially need-
ed  another  to  work,  so  a  campus  would  have  to  buy  two  systems—not  one—to  be
effective.  Misunderstandings  on  conference  calls  and  e-mails  occurred  regularly.  A
classic  misunderstanding  occurred  when  one  vendor  told  us  we  needed  to  install
their  ‘‘secret  kernel’’  on  our  network.  Our  engineers  freaked!  We  weren’t  going  to
put  anything  on  our  live  production  network  that  we  didn’t  fully  understand,  let
alone  something  SECRET!!  As  we  learned  later  in  probably  the  10th  conference
call—the  vendor  wanted  us  to  load  their  cGrid  kernel,  their  software!  But  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

shows  the  mistrust,  the  misunderstandings,  and  the  huge  amount  of  time  it  takes
to resolve even simple issues in this project. These examples may seem silly or inci-
dental to you—but they all take time, explanation, resources—and they impact what
we  should  expect  to  tell  our  colleagues  about  ease  of  implementation  or  our  vendor
partners about what they might want to change.
THE PROJECT’S FUTURE

What  we  expect  to  do  over  the  next  thirteen  months  covers  a  huge  spectrum  of
activities. We are testing the data gathering capabilities of network monitoring right
now  in  anticipation  of  a  major,  in-depth,  comprehensive  study  in  September.  We
are,  at  this  moment,  conducting  very  detailed  interviews  with  student  downloaders
to get a better understanding of what they do and why so we can design educational
programs  that  might  have  an  impact  on  campus  piracy.  We’ll  be  conducting  two
more  behavioral  research  studies  in  the  fall,  designing  what  we  are  calling
‘‘birdtrax’’ (named for our mascot Reggie Redbird), which will outline the options for
legal  digital  media  services,  sorting  out  a  financial  plan  to  recover  some  costs  long
term, and implementing some public relations options. We’ll pilot and launch an es-
calated response monitoring and enforcement system in late fall. ‘‘birdtrax’’ will be-
come  a  live  site  that  students  can  use  to  learn  about  and  navigate  to  legal  digital
media  services.  As  varying  layers  of  enforcement  are  employed,  impact  on
downloading  traffic  will  be  studied.  All  through  the  next  thirteen  months  in  order
to  continue  the  study,  the  project  leaders  will  be  writing  grants  and  seeking  funds
to extend and expand the project capacity.

As stated above, the Digital Citizen Project’s long-range goal is that we will serve
as a kind of ‘‘consumer’s reports’’ on the digital media scene, testing, reviewing, and
implementing  new  services  as  they  emerge  in  the  market  while  serving  as  a  re-
source  to  higher  education  on  the  education  side  of  this  equation.  We  absolutely
know  that  we  very  well  may  provide  evidence  of  what  DOES  NOT  work  as  much
as  what  does.  Illegal  downloading  may  need  far  more  effort  and  much  broader  ap-
proaches than we can bring to bear on the problem as a single institution.

Working with vendors to secure participation in our ‘‘consumer’s report’’ approach
to  the  downloading  issues  has  had  its  challenges  and  successes.  An  advantage  we
have  that  also  becomes  a  concern  is  that  we  are  doing  our  research  on  a  live  net-
work.  It’s  an  advantage  because  it  provides  real-world  evidence.  It’s  a  concern  be-
cause any missteps can bring our campus network down. So we are now developing
a proposal that will fund a test network so we can work with some of the softwares
and  systems  outside  of  our  live  production  network.  We’re  also  working  on  a  plan
that will compartmentalize various systems on the live network—such as using dif-
ferent dorm complexes to analyze the effectiveness of different systems at the same
time. Another challenge in the consumer report-like model is convincing most of the
vendors  that  they  won’t  be  the  ONLY  service  or  software  at  Illinois  State  Univer-
sity.  However,  testing  as  many  systems  and  services  as  we  can  is  something  we
must  do  for  the  comprehensiveness  and  integrity  of  the  Digital  Citizen  Project  and
its  research  goals.  At  one  extreme—notably  with  our  fellow  witness,  Audible
Magic—our  project  and  our  expertise  has  been  so  valued  that  we  are  working  in
complete  partnership  to  develop  new  modules  and  releases  of  that  company’s  prod-
uct.  At  the  other  end  of  the  spectrum,  we  have  been  completely  ignored  in  our  re-
peated attempts to bring one of the leaders in the downloading field into our project.
Some  vendors  who  really  want  to  be  a  part  of  ISU’s  Digital  Citizen  Project  and
birdtrax  just  aren’t  ready  for  complete  implementation  and  roll-out  yet,  so  we  hope
to include those in the next phase of the research and offerings. Your assistance in
urging  vendors  to  participate  in  our  study  for  the  benefit  of  higher  education  is  as
important  as  urging  higher  ed  to  do  something  about  campus  piracy.  Higher  edu-
cation needs this kind of comparative information.
RESULTS OF THE DIGITAL CITIZEN PROJECT SO FAR

Downloading is a complex issue. Universities are complex operations. Testing and
implementing new technologies is an extraordinary undertaking. Research is a com-
plex task. There are privacy issues, financial issues, legal issues, practical issues on
a  live  network,  and  cultural  issues.  But  to  be  effective,  the  Digital  Citizen  Project
must be comprehensive. So the entire spectrum of what we’re looking becomes expo-
nentially complex.

However, we do have some early results to share.
Illinois  State  did  begin  limiting  peer-to-peer  traffic  very  early—back  in  1998  as
Napster  and  other  downloading  services  began  to  take  off.  We  use  Packeteer  to
shape the bandwidth on our campus so that not more than five percent of our capac-
ity  can  be  used  for  any  kind  of  peer-to-peer  application.  It’s  important  to  stop  here
and  state  our  project’s  strong  opinion  that  a  campus  cannot  unilaterally  block  all

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

peer-to-peer.  There  are  too  many  legitimate  uses  of  P2P—cooperative  research  file
transfers,  software  upgrades,  library  digital  files,  distance  education  requirements,
and more. By shaping our bandwidth and implementing a more selective monitoring
system, we believe we can meet two needs—supporting legitimate peer-to-peer uses
while blocking the sharing of copyright media.

• Our  work  with  the  technology  available  so  far  has  shown  us  several  things
already,  and  one  of  the  most  important  is  understanding  how  network  tools
and  appliances  work  within  our  network  The  twists,  and  turns,  and  varying
demands  of  each  system  make  getting  real,  accurate,  comprehensive  data  on
real  peer-to-peer  traffic  extremely  difficult.  There  are  problems  with
encryption  of  illegal  files.  Some  files  are  sent  over  different  parts  of  our  net-
work,  making  them  more  difficult  to  capture.  The  volume  of  data  we  have  to
analyze from our network overall is staggering, even in just one month’s cap-
ture. Very preliminary results showed that Audible Magic captured 23 million
files of all kinds—legal, illegal, encrypted, and more—on our network in April
2007  alone.  The  amount  of  recognizable  P2P—even  with  all  the  recognition
problems—is  sizable,  though  probably  not  at  all  out  of  line  with  activity  on
other  campuses.  In  only  the  first  five  days  of  the  month  individuals
downloaded copyrighted files ranging from one file to 466 signatured files.
• Most  problematic  for  the  monitoring  technologies  overall,  though  is  the  lack
of identifiable tags or electronic signatures on digital files. While the percent
of  signatured—and  therefore,  findable—unique  titles  has  grown  over  the  last
two  years  from  11  percent  to  51  percent,  there  is  much  more  to  be  done.
Signatured  titles  right  now  are  almost  exclusively  music  files.  Virtually  no
movies have the electronic signature. To find movies takes elaborate analysis
and  actually  LOOKING  at  the  tags,  descriptors,  or  metadata.  We  can’t  stop
what  we  can’t  find.  We  are  working  with  the  industry  to  devise  an  electroni-
cally,  automatically  recognizable  system  of  coding  files.  The  monitoring  sys-
tems will be more effective and comprehensive.
• We’re finding that our students are well-versed in prime sites for downloading
copyright  material.  46  percent  use  BitTorrent,  followed  by  Gnutella,
Limewire,  and  Morpheus.  Darknets—or  sharing  files  within  the  campus  net-
work—account  for  about  16  percent  of  the  traffic  we  can  identify  in  the  net-
work snapshots we’ve done. Industry sources pegged this at 45 percent while
our  own  network  engineers  estimated  maybe  five  percent.  The  actual  data
proved that both ends were off a bit.
• In  our  early  snapshots  we  found  not  as  many  computers  on  our  network  use
peer-to-peer  applications.  Of  the  13,000  computers  on  our  network,  only  26
percent  used  peer-to-peer  services,  legal  or  illegal.  That  is  a  little  less  than
3,400  machines,  a  figure  that  is  lower  than  any  of  us  had  expected.  Appar-
ently the anecdotal evidence of ‘‘everybody’s doing it’’ may be off base. But of
the 3,400 computers using peer-to-peer, 97 percent of the traffic originated in
the  residence  halls,  indicating  that  we  may  be  able  to  concentrate  our  edu-
cational efforts on those groups.

In  addition  to  what  we’ve  found  out  about  the  technology  and  what  it  can  do,

we’ve learned more about our students and their behaviors.

• We  surveyed  high  school  seniors  who  were  coming  to  campus  to  register  for
classes at ISU last summer. Notice, please, I’m not calling them college fresh-
men,  but  rather  high  school  seniors.  Their  attitudes  and  behaviors  had  been
established before any exposure to our campus. We probed their use of digital
media and what kind of mobile players they used. Of the 217 responding stu-
dents,  89  percent  reported  they  had  a  portable  music  player.  67  percent  of
those  devices  are  Apple  iPods  with  the  rest  scattered  among  26  different
kinds of players. 93 percent played music and 51 percent watched movies/TV/
videos  from  their  computers.  When  asked  how  these  incoming  students  ac-
quired their music and movies, the responses demonstrated an extreme range
of sources from actually buying CDs to commercial services like iTunes. Var-
ious  P2P  networks  such  as  Limewire,  Bearshare,  and  BitTorrent  were  men-
tioned by 39 percent of the seniors. While not testing the legal vs. illegal use
of  these  networks,  the  naivete´ we’ve  seen  elsewhere  shown  through  as  we
found  comments  such  as  ‘‘Not  legally,’’  ‘‘pirate  from  XXXX’’  or  ‘‘illegally
downloaded.’’  To  us,  this  absolutely  shows  that  our  new  students  come  with
habits entrenched in a digital lifestyle.
• In  our  surveys  and  focus  groups  this  spring,  we  learned  that  many  students
started downloading in sixth grade, or when they are about 10–13. 55 percent

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

in the focus group study downloaded often, averaging 23 songs per day. They
believe  downloading  saves  them  time  and  money,  but  that  they  would  use
legal alternatives if they were easy to use, had the kind of media in their dig-
ital  libraries  that  the  students  wanted,  and  they  were  free.  When  asked,
though,  if  the  students  could  name  any  legal  digital  media  services,  they
could not. In fact, many seemed to assume that iTunes might be illegal when
it is not. Most aren’t going to quit until there is some deterrent.

More  on  these  studies  will  be  published  in  the  coming  months  in  the  academic

literature.

One  of  the  most  important  things  we  feel  we’ve  learned  in  the  course  of  the  last
28  months  is  that  no  monitoring  or  blocking  system  will  completely  eliminate
DMCA  complaints.  As  we  said,  learning  what  DOESN’T  work  in  our  project  may
be as important as what does—particularly on this point. Nothing appears to be ef-
fective  enough  to  stop  all  copyright  violation  notices  at  this  point.  We’re  getting
there,  but  not  yet.  And  while  no  system  has  to  be  100  percent  effective  before  it
is  implemented,  it  is  premature  to  ask  all  college  campuses  to  invest  tens  of  thou-
sands  of  dollars  in  systems  that  aren’t  ready  yet.  We’ve  all  heard  from  other  hear-
ings  that  ‘‘the  hammer  is  coming.’’  But  if  the  hammer  drives  nails  that  break  or
bend, the construction project is ineffective. Leaks will occur. And certainly, if Con-
gress asks all 4,000 colleges and universities across the country to implement moni-
toring systems over a very short period of time—from our experiences it would seem
impossible  for  vendors  to  supply  our  needs,  let  alone  the  tech  support  we  all  will
absolutely have to have to make the systems operational. We’ve been working with
one  industry-leading  vendor  for  16  months  to  try  to  bring  them  to  campus  for  a
test—and we’re still not there.
CONCLUSIONS

If campus decision makers came to the Digital Citizen Project today—and they’ve
already  started—to  find  out  what  to  do,  we  wouldn’t  have  an  answer  for  them.  It’s
too early. The monitoring technologies don’t seem to be fully ready to do what Con-
gress  or  the  entertainment  industry  wants.  Yet.  Yes,  they  may  REDUCE  campus
piracy. From our early experiences and data, we believe the technologies do not yet
do what higher education wants—to STOP the DMCA complaints completely.

The other technological equation is legal digital media services. iTunes is not the
only answer. 30–40 percent of the students have some other sort of player not com-
patible  with  iTunes.  Legal  services  need  to  market  their  services  more  effectively
so  student  can  at  least  name  one.  They  need  to  listen  to  their  customers  and  be
comprehensive,  easy,  and—of  course  you  would  expect  this—free.  Studios  have  to
help  them  by  supporting  digital  distribution  systems.  Movie  studios  need  to  get  in
the game because we’re suspecting from early findings on our campus that far more
bandwidth is used in downloading movies, videos, TV shows than songs. Video may
be just as pervasive a problem as music. Right now it’s far harder to track.

Higher education needs more information. A consumer study like we’re proposing
is desperately needed so side-by-side comparisons, benefits, and features can be de-
termined. Both monitoring systems and legal digital media services need to be eval-
uated. And this all needs to happen now.

The  consumer  study  can  help  the  entertainment  industry  as  well  by  providing
feedback,  gaps,  strengths,  needs,  and  more.  Audible  Magic,  an  early  and  strong
partner  in  our  Digital  Citizen  Project,  was  very  open  to  taking  our  feedback  and
both  modifying  their  product  for  our  network  environment,  but  also  adding  new
functionality.  They  ran  with  our  wishes  to  develop  a  new  product  in  conjunction
with  our  ISU  programmers  that  we  believe  will  be  very  useful  to  other  campuses.
This  is  an  example  of  the  kind  of  partnership  that  should  be  promoted  and  re-
warded.

But again—technology is not THE answer. The 9/11 Commission Report says that
‘‘Americans’  love  affairs  with  [technology]  leads  them  to  also  regard  it  as  the  solu-
tion. But technology produces its best results when an organization has the doctrine,
structure,  and  incentives  to  exploit  it.’’  (http://www.911commission.gov/report/
911Report¥Ch3.htm)  What  is  needed  is  ‘‘the  doctrine,  structure,  and  incentives’’—
a comprehensive program of education and ethics on campus and in the schools, cul-
tural  change,  enforcement,  high  quality  legal  avenues  for  entertainment,  and  some
sort  of  positive  reinforcement  for  good  digital  citizenship.  That’s  what  we  believe
must  be  developed  and  tested  for  effectiveness.  Think  of  seat  belts.  In  1963  Con-
gress passed its first seatbelt law—44 years ago. In 2006, seat belt usage was deter-
mined  to  be  81  percent  (http://www-nrd.nhtsa.dot.gov/nrd-30/NCSA/RNotes/
2007/810690.pdf).  We’ve  worked  over  40  years  to  get  people  to  change  a  behavior
that  will  save  lives,  and  we’re  still  at  only  81  percent  compliance.  How  long  will  it
take  to  change  the  behavior,  the  ingrained  culture  of  illegally  downloading  copy-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

righted  materials?  Early  education  and  great  technologies  hold  the  key.  We  have
proven at Illinois State that we can be effective in researching the problem. We are
certainly  successful  in  being  able  to  work  with  everyone—higher  ed,  industry,  ven-
dors,  associations,  Congress,  and  more.  We  need  funding  and  time  to  create  a  true
test  environment  and  a  living  laboratory  on  our  campus  to  work  with  the  tech-
nologies and track what works and what does not.

Your help is essential in directing the conversations toward improvements in and
testing of new technologies. Your assistance is critical in directing all of us to focus
on  education  starting  with  the  Nation’s  very  young,  and  your  involvement  in  a  na-
tional  conversation  on  practical  fair  use  and  copyright  permissions,  can  point  the
way  to  creating  great  role  models.  Your  support  for  comprehensive  efforts  like  our
Digital  Citizen  Project,  with  funding  and  by  utilizing  us  as  a  knowledgeable  re-
source for Congress and higher education in general, will be invaluable.

For more information visit www.digitalcitizen.ilstu.edu

BIOGRAPHY FOR CHERYL ASPER ELZY

Cheryl  Asper  Elzy  currently  serves  as  Dean  of  University  Libraries  and  as  the
campus  federal  DMCA  copyright  agent  at  Illinois  State  University  in  Normal,  Illi-
nois,  where  she  manages  the  operations,  services,  collections,  and  programs  of  the
1.6  million-volume  Milner  Library.  She  came  to  Illinois  State  in  1981  to  teach  in
the library science program after serving on the faculty of Quincy College as Assist-
ant  Director  of  its  library.  Dean  Elzy  also  served  as  director  of  the  Chenoa  Public
Library and Gridley Public Library in the 1980’s as part of a unique shared staffing
program  funded  by  the  Illinois  State  Library  in  Springfield  to  bring  professional  li-
brarians to small libraries.

Dean  Elzy  joined  Milner  Library’s  faculty  in  1984  where  she  has  held  a  number
of  increasingly  responsible  positions  including  head  of  the  Education/Psychology/
Teaching  Materials  Center  Division,  Associate  University  Librarian  for  Personnel,
and  Associate  Dean  of  University  Libraries.  Professor  Elzy  was  named  Interim
Dean of University Libraries in 1996, and Dean in 1998. She is active in the Amer-
ican  Library  Association,  the  Library  Administration  and  Management  Association,
the Illinois Library Association, and the Council of Directors of State University Li-
braries in Illinois.

Dean  Elzy  earned  three  degrees  at  the  University  of  Illinois  at  Urbana/Cham-
paign, including two advanced degrees from the Graduate School of Library and In-
formation  Science.  She  has  published  in  the  fields  of  reference  services  evaluation,
evaluation  of  collections,  end-user  studies  of  reference  databases,  and  in  children’s
literature  research.  More  recently  Dean  Elzy’s  research  has  focused  on  issues  sur-
rounding  the  illegal  downloading  of  copyrighted  songs,  movies,  videos,  and  games
on college campuses.

Chairman GORDON. Can’t beat them out if we are not getting ac-
tion. Good job and thank you, and now Dr. Jackson, you are recog-
nized for five minutes.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  GREGORY  A.  JACKSON,  VICE  PRESIDENT
AND  CHIEF  INFORMATION  OFFICER,  UNIVERSITY  OF  CHI-
CAGO
Dr.  JACKSON.  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Hall,  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee,  I  am  Greg  Jackson.  I  am  the  Vice  President  and  Chief  In-
formation Officer at the University of Chicago. Thank you for invit-
ing me here today.

Let  me  summarize  five  points  from  my  written  testimony.  First,
the  university’s  business  centers  on  intellectual  property.  We  pat-
ent,  copyright,  publish,  and  teach.  Protecting  our  rights  to  all  this
is important, but so is access. Research and teaching depend on the
convenient availability of intellectual property. We need to work to-
gether  across  organizational  and  political  lines  to  find  the  elusive
right  balance  between  mechanisms  that  protect  intellectual  prop-
erty  and  mechanisms  that  make  it  accessible.  Staking  out  irrecon-
cilable adversarial positions won’t achieve that.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

Second,  the  university  deplores  violations  of  copyright  law.  We
received  57  DMCA  complaints  last  year  and  expect  about  twice
that many this year. We handle these aggressively by immediately
disconnecting the offender. Before restoring connections, we require
first  offenders  to  meet  with  the  Dean  on  the  record  to  emphasize
the  seriousness  of  the  offense.  We  fine  second  offenders  1,000
bucks.  In  addition,  we  paper  the  campus  with  posters  like  these.
We discuss the issue at orientation and in class, and our acceptable
use policy covers it. Periodically I remind the entire community by
E-mail  that  the  university  takes  copyright  offenses  seriously  and
that they can have very negative consequences.

Our approach has yielded good results. DMCA complaints involve
less than half of one percent of our community. Over five years we
have had only six repeat offenders.

Third, the principle drivers of infringement are business related.
Movie  and  music  producers  serve  their  online  customers  inconsist-
ently,  incompatibly,  inefficiently,  inconveniently,  and  incompletely.
Music purchased legally from Microsoft, for example, can’t be used
on  Apple  devices  or  vice  versa.  Pricing  seems  high  and  managing
keys  and  licenses  is  a  major  hassle.  Most  movies  remain  unavail-
able, and no one offers Beatles tracks. If the right thing keeps fall-
ing  short  of  customers’  reasonable  expectations,  too  many  cus-
tomers will keep choosing the wrong thing.

Fourth,  network-based  anti-infringement  technologies  fail  within
high-performance  networks.  As  I  detail  in  my  written  testimony,
the  Internet  transports  not  distinct,  intact  files  but  rather  files
chopped  up  into  packets  and  then  shuffled  together.  Only  limited
address  and  type  information  and  not  content  is  readily  available
in transit. Address and type alone cannot accurately identify illegal
transfers  and  reconstituting  file  content  for  blocking  at  network
speeds can be a daunting challenge. This is why the dominant anti-
infringement  technologies  fail  within  high-performance  networks;
both traffic-shaping products, such as Packeteer, Red Lambda, and
Clouseau; and signature-matching products such as Audible Magic.
These may work today at the relatively slow borders between cam-
puses  or  dormitories  and  the  regular  Internet  as  we  have  heard
today,  but  they  will  fail  even  there  as  strong  encryption  becomes
commonplace and legitimate applications of peer-to-peer filesharing
expand.

Moreover,  as  Apple,  Amazon,  and  others  sell  unprotected  copy-
righted music and movies, legal network transmissions will become
identical to illegal ones, further hampering anti-infringement tech-
nology.

Finally, technological obstacles to behavior have limited counter-
productive  effects.  We  have  learned  this  lesson  from  long  experi-
ence  with  intensively-networked  university  communities.  The  only
successful,  robust  way  to  address  problems  that  involve  personal
responsibility  and  behavior  is  with  social  rather  than  technical
tools.  We  must  teach  and  persuade  people  that  certain  behaviors
are socially and economically counter-productive for their own com-
munities.  If  owners,  publishers,  transmitters,  and  users  do  that
teaching  together,  collective  benefit  will  trump  individual  malfea-
sance.  If  we  instead  try  to  restrict  behavior  technologically,  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

only  result  as  Dr.  Sannier  said  earlier,  will  be  an  arms  race  that
no one wins.

I  hope  that  the  Committee  translates  this  lesson  into  effective
policy  and  collaborative  practice,  and  I  appreciate  the  opportunity
to provide whatever help I can.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Jackson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GREGORY A. JACKSON

Mr. Chairman, Representatives of the great State of Illinois, and Members of the
Committee,  I  am  pleased  to  be  here  today.  My  name  is  Greg  Jackson.  I  am  Vice
President and Chief Information Officer at the University of Chicago, where I have
overseen central information technology and services for almost eleven years. Before
that I was MIT’s Director of Academic Computing, and before that a statistician and
faculty member at Harvard and Stanford.

Two  high-level  policy  questions  frame  our  discussion  today.  The  first  is  whether
the  copyright  law  that  has  grown  up  around  industrially-organized  publishing  re-
mains  relevant  and  productive  in  today’s  widely  distributed  information  economy.
The  second  is  to  what  degree  network  service  providers  should  be  responsible  for
illegal use of their networks.

I know that the Committee has engaged these larger questions in other hearings.
Since I can claim no special expertise with regard to the larger questions, I will con-
centrate on the two topics I have been asked to address based on my experience at
the University of Chicago: how we handle DMCA and related incidents, and the fea-
sibility,  in  research  universities  like  ours,  of  technologies  one  might  use  to  reduce
the illegal sharing of copyrighted materials.
My testimony emphasizes five key points:

networks, and eventually they will fail more generally; and

• The University’s business centers on intellectual property;
• Like most of its peers, the University deplores violations of copyright law;
• Market shortcomings are the principal drivers of infringement;
• Network-based  anti-infringement  technologies  fail  within  high-performance
• Technological  obstacles  to  behavior  have  only  limited  and  transitory  effects.
Let me begin with a few words about the University. We are a large private insti-
tution,  one  of  the  world’s  major  research  universities.  We  operate  one  of  Chicago’s
principal medical centers and, through subsidiaries, two DOE research laboratories,
Argonne  and  Fermi.  We  have  a  $2  billion  operating  budget,  13,000  students,  2,000
faculty,  5,000  staff,  150  buildings  in  five  states  and  four  foreign  countries,  25,000
telephones,  and—most  important  for  today’s  topic—a  high-performance  network
using about 2,500 switches and routers to connect our 25,000 digital devices to each
other, to research universities and labs worldwide, and to the Internet.
1. The University’s business centers on intellectual property

Our research produces not only deeper understanding of how the world works, but
also  concrete  products  including  many  inventions  and  creative  works.  Our  teaching
instills in our students not only concrete knowledge and skills, but also insights into
what’s  worth  doing  and  what  isn’t,  what’s  right  and  what’s  wrong.  We  protect  our
intellectual  property:  we  patent  inventions,  copyright  works,  distribute  online  jour-
nals,  value  distinctive  teaching,  and  so  on.  Yet  research  and  teaching,  the  heart  of
higher  education,  also  depend  on  access  to  intellectual  property.  This  has  implica-
tions  for  course  materials,  for  our  libraries,  for  publications,  for  the  University  of
Chicago  Press,  for  our  relationships  with  outside  entities,  and  in  many  other  do-
mains.

It  is  important  to  us  that  patents  and  copyrights  be  enforceable—even  though  in
many  cases  we  license  our  intellectual  property,  and  especially  our  research,  for
free.  But  it  is  also  important  that  we  be  able  to  do  the  best  possible  research  and
teaching,  that  technology  advance  rather  than  degrade  our  ability  to  do  that,  and
therefore  that  technology  promote  rather  than  deter  access  to  intellectual  property.
A  key  challenge  for  all  of  us—copyright  owners,  publishers,  transmitters,  enforc-
ers,  and  users  alike—is  to  find  the  elusive  right  balance  between  mechanisms  to
protect intellectual property and mechanisms to make it accessible. Tradeoffs are in-
evitable.  We  should  all  be  working  together,  across  organizational  and  political
lines, to find reasonable, manageable compromises among our diverse needs, rather
than  unilaterally  and  adversarially  staking  out  fundamentally  irreconcilable  posi-
tions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

2. Like  most  of  its  peers,  the  University  deplores  violations  of  copyright

law
The  University  of  Chicago  received  57  Digital  Millennium  Copyright  Act  (DMCA)
complaints  in  2006.  At  the  current  pace  (33  complaints  through  April  30),  we  will
receive about 130 complaints in 2007. Those complaints involve only about one half
of  one  percent  of  our  community.  58  percent  of  last  year’s  complaints  involved
music,  and  most  of  the  rest  involved  movies,  TV  shows,  or  software;  this  year  the
music percentage has dropped to 52 percent. (I should note that the MPAA ‘‘top 25’’
listing has an incorrect DMCA count for us—it’s about ten times the right number.
We  have  asked  MPAA  to  clarify  or  correct  this,  but  thus  far  have  received  no  sub-
stantive response.)

The  DMCA,  as  we  understand  it,  requires  the  University,  as  a  ‘‘network  service
provider,’’  to  end  violations  when  we  receive  a  valid,  accurate  DMCA  complaint.  (A
valid  complaint  requires  that  data  sufficiently  detailed  to  locate  the  offending  com-
puter, plus various other elements including an affirmation and a signature, be sent
to  the  University’s  ‘‘DMCA  agent’’—me,  in  our  case.)  We  deal  strongly  with  DMCA
violations.  When  we  receive  a  complaint,  network-security  officers  first  verify  that
the  offending  material  remains  available,  or  that  our  network  logs  confirm  the  ac-
cess  cited  in  the  complaint  (this  is  what  makes  a  complaint  accurate).  If  the  com-
plaint  is  valid  and  accurate,  network-security  officers  immediately  disable  the  net-
work  connection  cited  in  the  complaint,  as  DMCA  requires.  In  addition,  by  Univer-
sity policy we identify who was using the connection at the time of the offense, and
refer the offender to the appropriate disciplinary process.

For  first  offenders  this  means  a  formal  hearing  before  a  Dean  (or  an  HR  officer
in the case of staff) and a file notation, after which we restore the network connec-
tion.  (Very  few  offenders  dispute  the  violation,  although  many  assert—often  with
good reason—that the offense resulted from negligence rather than intent.) For sec-
ond  offenders  we  impose  a  fine  of  $1,000,  the  proceeds  of  which  become  financial
aid for others. Over the past five years we have had just six second offenses.

In addition to the disciplinary process for offenders, we communicate broadly with
the  community  on  this  topic.  We  deploy  humorous  but  persuasive  posters.  We  dis-
cuss  the  issue  at  student  orientation.  Faculty  and  instructors  discuss  it  in  class  at
relevant  moments.  It  is  covered  by  our  acceptable-use  policy.  About  once  a  year,  I
personally remind the entire community by e-mail that the University takes DMCA
offenses very seriously and that they can result in very negative consequences.

Many  of  our  DMCA  offenses,  we  believe,  result  not  from  intentional  distribution
of copyrighted material, but rather from how hard it is to disable the public-sharing
features  of  peer-to-peer  software.  Because  of  this,  we  publish  a  web  page  providing
extensive guidance as to how a user can disable peer-to-peer sharing. Scores of other
entities—including RIAA itself—have cited or linked to our materials.

Unfortunately, inaccurate DMCA complaints, discriminatory enforcement, and po-
litically-structured  ‘‘top  25’’  lists  have  proliferated  lately.  One  movie  company,  for
example,  has  an  accuracy  rate  down  around  20  percent,  and  even  though  commer-
cial  ISPs  in  some  university  towns  serve  precisely  the  same  numbers  and  types  of
students who live in campus dormitories, the ISPs receive no DMCA complaints and
never  make  top-25  lists  even  when  the  local  university  does.  This  is  all  becoming
very problematic, since these problems waste resources, and the inconsistencies and
discrimination cause offenders to dispute rather than accept our guidance.
3. Market shortcomings are the principal drivers of infringement

Media  producers  provide  and  protect  their  online  wares  inconsistently,  incom-
patibly,  inefficiently,  inconveniently,  and  incompletely.  For  example,  music  pur-
chased  legally  from  Microsoft  can’t  be  used  on  Apple  devices  or  vice  versa,  pricing
seems high, managing keys and licenses is a major hassle, and no one offers Beatles
tracks.  So  long  as  the  right  thing  remains  more  daunting,  awkward,  and
unsatisfying than the wrong thing, too many people will do the wrong thing.

Digital  rights  management  (DRM),  the  principal  mechanism  vendors  use  to  pro-
tect  content  sold  online,  involves  packaging  intellectual  property  so  that  it  cannot
be used without a special digital key. The digital key, in turn, is restricted to a par-
ticular customer or device with license to use the content. This is how iTunes, Zune,
Ruckus,  and  Genuine  Microsoft  Validation  work.  Customers  who  want  to  use  con-
tent  protected  by  different  DRM  typically  have  to  use  different  software—or  even
different devices—to gain access. Managing keys can be a major hassle, for example
when  one’s  device  dies  or  is  replaced.  Moreover,  poorly  implemented  DRM  can  dis-
able  customers’  computers  entirely,  as  one  media  company  unfortunately  dem-
onstrated broadly with its CDs not too long ago.

DRM appears to be a good idea. However, it has been plagued by poor execution,
and  so  has  come  to  be  a  frustrating  obstacle  rather  than  a  convenient  enabler.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

Moreover, DRM has become a challenge to security specialists and hackers, who de-
light  in  showing  how  easily  it  can  be  subverted.  This  exemplifies  the  unwinnable
arms  race  and  has  induced  some  vendors  to  begin  selling  unprotected  content,
points to which I will return.
4. Network-based  anti-infringement  technologies  fail  within  high-perform-

ance networks, and eventually they will fail more generally

How Networks Transmit Files

Say  that  person  A  wants  to  send  a  file  to  person  B.  If  A  and  B  work  at  univer-
sities,  the  file  might  be  a  pre-publication  draft,  a  three-dimensional  x-ray  scatter
image  of  a  molecule,  or  the  video  of  a  procedure  carried  out  within  a  containment
facility,  but  the  process  would  be  exactly  the  same  if  A  were  sending  a  personal
wedding video or an illegal copy of Eleanor Rigby to B. Here’s what happens, in sim-
plified form:

1. A’s  computer  chops  up  the  file  (which  may  first  be  encrypted,  for  security)
into  many  small  chunks,  much  as  I  might  cut  up  a  large  mounted  photo-
graph  to  make  a  jigsaw  puzzle  whose  pieces  would  fit  in  regular  envelopes.
A  ‘‘header’’  on  each  chunk  contains  limited  information  including  as  the  ad-
dress  of  B’s  computer  and  the  kind  of  data  being  transmitted—by  analogy,
think of the addresses and ‘‘contains photo—do not bend’’ notations on an en-
velope. The encased chunk is now a ‘‘packet,’’ in networking jargon.

2. One  by  one,  A’s  computer  sends  packets  to  the  network  for  transmission  to
B’s  computer.  A’s  computer  sends  other  files  to  other  places  at  the  same
time. The packets from the other files get shuffled with the B-destined file’s
packets as they leave A’s computer.

3. Once the packets reach the network, bucket brigades of routers and switches
pass them along—again mixed with others, and again one by one—until each
packet  reaches  its  destination.  Although  packets  headed  for  the  same  des-
tination usually follow the same path, a great strength of the Internet is that
they  need  not  do  so.  Network  equipment  constantly  monitors  flows,  and
switches to alternate routes when particular paths get clogged.

4. As  packets  reach  B’s  computer—some  from  A,  some  from  other  sources—B’s
computer  sorts  them  and  requests  re-transmission  for  any  missing  packets.
It  then  extracts  the  chunks  of  data  from  the  packets  and  reassembles  them
into the original file.

I highlight four key attributes of this process. First, files move across the network
in discrete packets, rather than as whole files. Second, packets are intermingled with
other packets from other files as they leave the source, as they move across the net-
work, and as they arrive at their destinations. Third, packets going from one source
to one destination may follow different paths across the network. Fourth, this chop-
ping  and  scattering  is  intentionally  designed  into  the  Internet  to  ensure  reliability,
speed, and robustness.

As  particularly  advanced  users  of  networking,  colleges  and  universities  typically
deploy  networks  comprising  an  array  of  main  switches  and  routers  interconnected
in a ring or mesh with tentacles reaching out to smaller switches and routers, rath-
er than connect everything to one telephone-like central switching point. Rings and
meshes  maximize  the  robustness  and  efficiency  of  networks.  As  a  desirable  con-
sequence,  they  also  make  internal  traffic  on  campus  networks  especially  likely  to
follow multiple routes between points.

Much as it’s easy to attain perfect network security by detaching computers from
networks, it’s easy to protect intellectual property by locking it in a strongbox where
no  one  can  retrieve  it,  or  by  disabling  networks  that  might  transmit  it.  The  value
of intellectual property depends largely on circulation, however, so using a strongbox
or  disabling  networks  reduces  the  value  of  the  property.  Implementing  the  strong-
box  or  complicating  the  network  diverts  resources  from  more  productive  pursuits.
And  so  the  challenge  we  are  discussing  today:  Can  anti-infringement  technologies
work without degrading the efficiency and productivity of the campus networks crit-
ical to research and teaching?

There  are  two  principal  network-based  technologies  for  forestalling,  detecting,  or

reducing illegal network filesharing: traffic shaping and signature matching.
Traffic Shaping

Traffic shaping involves handling packets differently depending on information in
their headers. Thus, for example, we might assign Web packets higher priority than
e-mail,  or  Berkeley-bound  packets  higher  priority  than  Emory-bound  ones,  or  lo-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

cally-originated  packets  higher  priority  than  others.  Higher  priority  translates  into
faster transfers, so varying priorities in this way ‘‘shapes’’ traffic according to policy.
The  most  common  shaping  tools  are  firewalls,  which  block  traffic  according  to
source, destination, or other header attributes. Packeteer, cGrid, Clouseau boxes, or
other  more  sophisticated  shapers  can  also  speed  or  slow  traffic  according  to  packet
headers.  Traffic  shaping  can  be  quite  effective  when  offending  traffic  (a)  has  stable
or predictable header attributes and (b) those header attributes clearly, reliably, and
accurately distinguish illegal from legal traffic.

Unfortunately,  much  illegal  filesharing  fails  these  tests.  Newer  peer-to-peer  soft-
ware  routinely  switches  addresses  and  ports  in  increasingly  complex  ways.  It  often
mixes  infringing  transmissions  with  legitimate  ones,  for  example  by  disguising
transmissions  as  Web  traffic  or  legal  transfers.  Moreover,  a  great  deal  of  illegal
filesharing no longer uses distinctive peer-to-peer software or protocols. Traffic shap-
ing has thus become rather ineffective against illegal network filesharing, although
it remains an important mechanism for network management.
Signature Matching

Signature-matching  technologies  compare  a  file’s  content  to  a  database  of  ab-
stracted  ‘‘signatures,’’  and  then  take  specified  action  when  they  find  a  match.  The
most  typical  examples  are  virus  or  spam  checkers,  which  perform  the  matching  ex-
ercise when a computer opens a file or message and block the file if it matches the
checker’s  database.  The  comparisons  necessary  for  signature  matching  can  be  slow,
since accuracy requires detailed comparison. However, virus and spam screening ap-
pears not to slow things down, mostly because personal computers and e-mail serv-
ers operate so much faster than people use files or read e-mail.

Signature  matching  for  network  traffic  is  much  more  challenging.  In  order  to  do
high-quality  comparison  on  network  traffic,  an  entire  digital  file  must  be  available
for comparison to the signature database. Accurate signature matching thus entails
three  requirements:  that  all  packets  travel  through  one  network  point  where  they
can be gathered and reconstituted, that reconstitution and comparison be as fast as
network  transmission,  and  that  matching  methods  and  databases  identify  only  ille-
gally  transferred  files—that  is,  there  can  be  no  false  positives.  These  are  the  chal-
lenges for Audible Magic and similar products.

The requirements for satisfactory signature matching appear unattainable within
the typical campus network. (The network border is a separate issue, to which I will
return.) First, as I pointed out earlier, a file’s packets are mixed in with others, and
may  travel  different  routes  across  the  network.  This  makes  gathering  and  recon-
stitution  en  route  difficult  at  best,  and  often  impossible.  Second,  networks  are
equipped and optimized to transmit packets without decoding anything but headers,
and only the headers are standardized and optimized for this purpose. Since campus
and  research  networks  carry  traffic  at  very  high  speeds,  there  is  no  practical  way
to  do  full-file  comparison  without  seriously  degrading  network  performance.  Third,
legal and illegal copies of files sometimes are identical. This will become more com-
mon as Apple, Amazon, and other companies sell more copyrighted content without
DRM.

What  about  partial  signature  matching  using  data  from  individual  packets?  In
general, even this cannot be done at campus-network speeds, since reading headers
does  not  suffice,  and  reading  anything  else  slows  the  network.  The  larger  problem
is  accuracy:  the  smaller  the  basis  for  comparison,  the  greater  the  likelihood  of  er-
rors, both positive and negative. Compounding the problem, newer peer-to-peer soft-
ware  and  other  filesharing  mechanisms  use  strong,  increasingly  sophisticated
encryption  to  protect  or  disguise  files,  and  therefore  to  defeat  signature  matching.
Border and Host-Based Approaches

Two  signature-matching  strategies  might  make  technical  sense.  One  is  more

promising than the other, but neither will work for long.

The  less  promising  strategy  involves  signature  matching  on  users’  computers,
rather  than  the  network.  Over  the  past  few  years,  colleges,  universities,  and  other
networking  providers  have  very  successfully  persuaded  their  users  to  install  anti-
virus  and  anti-spam  software  on  their  personal  computers.  Since  signature-match-
ing  software  works  analogously,  and  the  target  files  are  already  intact,  installing
anti-infringement  signature-matching  software  might  not  degrade  the  performance
of personal computers.

Users  like  and  are  happy  to  use  anti-virus  and  anti-spam  software  because  it  re-
duces  problems  without  constraining  or  suppressing  benefits.  Unfortunately,  much
as  we  might  wish  otherwise,  experience  has  shown  that  many  users  likely  would
perceive  anti-infringement  software  in  precisely  the  opposite  way.  If  installation  of
such software were to be required, compliance and technical work-arounds would be-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

come major problems. We already see this problem with copy-protected DVDs: users
easily  and  inexpensively  replace  software  that  complies  with  copy  protection  with
software that doesn’t.

The  requirement  might  also  have  serious  indirect  negative  consequences.  Users
resisting  anti-infringement  software,  for  example,  might  become  suspicious  of  anti-
spam  and  anti-virus  software.  If  this  caused  a  backlash  and  led  users  to  remove,
disable, or bypass those protections, requiring anti-infringement software might not
only  have  failed  to  achieve  its  own  objectives,  but  it  would  also  have  reversed  the
Internet-wide  security  and  privacy  gains  anti-virus  and  anti-spam  software  has
yielded over the past few years.

The  apparently  more  promising  strategy  involves  the  border  between  campus  or
dormitory networks and the commodity Internet (that’s the regular Internet, as op-
posed  to  special  high-performance  research  networks  such  as  Internet2  or  National
LambdaRail).  Commodity  connections  are  expensive,  and  so  colleges  and  univer-
sities  typically  buy  no  more  capacity  or  speed  than  they  need.  Moreover,  all  traffic
destined  for  the  commodity  Internet  flows  through  one  or  two  connections  at  the
typical campus border, so gathering packets seems more feasible than it does within
campus  networks.  As  the  Committee  has  heard  today,  sufficiently  fast  signature
matching therefore might be possible at commodity border points.

But even perfect border screening can succeed only partially and temporarily. For
example,  it  cannot  detect  or  act  on  filesharing  within  campus  networks.  As  peer-
to-peer  encryption  becomes  more  common  and  powerful,  it  will  become  increasingly
difficult  to  identify  files.  As  some  vendors  begin  selling  music  and  movies  without
DRM,  it  will  become  impossible  to  differentiate  legal  from  illegal  transmissions
using  signatures.  False  positives  and  false  negatives  will  increase,  thus  rendering
even border screening ineffective and counterproductive.
5. Technological obstacles to behavior have only limited and transitory ef-

fects
I have confined my remarks thus far to technical feasibility. Let me conclude with

a broader observation.

Unexpected  problems  arise  in  networked  environments.  In  large  part  this  is  be-
cause  fast,  extensive  networks  enable  people  to  do  foolish  things  much  faster—and
at  much  greater  scale—than  they  could  otherwise.  Since  colleges  and  universities
started  providing  high-performance  networking  to  entire  communities  earlier  than
anyone  else,  we  have  lots  of  experience  assessing  and  solving  problems  that  arise
in intensively networked environments.

An  important  lesson  we  have  learned  is  this:  When  the  problems  that  arise  are
about personal and organizational behavior, about the rights and responsibilities of
community  members  and  citizens,  the  only  successful,  robust  way  to  address  them
is  with  social  rather  than  technical  tools.  We  must  educate  people  to  understand
why  certain  behaviors  are  counterproductive  for  their  own  community  or  economy.
If  we  do  that  together—by  which  I  mean  owners,  publishers,  transmitters,  and
users—collective  good  will  trump  individual  malfeasance.  When  we  instead  restrict
behavior technologically, we get nothing but an arms race we can’t win.

I  hope  that  this  committee  can  translate  this  lesson  into  effective  policy  and  col-
laborative practice, and I appreciate the opportunity to provide whatever help I can.

BIOGRAPHY FOR GREGORY A. JACKSON

Gregory A. Jackson is Vice President and Chief Information Officer at the Univer-
sity  of  Chicago.  In  this  capacity  he  reports  to  the  President,  and  manages  the  Uni-
versity’s central computing facilities, telephones, communications, network services,
administrative  computing,  academic  computing,  computer  store,  and  related  enti-
ties.

The  umbrella  organization  for  these  activities,  Networking  Services  and  Informa-
tion  Technologies,  spends  about  $70  million  annually  overall.  It  employs  about  350
individuals (not counting students). Jackson also works closely with the University’s
widely  diverse  academic  and  administrative  units  to  frame  and  guide  more  distrib-
uted information-technology activities, and to make sure the University makes opti-
mal use of information technology in its education, research, and administration. He
serves on University-wide committees, councils, and boards including Budget, Com-
puting  Activities  and  Services,  Patents  and  Licensing,  Research  Infrastructure,  In-
tellectual  Property,  Provost  Staff,  Executive  Staff,  President’s  Council,  and  various
others.

Jackson  has  served  on  the  Boards  for  EDUCAUSE,  National  LambdaRail,  and
Internet2. He has served as a member of the EDUCAUSE Recognitions Committee,
chaired the Internet2 National Planning and Policy Council, and is an active partici-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

pant  in  the  Common  Solutions  Group  and  the  Ivy+  and  CIC  CIO  groups.  He  also
has  served  on  the  higher-education  advisory  boards  for  Dell,  Sun,  Apple,  Microsoft,
and Gateway.

From  1991  to  1996  Jackson  was  Director  of  Academic  Computing  for  the  Massa-
chusetts  Institute  of  Technology.  From  1989  through  1991  he  was  Director  of  Edu-
cational  Studies  and  Special  Projects  in  the  Provost’s  Office  at  MIT.  Concurrently
with  his  administrative  work  at  MIT,  Jackson  was  Adjunct  Lecturer  in  Harvard’s
Kennedy School of Government, and Lecturer in the Harvard University Extension.
From  1981  through  1990  Jackson  was  Associate  Professor  of  Education  at  Harvard
University  (Assistant  Professor  1979–81),  teaching  in  the  University’s  doctoral  and
management programs in higher education. He served as one of the founding Direc-
tors  of  Harvard  University’s  Educational  Technology  Center,  which  studied  the  use
of  technology  to  advance  educational  practice.  He  also  served  as  Assistant  Director
of the Joint Center for Urban Studies of MIT and Harvard University, a multidisci-
plinary  research  organization  then  operated  by  the  two  universities.  Jackson  was
Assistant Professor of Education at Stanford University from 1977 through 1979.

Trained as a statistician, Jackson has taught analytic methods for clarifying deci-
sion  making,  including  statistical  and  qualitative  research  methods;  policy  analysis
and evaluation, especially in higher education; and computer programming. At MIT
Jackson also taught an MIT freshman seminar on the scientific integrity of murder
mysteries.

Jackson  has  worked  extensively  on  evaluation  and  planning  methods  in  higher
education;  on  research,  instructional,  and  library  computing  in  universities;  and  on
admissions  and  college-choice  issues  including  the  differential  impact  of  financial
aid on minority and majority college applicants. He is co-author of two books—Who
Gets  Ahead?  and  Future  Boston—and  of  numerous  articles,  reports,  and  teaching
cases.

Born in Los Angeles and raised in Mexico City, Jackson earned his Bachelor’s de-

gree from MIT and his doctorate from Harvard.

DISCUSSION

Chairman  GORDON.  We  will  start  now  with  our  questions,  and  I

will begin as the Chair.

Dr.  Jackson,  you  state  that  the  network-based  anti-infringement
technologies  will  fail  within  higher-performance  networks.  Has  the
University of Chicago actually tested any of the network filter tech-
nologies?

Dr. JACKSON. We have used Packeteer extensively and we——
Chairman  GORDON.  But  I  was  asking  you  have  you  tested  the

network filter?

tested it yet?

Dr. JACKSON. The filter, we are in the process right now.
Chairman  GORDON.  So  you  haven’t  done  that  yet?  You  haven’t

Dr. JACKSON. We have not done it yet. Correct.
Chairman  GORDON.  So  it  is  a  little  hard  to  state  that,  it  would

seem to me, with such certainty if you haven’t tested it yet.

Dr. JACKSON. Well, we had engaged, we talked to Audible Magic

at length at a conference in the fall.

Chairman  GORDON.  But  you  haven’t  tested  it,  although  you——
Dr. JACKSON. And they had agreed with——
Chairman GORDON.—stated unequivocally that it won’t work.
Dr. JACKSON. Correct, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  GORDON.  Okay.  And  you  have  also  said  that  techno-
logical obstacles to illegal behavior have only limited and transitory
effects.  Do  you  believe  this  is  true  for  spammers  and  computer
hackers  and  people  who  develop  computer  viruses?  And  if  so,  why
does  the  University  of  Chicago  use  anti-spam,  anti-virus  software
and  firewalls,  and  why  should  illegal  filesharing  be  any  different
from these other illegal activities?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

Dr.  JACKSON.  Well,  let  me  say  two  things  about  that,  because

that is an excellent question.

The first is that spam and virus filtering actually work very well
because  they  run  on  people’s  own  computers,  and  they  run  in  a
way  that  really  doesn’t  interfere  with  anything  else.  So  people  do
not perceive any problem from doing that.

Chairman GORDON. Are they 100 percent effective?
Dr. JACKSON. They are pretty close to 100 percent effective. Yes.
Up in the 80 to 90 percent effectiveness. If, I should say if we could
have a tool that we could persuade people to install that would run
at  that  level  of  effectiveness  and  do  the  filtering  accurately,  we
wouldn’t have any objection to that. We have not seen that yet.

The  second  issue  is  why  we  believe  that  we  have  been  able  to
persuade  people  to  do  this  technologically  but  not  to  do  the  other,
and  the  truth  is  it  took  us  several  years  to  persuade  people  that
they actually should install this, and the key thing is, unless people
are very good about their passwords, are very good about not shar-
ing  them,  are  very  good  about  not  letting  their  kids  use  their  ma-
chines,  and  a  variety  of  other  problems,  all  of  the  anti-virus,  anti-
spam stuff is ineffective. We have had very good success finally get-
ting  people  to  not  share  their  passwords  and  not  share  their  ma-
chines, and that is purely behavioral influence.

Chairman  GORDON.  I  don’t  want  my  time  to  run  out  here.  You
raised  a  question  that  was  similar  to  Dr.  Sannier,  and  that  is  if
there  is  an  arms  race,  where  does  it  stop?  I  think  to  some  extent
we have seen this with spammers and others, and hopefully as you
say it has been somewhat successful.

Mr. Ikezoye, could you address your thoughts on this arms race?
Mr. IKEZOYE. Yes. Clearly the ingenuity of the people developing
these applications, these peer-to-peer applications, have provided a
real  challenge  technologically  but  just  as  these  networks  have
evolved  from  the  early  days  from  Napster  to  today,  also  our  own
product  continues  to  evolve  as  well.  And  so  I  really  do  think  that
analogy  of  comparing  these  to  the  spam  and  anti-virus  programs
is a good one. In fact, spam and anti-virus both use these registries
of  content,  and  we  use  a  registry  of  content.  It  just  happens  to  be
that we have copyright works in our database.

But  where  I  would,  I  think,  agree  with,  echo  the  panel  is  that
I  think  technology  by  itself  is  never  going  to  be  the  solution  and
that  it  needs  to  be  combined  with  an  educational  process  in  that
two things, technology, as well as education, go a long way towards
influencing  behaviors,  which  is  what  we  have  to  do  to  really  have
an effect on this.

Chairman  GORDON.  And  Dean  Elzy,  one  of  the  things  we  have
heard as we are trying to get information on this is that when try-
ing  to  use  technology  to  reduce  this  illegal  filesharing,  you  really
can’t  install  it  on  every  computer  on  the  campus,  so  that  makes  it
more  expensive  or  more  difficult.  What  has  been  your  experience
in that regard?

Ms. ELZY. We have been looking at technologies that will impact
all  of  our  students  and  all  of  our  faculty  and  staff  as  opposed  to
just  the  residence  halls  and  some  other  areas.  So  we  are  looking
at  more  global  opportunities  to  install  both  filtering  and  education
technologies and software that will take care——

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

Chairman GORDON. Have you found that the vast majority of the

filesharing was from the residence halls?

Ms.  ELZY.  Yes,  we  did.  Some  of  our  early  studies  and  snapshots
that  we  have  been  able  to  do  over  a  period  of  the  last  18  months
have  shown  that  by  far  the  majority  of  the  filesharing  is  done,  in
the residence halls.

Chairman GORDON. I think it was 97 percent.
Ms.  ELZY.  Ninety-seven  percent  of  the  filesharing  that  is  hap-
pening  is  there,  but  only  27,  26  percent  of  the  computers  on  cam-
pus  are  doing  any  filesharing  at  all.  So  it  is  97  percent  of  26  per-
cent.  So  it  is  a  much  smaller  percentage  than  we  expected  to  find.
Chairman  GORDON.  So  that,  again,  if  we  are  playing  hand  gre-
nades,  and  we  know  we  are  not  going  to  get  100  percent,  that
would  be  a  more  economical  way  to  approach  the  problem  for  uni-
versities.

Ms. ELZY. Absolutely.
Chairman GORDON. Thank you, and now I call on Mr. Hall.
Mr.  HALL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  It  seems  to  me  that  the
panel  agrees  substantially  on  a  number  of  important  issues  from
the testimony we have just heard and from the testimony you sub-
mitted.

I would like to take a moment just to make sure I have got that
right. Does everyone agree that technology can’t completely stop pi-
racy?  And  next,  does  everyone  agree  that  notwithstanding  its  im-
perfection, technology can be a part of a comprehensive anti-piracy
policy? I never saw such an agreeable group.

Dr.  Jackson,  in  your  testimony  you  described  the  principle  chal-
lenges  finding  ‘‘the  elusive  right  balance  between  mechanisms  to
protect intellectual property and mechanisms to make it accessible.
Tradeoffs  are  inevitable.’’  So  it  appears  that  the  broader  commu-
nity  has  entered  into  a  number  of  cooperative  projects  on  this,  in-
cluding Dr. Elzy’s Digital Citizen Project and the Joint Higher Edu-
cation and Entertainment Industry Committee.

Dr.  Jackson,  do  you  believe  these  groups  can  provide  the  infor-
mation  your  institution  needs  to  make  informed  decisions  about
comprehensive anti-piracy efforts?

Dr.  JACKSON.  I  believe  they  are  on  the  right  path  to  doing  that.
We participate in the Joint Committee, and that has been a really
useful place to come to common ground, I think. I mean, in a sense
there  has  been  better  discussion  on  the  technological  pieces  than
on  the  educational  pieces.  So  each  of  us  is  doing  our  own  edu-
cational  thing,  and  it  has  been  much  harder  to  find  a  coherent
campaign that we can all do together that will really help students
understand that they are shooting themselves in the foot.

Mr.  HALL.  One  day  you  think  there  will  be  technology  that  will

do that?

Dr. JACKSON. I don’t think there will ever be technology that will
do  it  perfectly.  It  is  interesting.  If  you  look  at  spam  and  viruses,
viruses we have pretty much won the battle against viruses. Spam,
most of us who run large E-mail systems believe we are losing that
battle,  and  that  within  the  next  year  or  two  we  will  have  lost  it
completely.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

Mr. HALL. Do the other panelists agree that vendors, higher edu-
cation,  and  the  entertainment  industry  are  making  some  progress
in this area? Anyone care to comment on that?

Dr. SANNIER. I think that——
Mr. HALL. The progress you are making.
Dr. SANNIER. I think it is clear that we are making a significant
reduction. I think that all the panelists agree that this is an evolv-
ing  issue  that  the  technologies  that  sharers  are  using  will  require
escalating  counter  measures  in  that  arms  race  that  I  referenced,
but  that  also  the  industry  itself  is  making  progress.  Probably  the
most  significant  technological  advance  or  advance  of  any  kind  in
this  area  is  the  introduction  of  the  ability  to  purchase  rights-free
music,  that  meets  consumers’  demands.  That  more  than  anything
else  will  reduce  the  demand  for  illegal  filesharing  by  providing  an
excellent legal alternative.

Mr.  HALL.  Dr.  Elzy,  I  mentioned  you  in  my  question.  What  is

your opinion on the progress that has been made?

Ms.  ELZY.  I  think  there  has  been  a  significant  amount  of
progress,  particularly  because  we  have  been  able  to  talk  to  dif-
ferent  groups  and  get  different  people  to  the  table  that  haven’t
been  before.  I  think  evidence  of  the  improvement  that  we  are  see-
ing is that the entertainment industry itself is taking great strides.
One of the ways that a lot of the monitoring systems will find dig-
ital  files  is  through  some  sort  of  electronic  signature  on  the  file,
and  for  example,  we  have  seen  an  increase  of  40  percent  in  how
many of the files are signatured. The caution here is that the music
industry has gone from 11 percent to 51 percent files found. So we
can only find one out of two illegal file transfers. The electronic file
signatures  for  movies  are  almost  non-existent,  and  you  can’t  stop
what  you  can’t  find.  So  we  are  hoping  that  the  entertainment  in-
dustry  will  continue  its  efforts  to  try  to  individualize  their  files  so
that the tracking systems can actually be more accurate.

And  as  they  become  more  accurate,  then  higher  education  is

going to be much more ready to adopt them.

Mr.  HALL.  You  know,  we  haven’t  talked  about  expense  and  the
cost  of  that  technology.  Maybe  there  is  no  good  comparison  here,
but  15  years  ago  E-Systems,  a  company  that  had  national  and
international  operations,  had  indicated  that  they  had  technology
that could protect our border, but it was too expense. And now here
15 years later they are talking about building a 20-foot wall or put-
ting  the  National  Guard  down  there  to  lock  arms  on  it  and  ques-
tion  what  kind  of  expense  that  is  going  to  take.  And  they  don’t
think  that  is  going  to  be  too  much  if  it  takes  that  to  protect  the
border.  And  do  you  feel  that  we  ought  to  go  to  that  expenditure  if
it  takes  it  to  stop  the  piracy?  I  am  sure  you  all  agree  that  we
should, don’t you? Do you not?

And I am not going to ask you where is the money going to come

from, because I think you all have a good idea about that.

My time is up. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman GORDON. Thank you, Mr. Hall.
Mr. McNerney is recognized.
Mr.  MCNERNEY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  am  afraid  I  am
going to overrun my five minutes, so you will have to hold me back
a little bit here.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

I  thank  the  panel,  I  think  this  is  a  very  fascinating  discussion,
and  there  is  a  lot  to  learn  here.  One  of  the  things  that  Dean  Elzy
said  impacted  me  personally;  my  own  children  were  in  college  re-
cently,  and  then  the  arrests  were  made,  and  that  definitely  makes
an  impression  on  you,  and  so  I  wanted  to  make  sure  today  that  I
get things as straight as I can.

Dr. Wight, I was very impressed with——
Chairman GORDON. I am going to clarify that it wasn’t your kids

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  Oh,  no.  They  weren’t  the  arrested,  thank  good-

that were arrested.

ness.

Dr. Wight, I was very impressed by your approach you are using,
and I think that is probably common here. You are using the tech-
nology to the ability that you can, but you are also using the people
in  responsible  positions  in  your  university  to  make  sure  that  the
law is followed. And that must mean residence monitors and people
at  different  levels—are  they  as  willing  to  participate  in  this,  or  is
there  feedback?  It  seems  like  that  is  an  opportunity  for  abuse  at
some  level  that  would  put  people  at  risk  that  may  not  want  to  be
in that position.

Dr.  WIGHT.  This  activity  is  centered  in  the  university’s  informa-
tion  security  office,  and  we  only  deal  with  about  two  or  three  in-
stances of suspected abuse each week. So it is a part-time task for
one  person  in  our  ISO  office,  and  it  is  not  that  big  a  deal.  So  we
don’t  get  non-technology  people  involved  in  the  process  but  when
something  occurs,  somebody  from  our  ISO  office  goes  and  visits
with  a  student  or  a  computer  user  and  makes  a  detailed  assess-
ment of the situation. And that is really necessary because it is not
possible  to  tell  with  a  100  percent  reliability  if  a  suspected  case  of
copyright abuse was actually legitimate or not.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  Well,  one  of  the  things  you  mentioned  was,  I
think you said two gigabytes. If there is two gigabytes downloaded
in  a  day,  then  that  account  is  identified  in  some  way.  Do  you  stop
the  transfer  of  data  during  the  process,  or  do  you  wait  until  the
process is finished and flag it and then confront the person, or how
does that work?

Dr.  WIGHT.  We  stop  that  process  immediately,  automatically.  It
is  a  network  switch,  and  usually  the  next  day  somebody  from  our
information  security  office  follows  up  with  the  user  to  figure  out
what was going on. There are only two cases that I know of where
we cut off a student’s network access inappropriately. In both cases
they  were  using  voice-over  IP  software  to  talk  with  their  parents
and their grandparents, and what we did was we restored the net-
work  access  and  actually  raised  the  threshold  for  those  two  stu-
dents so it wouldn’t happen again.

Mr. MCNERNEY. Thank you. Dr. Sannier, I am sure I am not pro-
nouncing  your  name  correctly,  but  I  was  interested  in  this  Ruckus
software.  That  is  something  that  is  available  to  the  university  to
download films and music and so on, but Dr. Jackson raised a good
question.  If  you  go  legitimately  to  Microsoft  or  Apple,  you  can’t
share  files.  Does  Ruckus  get  around  that  problem?  Does  it  allow
students to play on different platforms and so on?

Dr.  SANNIER.  All  of  the  services  that  you  subscribe  to,  sir,  have
these liabilities, because digital rights management software is still

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

in  the  cumbersome  stage.  And  so  each  of  these  systems  has  their
own  particular  idiosyncrasies.  So  once  you  have  adopted  a  system,
they  can  service  very  well,  but  we  are  still  not  at  the  stage  where
the services that consumers can purchase or that we can purchase
on behalf of our students are meeting consumer demand. And I am
hopeful that technological advances in the next two years or so will
greatly  reduce  this  problem  by  reducing  the  demand  for  piracy  be-
cause the commercial services will begin to meet the demand.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  So  you  are  doing  a  carrot-and-stick  here,  and
then you are going to put technology in place, you are going to pun-
ish  bad  doers,  and  then  you  are  going  to  offer  something  that  will
work  maybe  as  well  as  illegal,  maybe  better  than  illegal  transfers.
Dr.  SANNIER.  Absolutely.  It  seems  that  that  coordinated  ap-
proach,  I  think  you  see  everyone  on  the  panel  agree  that,  you
know, that is the method by which this problem will get contained
and ultimately solved.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  I  have  got  to  ask  you  a  tech  question  here,  Dr.
Ikezoye.  You  gave  a  pretty  good  explanation  of  why  your  system
doesn’t  interfere  with  bandwidth  and  how  it  works  with  packets.
About  how  many  packets  of  the  initial  transfer  do  you  need  to
make  an  ID,  to  make  sure  that  what  is  being  transferred  is  legal
or not illegal?

Mr. IKEZOYE. The first time we see a file, we need to reconstitute,
reassemble  enough  of  the  file  to  do  the  ID,  which  is  about  20  to
30  seconds  of  a  file,  whether  it  is  a  soundtrack  for  a  movie  or  a
song. But once we do, as I mentioned then we associate that identi-
fication  with  this  ID  number.  It  could  be  like  a  passport  number,
that  then  later  on  we  can  get  after  the  first  or  second  packet  we
could identify that and then block the transfer.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you, Mr. McNerney. And Mr. Feeney,

you are recognized for five minutes.

Mr. FEENEY. Well, and I will thank you, Mr. Chairman, for hav-
ing  this  hearing.  I  am  one  of  at  least  three  members  of  this  Com-
mittee that is also a member of the Judiciary Committee. I can tell
you  that  we  take  property  rights,  especially  intellectual  property
rights very seriously on that committee. We focus on that.

Now, this is the third committee by the way, the Labor and Edu-
cation  Work  Force  Committee  has  held  hearings  on  the  technology
involved  in  the  universities  because  this  is  a  huge  problem,  and
Congress  is  going  to  continue  to  focus  on  it.  I  should  tell  you  that
as an old real estate lawyer, I never tire of pointing out that most
Americans  think  of  property  rights  with  respect  to  the  home  that
they  own,  and  land  that  they  may  own  as  a  business,  but  it  was
only  as  an  afterthought  in  the  Bill  of  Rights  that  the  founding  fa-
thers  got  around  to  memorializing  our  specific  rights  to  hold  our
real  property.  It  was  in  Article  1,  one  of  my  favorite  articles  as  a
Member of Congress, that the founding fathers pointed out the crit-
ical nature of protecting intellectual property.

And while I appreciate the, you know, the panel’s recognizing the
importance of intellectual property and I want to agree with every-
body  that  education  is  key,  but  education  alone  cannot  solve  the
problem. I am disappointed, I guess, to some extent that Dean Elzy
and Dr. Jackson have minimalized the possibilities and the impor-
tance  of  technology  in  this  regard,  because  while  I  am  sure  you

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

educate  your  students,  Dr.  Jackson,  on  the  importance  of  not  com-
mitting robbery or burglary or rape, you also put locks on the door.
And sometimes the only way to help young people learn the impor-
tance  of  respecting  civil  institutions,  some  of  the  responses  you
gave about how you can’t change behavior until you change culture,
et  cetera,  remind  me  when  I  went  to  China  and  pressed  the  issue
of  intellectual  property.  We  have  got  rampant  theft  in  China  and
some other countries around the world.

The  commerce,  the  equivalent  of  our  Commerce  Secretary,  he
was  a  very  brilliant  guy.  I  believe  he  is  educated  in  the  U.S.,  per-
haps even the University of Chicago, because he could have taught
economics.  He  was  a  real  free  market  kind  of  guy.  I  was  very  im-
pressed.  But  his  answer  was  very  similar.  He  said,  you  know,  this
can  be  a  long  process  in  China  because  it  is  going  to  take  us  dec-
ades to change people’s attitudes and behavior.

And  I  guess  the  point  of  all  this  is  to  tell  you  that  the  Judiciary
Committee,  see,  on  a  bipartisan  basis  it  is  not  going  to  be  patient
for  very  long  with  universities  that  haven’t  made  aggressive  steps,
including education, including policy, including technology, whether
you  like  it  or  not.  And  we  are  not  going  to  tell  you  which  tech-
nology  to  use,  but  I  think  I  speak  in  part  for  Chairman  Berman,
who  chairs  the  Intellectual  Property  Subcommittee,  Chris  Cannon,
and many others of us when I tell you that our committee is going
to  be  insistent  that  the  universities,  not  just  because  of  the  theft
involved, but because you are shaping not just academic excellence
for  young  people,  but  also  their  attitude  towards  civil  responsi-
bility, that we are going to be insistent that we reward universities
that are aggressive in this regard. I want to note that, for example,
the University of South Carolina, Michigan State, Howard Univer-
sity,  Seton  Hall,  Ohio  have  adopted  technological  educational,  and
policy  processes  that  have  been  very  successful.  The  University  of
Florida,  my  home  state  by  the  way,  talking  about  the  cost,  brags
about  the  fact  that  implementing  a  technology  that  they  use  has
saved them some $2 million in expanding the broadband that they
had originally intended to do.

So  there  are  potential  savings  for  the  university  networking  op-

portunity when you diminish the theft.

And  I  guess  with  that,  because  I  have  got  a  lot  more  experts  on
the  panel  than  I  have  expertise  in  this  regard,  I  did  want  to  issue
that very important statement. I would ask, you know, perhaps Dr.
Jackson  and  Dr.,  Dean  Elzy,  because  I  did  single  you  out  for  my
disappointment  that  you  hadn’t  emphasized  the  potential  of  tech-
nology here.

I guess I would ask you, give you a slight chance to defend your
positions.  We  are  spending  a  good  deal  of  federal  resources  in
terms of helping universities with their technological improvements
directly  and  indirectly  through  student  funding,  et  cetera.  Is  it  re-
sponsible for a Congress that wants to protect intellectual property
rights  to  continue  to  fund  network  enhancements  for  universities
if some of those enhancements are indirectly being used, in fact, to
promote  intellectual  property  theft,  and  that  would  allow  the  two
of you or whoever else would like to respond.

Dr. JACKSON. Yeah. If I may, I should say the University of Chi-
cago  does  use  technological  means  to  block  things.  We  are  active

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

users  of  firewalls.  There  is  all  kinds  of  traffic  that  we  block  from
off  campus.  Until  Packeteer  failed  on  us  we  used  Packeteer  very
heavily to turn these things down. So we used technological means
to the extent we can.

And  I  should  also  be  clear.  I  mean,  my  job  is  to  make  sure  that
our network is maximally available so that we do the best teaching
and  research  we  can.  There  is  all  kinds  of  other  use  that  is  going
to happen with unused cycles, but any time other use starts inter-
fering with research and teaching, I am not doing my job.

The  key  thing  is  that  the  technologies  that  we  use  to  keep  the
interfering stuff from happening have to also not interfere with the
critical  stuff.  So  when  Packeteer  failed  on  us,  for  example,  it
caused  all  of  our  commodity  Internet,  the  regular  Internet  traffic
to stop working, and it took us awhile to figure out what was going
wrong and to pull the Packeteers out. But this is the kind of trade-
off that is very difficult.

So  this  is  a  very  important  technology  for  us.  We  really  need  it
to work, but it needs to work in such a way, this is my point about
tradeoffs, that it doesn’t tread over into throwing the baby out with
the bathwater, if you will. If I gave the impression that we are not
fans  of  using  technology  to  do  effective  screening,  we  absolutely
are,  but  I  do  believe  that  at  this  point  the  technological  means
available  to  us  aren’t  going  to  get  this  job  done.  And  that  we  need
to go way beyond that, and if we rely on the technology alone, that
we are not going to get anywhere.

Ms.  ELZY.  I,  too,  would  like  to  share  that  we  believe  that  tech-
nology  is  a  part  of  the  answer,  but  it  is  not  the  total  answer,  and
if  we  rely  on  technology  too  much,  we  are  going  to  be  interfering
with the legal uses of peer-to-peer technology and some of the edu-
cational activities that we have going on on the campus. For exam-
ple,  there  is  a  lot  of  filesharing  that  happens  through  the  course
of  distance  education.  There  are  a  lot  of  my  own  library  files  that
are digital in nature and may use the distribution technologies that
are  available  to  use  today.  I  would  like  to  not  have  those  blocked.
We  believe  that  education  can  have  an  impact  but  only  in  part-
nership with all the other things that we have been talking about.
And  part  of  the  technology  solution  is  getting  legal  digital  media
services  up  and  available  and  comprehensively  usable.  Approxi-
mately  67  percent  of  our  incoming  high  school  seniors,  college
freshmen  bring  iPods  with  them,  but  Ruckus  doesn’t  work  with
iPods. So you have a group of students who are disenfranchised un-
less  they  switch  over  to  a  different  MP–3  player  or  you  offer  them
multiple services.

And  when  I  was  sitting  in  a  focus  group  with  a  number  of  stu-
dents, and I asked them after they had given a presentation on ille-
gal  sites  and  how  the  students  use  it,  everybody  does  it,  that  kind
of  thing,  I  asked  them  to  name  a  legal  media  service  for  me,  and
they couldn’t name one. So there is a huge marketing and business
opportunity  here  to  get  these  into  the  knowledge  base  of  the  stu-
dents.  They  said  they  would  use  the  legal  services  if  they  knew
what they were, if the music was free, and if it had the tunes that
they wanted.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you,  Dean.  Mr.  Feeney,  we  are  going
to let you join us or join Mr. Sensenbrenner on the next committee,
our next panel.

Mr. Wilson is recognized for five minutes.
Mr.  WILSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Just  a  question  broadly
but I understand that Ohio University, which is in my district, has
recently  implemented  some  innovative  procedures  to  fight  illegal
filesharing.  How  much  do  universities  communicate  with  each
other in regard to resolving these kind of problems?

And  secondly,  have  you  set  up  any  formal  pathways  of  commu-

nication to do your plan for in the future?

Dr. JACKSON. Well, here I am at the end. The answer is we com-
municate extensively on all kinds of issues, but this has been very,
I  mean,  security,  research  computing,  filesharing  have  been  very
high  on  all  of  our  lists  for  awhile.  To  tick  off  a  few  of  the  mecha-
nisms,  the  Joint  Committee  that  was  mentioned  several  times  al-
ready  has  been  a  really  effective  compact  medium,  I  mean,  a  few
of us sitting in a room, EDUCAUSE, which is the umbrella organi-
zation, and Higher Education has a whole set of activities designed.
I  mean,  if  you  look  at  the  program,  there  is  a  huge  fall  conference
where  everybody  goes.  So  there  is  a  lot  of  the  program  and  a  lot
of the side conversations that are about this.

We trade notes all the time.
Mr. WILSON. Good.
Dr. JACKSON. And this is really important, because it is the only
way  that  you  learn,  I  mean,  to  take  the  Chairman’s  point  earlier,
one way for us to find out if things work is to sort of try them. The
other  is  I  can  go  to  one  of  our  peers  that  is  very  similar  to  us  and
see  what  they  have  done,  and  if  they  have  succeeded,  I  am  going
to adopt that. And we do these kinds of things all the time.

So it is a lot of communication about the technological opportuni-
ties  and  limits,  and  there  is  an  increasing  amount  of  communica-
tion  about  whether  it  is  poster  campaigns  or  other  kinds  of  edu-
cational campaigns that we can do.

One interesting comment, I am not sure I should make this com-
ment, but I will anyway. In terms of enforcement, one of the prob-
lems we have is that we will, you know, we have a set of students
who have gotten into trouble doing this. And one of the things that
is useful to make a point is to make sure the rest of the community
knows that folks have gotten in trouble doing this. So public hang-
ings, if you will.

And  here  curiously  enough  we  run  into  the  Family  Educational
Records  and  Privacy  Act,  which  is  a  federal  law  that  says  we  can-
not  disclose  this  kind  of  thing  publicly.  My  hope  very  often  is  that
a  student  who  we  busted  and  put  through  the  process  will  go  to
our  student  newspaper  and  complain,  because  then  the  student
newspaper  will  publish  it,  and  we  get  exactly  what  we  want.  But
it  is  this  curious  game  we  have  to  play  to  try  to  sort  of  prod  them
to ask us a question.

Mr.  WILSON.  It  is  a  difficult  situation,  and  we  feel  badly  about
what  has  happened  in  Ohio.  We  had  a  situation  like  this  a  couple
of years ago where even some Social Security numbers of alums got
out, and it was a real difficult situation. So I was just hopeful that
the communication was going on between the universities, that we

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

didn’t  not  apply  ourselves  to  make  sure  that  everybody  was  going
to be safe from it.

That is all I have, Mr. Chairman. Thank you.
Chairman GORDON. Thank you, Mr. Wilson.
And Dr. Gingrey is recognized for five minutes.
Mr. GINGREY. Mr. Chairman, thank you. I wish our legal experts,
our  attorneys,  were  still  here,  but  since  I  am  around  Mr.  Feeney,
maybe  he  could  answer  this  question  for  me.  I  am  old  enough  to
remember  as  a  kid  that  you  wouldn’t  buy  all  the  comic  books  on
the  shelf.  You  would  just  buy  maybe  ten  or  15  or  20  of  them,  and
when  you  got  through  reading  them,  you  would  swap  those  with
the  kid  across  the  street  for  the  20  that  he  or  she  had  that  you
didn’t  have.  And  I  don’t  know  really  when  you  cut  right  to  the
chase how different that is from sharing these music files.

And I say that but at the same time I am a real stickler and firm
believer in the rule of law and warning youngsters as Ms. Elzy and
Dr.  Jackson  said,  that  you  probably  can’t  completely  solve  this
problem  technologically,  and  of  course,  you  all  raised  your  hands
and  agreed  to  that,  and  there  needs  to  be  some  balance.  And  I
truly  believe  if  you  can  scare  the  bejeezus  out  of  them  and  show
what  could  happen  if  they  are  guilty  of  stealing  intellectual  prop-
erty,  and  appeal  to  their  sense  of  fairness  and  fair  play,  of  course,
I think in your testimony, Ms. Elzy, you had said that some of the
kids  come  to  arrive  at  the  college  campus  as  freshmen  having  in-
volved,  engaged  and  steal  intellectual  property  since  the  third
grade, kind of like me and the comic books of 50 years ago.

So I don’t know exactly how you get to that, so these comments,
of  course,  are  not  in  the  form  of  a  question.  You  might  want,  any
one  of  the  five  of  you,  might  want  to  comment  on  that,  but  in  re-
gard  to  a  specific  question,  and  Dr.  Wight,  this  was  that  fair  use
issue, in your testimony you highlighted the exemption of copyright
for certain non-profit education purposes.

I  would  like  for  you  or  any  of  you  to  elaborate  on  how  copy-
righted  works  are  used  in  course  work  on  your  campus,  and  if  the
other  witness  would  like  to  discuss  that  as  well  that  would  be
great.

Dr. WIGHT. So we do use a lot of copyrighted work on our campus
for  teaching  purposes  and  research  purposes,  and  the  Doctrine  of
Fair  Use  gives  us  the  limited  right  to  do  that  free  of  charge.  We
can  only  do  it  with  portions  of  work,  and  we  have  to  restrict  it  to
non-profit,  educational  activities,  but  we  derive  huge  benefits  from
the Doctrine of Fair Use in that respect.

More recently the TEACH Act has given us the ability to use dig-
ital  copyrighted  works  in  our  teaching,  in  our  classes,  and  again,
there  are  limitations  to  what  we  can  do,  there  are  responsibilities
that we have to live up to in terms of educating students about the
copyright and how the use is limited in teaching. We have to pass-
word protect the digital files so that they can’t be released.

So  we  have  a  lot  of  responsibilities  to  live  up  to,  but  as  long  as
we  live  within  the  rules,  then  we  are  allowed  great  latitude  in
using  these  materials  for  teaching.  And  it  would  be  very,  very  dif-
ficult to get along without it.

Dr.  SANNIER.  I  would  just  like  to  echo  Dr.  Wight’s  emphasis  on
how  important  fair  use  is  to  scholarly  activity  of  all  kinds.  And  I

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

think  this  is  why  this  is  such  a  particularly  important  issue,  that
if we were to allow stringent enforcement of copyright to erode fair
use, the country as a whole would be much the worse for it.

And so these are complicated issues because to a kid who is look-
ing at the digital filesharing, it does feel like, well, I am just shar-
ing it with my friends, but fair use is when you share it with your
friends  and  family,  not  your  million  closest  friends.  Because  it  is
kind  of  hard  to  categorize  a  million  closest  friends,  and  this  is  the
challenge  that  all  of  you  face  in  drafting  law  that  keeps  pace  with
this changing technology.

So, again, the weapon that we have is the commercial sector. The

market ultimately will manage this for us.

Mr.  GINGREY.  And  I  guess  my  comic  book  analogy  breaks  down
when  it  is  just  a  kid  across  the  street,  and  now  this  technology
would  allow  the  sharing  with  a  million  kids  across  the  street.  So
I do understand that point. Yeah.

Chairman,  I  didn’t  have  any  other  questions.  I  will  be  glad  to

yield back at this time.

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you,  Dr.  Gingrey,  and  I  will  remind
you  that  you  can  also  share  your  LPs  with  folks  across  the  street,
too.

Before  we  bring  this  committee  hearing  to  a  close,  I  want  to
thank our witnesses. It has been a very informative hearing. It has
been  televised,  so  there  are  a  lot  more  folks  that  are  listening  to
this  than  are  up  here  today,  and  our  staff  is  all  listening,  so  we
want  to  thank  you.  I  want  to  let  you  know  that  for  any  remaining
or additional statements from Members and answers to any follow-
up questions, the record will be open.

And the witnesses are excused. Thank you.
[Whereupon, at 3:20 p.m., the Committee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(53)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Charles  A.  Wight,  Associate  Vice  President  for  Academic  Affairs  and

Undergraduate Studies, University of Utah, Salt Lake City

Questions submitted by Chairman Bart Gordon
Q1. Have  you  had  any  complaints  from  faculty  or  students  about  any  of  the  tech-
nologies  you  are  using  to  reduce  illegal  filesharing?  Were  these  complaints  re-
lated  to  traffic-shaping  systems  (such  as  Packeteer’s  PacketShaper)  or  network-
filter  systems  (such  as  Audible  Magic’s  CopySense  Appliance)?  Has  the  use  of
these technologies blocked any legitimate filesharing or interfered with any edu-
cational or research work on the campus network?

A1. To the best of my knowledge, there have been only two incidents at the Univer-
sity of Utah in which student use of our campus network was temporarily disrupted
as a result of using the network for legitimate purposes. Both instances were cases
in which the student was using voice over IP services from the residence halls, and
exceeded our bandwidth threshold for automatic termination of network services. In
both cases, network services were restored and the threshold limits raised to accom-
modate  the  legitimate  activities.  There  have  been  no  complaints  from  faculty  or
staff, and no disruption of any educational or research work on the campus network.
Q2. Was the use of Audible Magic’s network-filter system controversial on your cam-
pus?  For  example,  were  staff  and  students  concerned  about  privacy,  academic
freedom, or that such systems would slow down your network? Were any of these
concerns borne out once the technologies were installed?

A2. Our use of Audible Magic’s CopySense appliance is limited to the local area net-
work serving the student residence halls, so faculty and research use is unaffected.
The  use  of  the  software  was  not  controversial,  and  there  have  been  no  complaints
about  abridgments  of  academic  freedom.  The  reduction  in  network  traffic  has  actu-
ally led to a significant speedup of the network for legitimate uses.
Q3. About  how  much  does  your  university  spend  on  anti-spam,  anti-virus,  and  fire-
wall  software  per  year?  How  does  this  compare  with  what  you  spend  on  tech-
nologies to reduce illegal filesharing?

A3. For  centralized  network  and  e-mail  services,  the  university  spends  in  excess  of
$50,000  per  year  on  anti-spam,  anti-virus  and  firewall  software  each  year.  In  con-
trast, we spend approximately $7500 per year for the Audible Magic CopySense ap-
pliance.  The  network  bandwidth  monitoring  and  reporting  software  that  we  use  to
identify  high-bandwidth  users  was  created  by  University  of  Utah  staff.  We  would
use  this  capability  even  in  the  absence  of  a  filesharing  problem,  so  it  does  not  rep-
resent an added cost of reducing filesharing activities.
Q4. What  is  your  estimate  of  the  cost  savings  to  your  campus  from  the  reduction  in
copyright  notices  since  installing  these  technologies?  Could  you  provide  us  with
an estimate of the amount of time and money required to respond to one of these
copyright abuse notices?

A4. It  takes  1–2  hours  of  staff  time  in  our  Information  Security  Office  to  respond
to  each  DMCA  copyright  abuse  complaint  received.  Since  implementing  the  use  of
the  CopySense  appliance,  we  have  experienced  a  90  percent  drop  in  the  number  of
complaints, which translates directly to a savings of approximately $70,000 per year
in  staff  salary  and  benefits  costs.  In  addition,  the  reduction  in  network  bandwidth
costs in the first year saved the university an estimated $1.2M. Network bandwidth
charges  have  decreased  over  time,  and  it  is  not  possible  to  project  the  increase  in
filesharing activity that might have occurred in the absence of CopySense. However,
a rough estimate of our savings would be in the neighborhood of $1M per year.

Questions submitted by Representative Ralph M. Hall
Q1. Dr. Wight’s testimony highlights the exemption of copyright for certain nonprofit
education  purposes.  Please  elaborate  on  how  copyrighted  works  are  used  in
course  work  on  your  campus.  Does  your  university  employ  specific  software  to
allow  educational  use  without  risking  broader  distribution?  What  is  the  scope
of this type of fair use on your campus and how can educational fair use be dif-
ferentiated from infringing traffic?

A1. Portions of copyrighted works are used routinely under the doctrine of Fair Use
for  educational  purposes  in  classes  throughout  the  campus.  Usually,  this  takes  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

form of excerpts of published articles or books used to illustrate a concept or to serve
as  the  focus  of  a  class  discussion.  Our  Marriott  Library  operates  a  digital  reserve
section  where  students  can  access  some  of  these  materials  electronically.  In  addi-
tion, some copyrighted materials are used in online classes taught over the Internet.
Electronic  access  to  these  materials  is  limited  to  students  in  particular  classes  for
limited periods of time, in accordance with the TEACH Act. The Fair Use of a copy-
righted  work  for  educational  purposes  is  normally  limited  to  only  a  portion  of  the
work.  Therefore,  when  access  to  the  entire  work  is  desired,  the  university  obtains
the permission of the copyright owner. The Marriott Library uses a variety of tech-
nologies  designed  to  limit  access  to  copyrighted  works  in  accordance  with  licensing
agreements and applicable law. These include restricting access to digital resources
by IP domain, university network ID/password authentication, and authorization ac-
cording to particular classes for which students are registered.
Q2. Many of the witnesses described their support for offering students ‘‘a legitimate
online  service,  one 
illegal
filesharing.’’  Does  your  university  offer  this  service  to  their  students?  If  so,  how
many  students  use  this  product  and  what  feedback  have  you  received  from
them? If not, has your university considered their use before? What are the prin-
cipal factors that affect the decision to provide legal alternatives?

inexpensive  alternative 

that  provides  an 

to 

A2. The University of Utah has considered the possibility of contracting with a com-
mercial  service  for  providing  low-cost  access  to  music  and  video  files.  However,  it
has  no  plans  to  expend  state  funds  or  tuition  revenues  to  subsidize  a  service  like
this in the near future.

Questions submitted by Representative Michael McCaul
Q1. Do you believe that the availability of a certain technology should automatically
legitimize  the  activity  undertaken  on  it?  In  preparing  students  for  an  increas-
ingly  technological  world,  does  it  help  or  hurt  them  when  they  are  not  ade-
quately punished for abusing the school’s network and computing resources and
privileges?

A1. History shows that advances in technology have consistently outpaced advances
in  societal  norms  governing  the  ethical  use  of  those  advances.  Because  university
research  is  at  the  forefront  of  knowledge  in  nearly  all  fields,  every  university  has
a  strong  mandate  to  educate  its  students  and  the  general  public  about  the  ethical
uses  of  new  technologies  (e.g.,  cloning,  stem  cell  research,  peer-to-peer  filesharing,
electronic  surveillance,  etc.).  It  is  only  by  educating  our  community  about  the  legal
and  ethical  limits  to  the  use  of  technology,  and  by  backing  up  that  education  with
appropriate  sanctions  for  abusing  the  limits,  that  we  can  keep  the  growth  of  tech-
nology and social norms in balance with each other.
Q2. Is  it  appropriate  for  taxpayers  to  fund  school  networks  that  are  widely  used  to
facilitate  theft?  Is  it  appropriate  for  school  networks—created  and  intended  for
academic use—to be slowed and clogged by illegal activity?

A2. No.  It  is  in  the  best  interests  of  universities  to  optimize  the  use  of  their  net-
works  to  discourage  illegal  and  unethical  activities  and  to  facilitate  legitimate  uses
for education and research.
Q3. We  have  heard  that  technological  measures  exist  that  reduce  or  prevent  illegal
filesharing,  reduce  the  network  bandwidth  wasted  by  such  activity,  secure  the
network against viruses and spyware, and decrease the amount of time spent by
administrators responding to infringement notices. Doesn’t the cost benefit of ad-
dressing  these  problems  justify  the  cost  of  implementing  effective  network  tech-
nology?  If  not,  what  type  of  analysis  have  you  used  to  arrive  at  your  decision?
A3. The  cost  of  eliminating  all  illegal  activities  on  any  network  would  be  prohibi-
tively  high,  and  it  would  raise  the  cost  of  higher  education  beyond  the  reach  of
many  students.  At  the  same  time,  the  cost  of  doing  nothing  is  also  high,  because
it  would  encourage  illegal  uses  of  our  campus  networks  that  would  otherwise  be
available  for  education  and  research.  The  sweet  spot  lies  somewhere  in  the  middle,
by making appropriate expenditures for technologies that reduce undesirable or ille-
gal  network  activities  (e.g.,  spam,  viruses  and  illegal  filesharing)  to  acceptable  lev-
els. Currently, we have spent a modest amount of money ($7500/year) to reduce ille-
gal filesharing by about 90 percent. The administrative burden of responding to in-
fringement  notices  is  currently  low  (2–4  hr/week),  so  we  believe  that  our  efforts  to
reduce the problem have been largely successful.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

Q4. Rather than purchasing a commercially available technology, some schools, such
as  Ohio  University  have  used  internal  technological  solutions  to  block  some  or
all of the illegal music, movies, and software on their networks. Ohio University
went  a  step  beyond  blocking  illegal  peer-to-peer  programs  and  shut  down  a
‘‘darknet,’’ which is a private hub that allows students to trade music and mov-
ies on the local area network without connecting to the wider Internet. What type
of  action  has  your  university  taken  to  address  the  issues  of  darknets  operating
on your internal system? What are some of the solutions to finding and shutting
down darknets?

A4. All areas of the University of Utah network are continuously monitored for un-
usually  high  bandwidth  activity,  so  this  type  of  activity  would  likely  be  detected
even if files were not exchanged with other computers outside the campus gateway.
The  Audible  Magic  CopySense  appliance  is  operated  in  the  portion  of  the  network
serving  student  residence  halls,  so  any  registered  music  or  video  files  shared  be-
tween computers even inside the network would be detected and blocked. Therefore,
the  solution  implemented  at  the  University  of  Utah  would  likely  identify  and  stop
any illegal filesharing, even on a ‘‘darknet’’ portion of the campus network.
Q5. Campus  officials  at  Stanford  University  wrote  a  letter  to  students  last  month
saying  ‘‘Keeping  up  with  the  number  of  filesharing  complaints  coming  in  under
the  DMCA  has  required  almost  three  full-time  Stanford  employees.’’  How  much
time and resources did your institution spend on DMCA notices each year before
implementing a technological solution? How much time does your staff spend on
notices now that you’ve adopted a technological solution? What caused your Uni-
versity to take proactive steps?

A5. We  currently  respond  to  approximately  2–3  DMCA  copyright  infringement  no-
tices  per  week,  which  requires  about  2–4  hr/week  for  a  single  employee.  Prior  to
adoption of our technology solution, we received about 10 times as many complaints,
which required at least one full-time employee to handle. The proactive steps to re-
duce illegal filesharing activities were taken for three main reasons: 1) to bring stu-
dents and all members of our university community into compliance with acceptable
network  use  policy  and  the  law,  and  to  educate  them  on  the  values  of  respecting
copyrights; 2) to reduce the cost of university network resources by eliminating ille-
gal  high-bandwidth  activities;  and  3)  to  reduce  expenditures  on  personnel  required
to respond to DMCA infringement notices.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Adrian Sannier, Vice President and University Technology Officer, Ari-

zona State University

Questions submitted by Chairman Bart Gordon
Q1. Did  your  campus  first  test  the  Audible  Magic  network-filter  system  before  mak-

ing a final purchase? Was there a cost associated with this initial testing?

A1. Yes we did test the system prior to purchase. There was no cost to the univer-
sity during the testing phase.
Q2. You  have  mentioned  that  your  technical  team  was  initially  skeptical  about  the
Audible  Magic  network-filter  system.  What  were  their  primary  concerns?  Did
these prove to be well-founded?

A2. The  technology  to  identify  and  block  ONLY  copyrighted  and  otherwise  illegal
activity  is  very  complex.  There  was  skepticism  that  the  Audible  Magic  platform
could really do this efficiently. There were some initial performance issues with the
platform  due  to  the  high  volume  of  traffic  at  such  a  large  university.  These  issues
were resolved and the system is now performing well.
Q3. Have  you  experienced  any  significant  technical  problems  since  you  began  using
the  Audible  Magic  network-filter  system?  In  terms  of  reducing  the  demand  for
network bandwidth, had it saved your campus money, or do you anticipate that
it will?

A3. ASU has not experienced any significant technical problems since implementing
the  Audible  Magic  network-filter  system.  During  the  few  weeks  the  system  was  in
production  during  the  spring  semester,  ASU’s  overall  bandwidth  utilization  to  the
Internet was reduced by about eight percent (48mb).
Q4. Since  installing  the  Audible  Magic  network-filter  system,  have  your  copyright-
violation  notices  decreased?  If  so,  by  how  much?  What  is  your  estimate  of  the
cost  savings  to  your  campus  from  any  reduction  in  copyright  notices  since  in-
stalling  these  technologies?  How  much  time  and  money  is  required  to  respond
to one of these copyright abuse notices?

A4. Since  installing  the  Audible  Magic  network-filter  system,  the  number  of  copy-
right-violation  notices  has  decreased  dramatically.  ASU  went  from  247  incidents
from  January  through  April  of  this  year,  down  to  37  during  the  May/June  time-
frame.  Usually  the  incidents  occurred  upwards  of  a  month  previously.  There  were
cost savings in a number of areas due to this implementation:

1. University Technology Office Help Desk—significant reduction in time being
spent  processing  violations  through  the  ASU  system.  Reduction  from  45
hours  of  staff  time  to  10  hours  of  staff  time  which  equates  to  a  savings  of
∼$875 over two months already.

2. Student Affairs Office—significant reduction in time and resources necessary
to  address  student  violations.  The  staff  in  student  affairs  must  bring  in  the
student  to  explain  the  issue  and  instruct  them  on  good  security  and  copy-
right protection practices.

3. University  Technology  Office  Network  Communications—reduction  in  band-
width indirect cost of approximately $8,500 per year. However no direct cost
savings  have  been  realized  as  we  commit  to  a  minimum  amount  of  band-
width per year; our cost per mb is based on that commitment.

Q5. About  how  much  does  your  university  spend  on  anti-spam,  anti-virus,  and  fire-
wall  software  per  year?  How  does  this  compare  with  what  you  spend  on  tech-
nologies to reduce illegal filesharing?

A5. ASU  spends  approximately  $80,000  annually  for  anti-virus.  Anti-spam  we  are
using Barracuda Networks devices that total $50,000 for purchase with minimal an-
nual  expense,  and  finally  we  have  approximately  50  firewall  pairs  with  an  annual
investment  of  around  $150,000.  The  Audible  Magic  devices  to  prevent  illegal
filesharing  cost  $100,000  to  purchase  with  approximately  $10,000  annual  expense.

Questions submitted by Representative Ralph M. Hall
Q1. Dr. Wight’s testimony highlights the exemption of copyright for certain nonprofit
education  purposes.  Please  elaborate  on  how  copyrighted  works  are  used  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

course  work  on  your  campus.  Does  your  university  employ  specific  software  to
allow  educational  use  without  risking  broader  distribution?  What  is  the  scope
of this type of fair use on your campus and how can educational fair use be dif-
ferentiated from infringing traffic?

A1. Course  material  access  is  restricted  to  students  officially  enrolled.  All  access  is
technically secured through a single sign-on authenticated I.D. Materials utilized by
individual  instructors  are  subject  to  fair  use/copyright  provisions.  Student  redis-
tribution  of  course  material  is  regulated  by  the  acceptable  use  policy  of  the  univer-
sity.

Instructors  are  provided  copyright  clearance  and  assessment  of  material  use
through  the  University  libraries  resource  reserve,  central  distributed  education
staff, and college-based support staff.
Q2. Many of the witnesses described their support for offering students ‘‘a legitimate
online  service,  one 
illegal
filesharing.’’  Does  your  university  offer  this  service  to  their  students?  If  so,  how
many  students  use  this  product  and  what  feedback  have  you  received  from
them? If not, has your university considered their use before? What are the prin-
ciple factors that affect the decision to provide legal alternatives?

inexpensive  alternative 

that  provides  an 

to 

A2. ASU offers Ruckus on campus and iTunes (among other services) are available
via  download  from  the  Internet.  There  are  currently  7,467  ASU  users  that  have
Ruckus accounts.

Questions submitted by Representative Michael McCaul
Q1. Do you believe that the availability of a certain technology should automatically
legitimize  the  activity  undertaken  on  it?  In  preparing  students  for  an  increas-
ingly  technological  world,  does  it  help  or  hurt  them  when  they  are  not  ade-
quately punished for abusing the school’s network and computing resources and
privileges?

A1. Changes  in  technology  put  pressure  on  established  markets  and  ways  of  deliv-
ering products. As we have seen, it also puts pressure on our definitions of intellec-
tual  property.  I  think  students  must  be  prepared  to  help  the  companies  they  will
one  day  join  to  adapt  to  and  take  advantage  of  these  changes  to  create  value  and
maintain  economic  viability.  However,  ethics  training  in  all  its  forms  is  an  impor-
tant  component  of  higher  education,  and  a  solid  grounding  in  the  value  of  intellec-
tual  property  protections  to  the  society  that  grants  them  is  an  important  part  of
that training.
Q2. Is  it  appropriate  for  taxpayers  to  fund  school  networks  that  are  widely  used  to
facilitate  theft?  Is  it  appropriate  for  school  networks—created  and  intended  for
academic use—to be slowed and clogged by illegal activity?

A2. Clearly  the  academic  networks  run  by  universities  must  be  focused  on  the  le-
gitimate  purposes  for  which  they  were  created.  ASU  has  been  successful  in  man-
aging our network to ensure that it is not ‘‘slowed or clogged’’ in any way by illegal
activity  (copyright  infringement).  ASU’s  network  operations  are  threatened  much
more by Spam and Denial of Service attacks.
Q3. We  have  heard  that  technological  measures  exist  that  reduce  or  prevent  illegal
filesharing,  reduce  the  network  bandwidth  wasted  by  such  activity,  secure  the
network against viruses and spyware, and decrease the amount of time spent by
administrators responding to infringement notices. Doesn’t the cost benefit of ad-
dressing  these  problems  justify  the  cost  of  implementing  effective  network  tech-
nology?  If  not,  what  type  of  analysis  have  you  used  to  arrive  at  your  decision?
A3. At  this  stage  we  have  not  observed  that  the  network  bandwidth  recovered  off-
sets the cost of the Audible Magic solution we have implemented. It is possible that
it may in the future, but it is also possible that the solution we have used may not
keep  pace  with  the  rapid  technical  evolution  of  the  sharing  services,  in  which  case
we may be forced to invest in further counter-measures.
Q4. Rather than purchasing a commercially available technology, some schools, such
as  Ohio  University,  have  used  internal  technological  solutions  to  block  some  or
all of the illegal music, movies, and software on their networks. Ohio University
went  a  step  beyond  blocking  illegal  peer-to-peer  programs  and  shut  down  a
‘‘darknet,’’ which is a private hub that allowed students to trade music and mov-
ies on the local area network without connecting to the wider Internet. What type
of  action  has  your  university  taken  to  address  the  issue  of  darknets  operating

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

on your internal system? What are some of the solutions to finding and shutting
down darknets?

A4. In  addition  to  commercially  available  technology  such  as  Audible  Magic,  ASU
uses  firewall  rules  to  prevent  unauthorized  servers  on  the  network.  Students  are
prohibited from connecting any external networking equipment to the ASU network
this includes wireless access points; thus restricting using the ASU network for this
type  of  behavior.  The  Cisco  Network  Access  Control  system  prevents  students  from
putting unauthorized devices into the network. The networking tools help us to eas-
ily notice a rough device for Wireless.
Q5. Campus  officials  at  Stanford  University  wrote  a  letter  to  students  last  month
saying  ‘‘Keeping  up  with  the  number  of  filesharing  complaints  coming  in  under
the  DMCA  has  required  almost  three  full-time  Stanford  employees.’’  How  much
time and resources did your institution spend on DMCA notices each year before
implementing a technological solution? How much time does your staff spend on
notices now that you’ve adopted a technological solution? What caused your uni-
versity to take proactive steps?

A5. The primary reason for investigating Audible Magic is the time savings in this
area.  This  time  savings  is  not  only  for  the  University  Technology  Office  but  also
Student  Affairs.  The  UTO  Help  Desk  required  at  least  two  hours  or  more  to  track
down  the  user;  complicated  incidents  would  require  Netcom  or  Server  support  as-
sistance.  Once  identified,  Student  Affairs  staff  the  identified  party  and  conduct
training classes to instruct the students on correct behavior.

At the rate the incidents were occurring for January through April we would have
been on target to address approximately 1,000 incidents over the year. That means
at  the  minimum  there  would  have  been  500  Help  Desk  Hours  +  1,000  Student  Af-
fairs hours + any additional Netcom staff hours. With the implementation of the de-
vice  we  have  already  seen  a  greater  than  three-fourths  drop  in  the  number  of  inci-
dents. The Audible Magic device may not catch every offense but it is greatly reduc-
ing  the  issues.  We  will  have  better  numbers  after  the  students  return  in  the  fall.
ASU has been taking proactive steps in this area since it became an issue in the
beginning  of  the  decade.  It  has  required  steady  investments  of  time  and  resources,
and our counter measures have had to evolve in complexity and sophistication.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

Responses by Vance Ikezoye, President and CEO, Audible Magic Corporation

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Questions submitted by Chairman Bart Gordon
Q1. How much does it cost to install and maintain the Audible Magic network-filter
system  at  an  average  campus?  After  installing  a  system,  do  you  continue  work-
ing with the customer to upgrade and update the system over time?

A1. The cost of our system consists of two parts: the initial purchase of the system
and annual charges.

The  initial  purchase  price  of  our  system  ranges  in  price  and  is  based  upon  the
bandwidth  of  the  network  it  is  installed  upon.  Thus  smaller  universities  generally
pay less. This price can be as little as a few thousand dollars to one hundred thou-
sand  dollars  or  more.  The  installation  at  one  of  the  largest  enrollment  universities
in  the  U.S.  was  around  one  hundred  thousand  dollars.  Our  average  sale  to  univer-
sities is around twenty five to thirty five thousand dollars. In addition, some schools
can  reduce  the  cost  by  implementing  the  system  on  just  the  parts  of  the  network
which are the focus of the piracy problem - for example, on-campus housing.

The annual charge is made up of two components: The educational module of our
system,  which  is  optional,  is  priced  by  the  number  of  users,  with  the  annual  cost
between  seventy  five  cents  and  two  dollars  per  user.  Secondly  we  charge  a  support
fee  for  the  customer  technical  support,  hardware  support,  software  updates,  and  a
subscription to access our content, of approximately twenty three percent of the sys-
tem purchase price. Thus a fifty thousand dollar system would have an eleven thou-
sand five hundred dollar annual support fee.
Q2. Some  universities  have  argued  that  technologies  like  Audible  Magic’s  will  fail
on high-performance campus networks. Do you agree with this technical assess-
ment? If your technology in its current state would not operate on high-perform-
ance networks, is it likely to improve in the near future so that it will?

A2. Clearly,  high  performance  networks  on  campuses  pose  increased  challenges
from  the  level  of  speed,  complexity,  and  management  sophistication,  but  we  have
demonstrated our ability to handle a wide variety of customer networks with diverse
network  environments.  As  mentioned  we  have  our  systems  in  use  on  over  seventy
schools including some very large public universities.

Addressing  the  question  more  directly,  the  general  concern  of  high  performance
network  failures  tends  to  focus  on  the  issue  of  scalability.  In  order  to  address
scalability,  we  simply  deploy  higher  capacity  hardware  systems  on  the  high  speeds
networks  of  some  campuses.  This  hardware  is  readily  available  and  can  be  config-
ured  to  handle  the  high  speeds.  The  second  related  issue  concerns  what  happens
if our product fails, does it have a detrimental impact on the network? As mentioned
previously,  our  system  is  not  an  inline  device.  Because  it  is  not  inline,  the  failure
of the system will not negatively effect the stability of the network.

With  respect  to  the  future,  we  feel  very  confident  with  our  ability  to  not  only  to
handle  existing  networks  but  for  our  technology  and  products’  ability  to  keep  pace
with the increases in network bandwidth anticipated in the future.
Q3. The  majority  of  U.S.  campuses  already  use  traffic-shaping  technologies  to  con-
trol their network bandwidth. How is this technology different from network-fil-
ter technologies such as yours, and why is it not always effective at stopping ille-
gal filesharing alone?

A3. At  a  lower  level,  we  share  a  lot  of  technology  with  traffic  shaping  products.
Traffic  shaping  devices  are  able  to  identify  data  streams  by  application,  i.e.,  they
know  the  difference  between  e-mail,  web  traffic,  or  peer-to-peer  filesharing  applica-
tions. Our system does that but goes one step further. Our system is able to recon-
struct the payloads of the transmissions for filesharing applications. These payloads
are  files  such  as  music  or  movies.  Upon  reassembly  and  identification  of  the  files
as  copyright  media  files,  we  are  able  to  match  the  unknown  file  with  our  copy-
righted content registry.

The  reason  that  traffic  shaping  solutions  are  not  always  effective,  is  that  peer  to
peer  filesharing  applications  are  constantly  evolving  and  require  a  dedicated  focus
to  keep  up.  Because  our  product  is  focused  on  peer  to  peer  filesharing  and  not  any
other applications, we are able to ensure the most up to date technology to manage
illegal  filesharing.  In  addition,  traffic  shaping  technologies  affect  all  P2P  traffic,
both  legal  and  illegal.  With  the  CopySense  solution,  only  the  illegal  P2P  traffic  is
affected.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

As an aside, our technology has been designed so that it could be integrated very
easily  into  traffic-shaping  or  other  advanced  routing  network  infrastructure  devices
that  currently  exist  on  most  networks  today.  As  an  example,  our  technology  can
even be integrated into the network infrastructure of an ISP.
Q4. Your  technology  includes  a  database  of  the  fingerprints  of  copyrighted  music
and movies, and is one of the largest in the world. How quickly is the database
updated when new songs and movies are released?

A4. Our  database  is  updated  on  a  daily  basis.  In  many  cases,  due  to  our  relation-
ships with the content industry we are able to update the database with new songs
and movies before their commercial release.
Q5. You  mentioned  that  your  product  can  be  configured  to  be  consistent  with  dif-
ferent  universities’  privacy  policies.  Can  you  explain  in  more  detail  how  this
works?  Are  technologies  such  as  yours  any  more  invasive  of  privacy  than  anti-
virus or anti-spam software?

A5. Privacy  policies  vary  widely  from  university  to  university.  Some  universities
want to restrict the data on system reports that include IP addresses of individuals.
We have designed the CopySense system so that it can be configured to restrict ac-
cess  to  information  in  a  manner  consistent  with  a  university’s  privacy  policy.  If  so
configured,  the  university  could  treat  this  system  as  a  black  box  as  they  do  their
other  network  equipment.  This  black  box  operates  automatically  without  access  by
unauthorized personnel. In some cases if a school’s policy is that no university per-
sonnel  can  access  activity  information,  the  system’s  educational  features  could  be
configured so that only the student is notified of detection of their inappropriate be-
havior.

The  analogy  of  anti-virus  or  spam  filtering  products  is  an  appropriate  one.  Our
products  operate  in  a  manner  similar  to  anti-virus  products  or  even  spam  filters—
only  our  registry  contains  fingerprints  of  copyright  works  rather  than  fingerprints
of  viruses  or  spam.  An  additional  protection  to  privacy  is  that  our  system  matches
only  copyrighted  items  in  a  database  that  are  transferred  over  known  public
filesharing  networks.  All  other  communications  such  as  e-mail  and  web  traffic  go
by unimpeded and without inspection.

From  one  perspective,  our  product  is  much  less  invasive  from  a  privacy  point  of
view  than  spam  filtering  technology.  Our  product  only  detects  the  transfer  of  copy-
righted works over public filesharing networks. Remember that these networks con-
nect  millions  of  anonymous  strangers  who  are  revealing  the  contents  of  their  com-
puters’ hard drives; it is a question if there is even an expectation of privacy under
these circumstances. Contrast that with spam filtering technologies, which scan and
intercept private e-mail communications between known individuals.

Questions submitted by Representative Ralph M. Hall
Q1. Many of the witnesses described their support for offering students ‘‘a legitimate
online  service,  one 
illegal
filesharing.’’  How  does  the  CopySense  application  differentiate  legally  obtained
copyrighted  works  on  these  services  from  infringing  distribution  on  P2P  net-
works?

inexpensive  alternative 

that  provides  an 

to 

A1. Our  system  only  detects  content  transfers  over  known  peer  to  peer  filesharing
applications.  The  system  ignores  transfers  of  content  using  online  legitimate  serv-
ices  such  as  iTunes.  Therefore  we  do  not  have  to  differentiate  the  copyrighted
works,  we  just  have  to  be  able  to  detect  and  identify  the  transport  mechanism,
whether  peer  to  peer  or  iTunes.  As  an  aside,  even  copyrighted  works  legally  ob-
tained  from  a  legitimate  online  service  are  not  legally  allowed  to  be  copied  on  P2P
networks.
Q2. What  works  are  currently  protected  through  use  of  CopySense?  Does  the  data-
base  include  non-entertainment  material  such  as  books  or  scholarly  articles?
How  do  copyright  holders  add  fingerprints  of  their  works  to  the  database?  Is
there a limit to how large the database can be before impeding the functionality
of your hardware?

A2. The  database  currently  handles  most  of  the  North  American  catalog  of  music
and  has  a  rapidly  growing  catalog  of  film  and  television  content.  At  this  time,  we
have not yet created a database of books or scholarly articles.

Copyright  owners  that  want  to  register  their  content  are  able  to  contact  us,  sign
a registration agreement, and then we work with the copyright owner to fingerprint
their  content  in  the  most  efficient  manner.  Most  of  the  time,  this  consists  of  pro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

viding a software program to the copyright owner, which allows them to fingerprint
the  digital  file.  In  some  cases,  the  copyright  owner  will  provide  us  physical  media
and we provide services to fingerprint their works for them. Because the fingerprint
database is managed and located centrally, there is no relationship between the size
of  the  database  and  the  size  of  the  hardware  installed  in  the  university.  Therefore
the  answer  to  the  question  is  that  the  database  could  grow  indefinitely  and  will
never impact the functionality of the hardware.

Questions submitted by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson
Q1. Some  of  the  other  panelists  are  concerned  that  technologies  to  reduce  illegal
filesharing will slow down networks, especially on large research campuses. Has
this  been  a  problem  at  large  research  universities  where  your  technology  is  in-
stalled? Will the speed of your technology continue to increase?

A1. In  our  over  70  university  customers,  our  technology  has  never  been  the  cause
of a slowdown of the network. In fact, because we can significantly reduce the band-
width  utilization  of  these  filesharing  applications,  performance  generally  increases.
However, technically the reason our technology is not a problem is that our system
is not an inline device. Inline devices are problematic since all the data traffic needs
to go through them. If the device is not fast enough or even worse, fails, it can slow
down or stop network traffic. As a device that is not inline, the CopySense appliance
operates on the sidelines and performs its matching activity in parallel with the real
time  network  traffic  flow.  The  actual  experience  of  our  university  customers  has
been that the CopySense appliance has no adverse impact on network performance.
The  speed  of  our  technology  will  continue  to  increase  with  the  increases  in  com-
putational  power  available  in  the  market.  I  do  not  anticipate  that  hardware  per-
formance will be an issue for the foreseeable future.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Cheryl Asper Elzy, Dean of University Libraries and Federal Copyright

Agent, Illinois State University

Questions submitted by Chairman Bart Gordon
Q1. Since  the  beginning  of  the  Digital  Citizen  Project  at  Illinois  State  University,
have  other  universities  sought  information  about  your  experiences  and  informa-
tion on how to reduce illegal filesharing?

A1. Several associations and universities have sought out the leadership of the Dig-
ital  Citizen  Project  through  a  variety  of  venues.  One  avenue  of  contact  is  through
the  Project  web  page  at  http://www.digitalcitizen.ilstu.edu/.  Another  opportunity
for  sharing  what  we’ve  learned  so  far  comes  through  presentations  at  conferences
like EDUCAUSE. Many will take our cards or contact us afterward once they’ve at-
tended  one  of  our  sessions.  The  Project’s  technology  specialist  and  one  of  the
Project’s leaders based here in DC gets many calls.

All are seeking advice. Most just want answers—a shrink-wrap solution they can
buy  and  all  the  DMCA  complaints  will  go  away.  At  present,  the  Digital  Citizen
Project doesn’t have that answer. We are gaining experience every day. We are doc-
umenting  the  scope  of  the  problem  with  each  new  study  and  data  collection.  There
is  much  work  to  be  done  and  improvements  to  be  made  before  the  technology  will
be  effective  in  stopping  the  DMCA  complaints  and  eliminating  downloading.  Some
of  the  answers  will  come  from  changing  cultures  and  behaviors  as  much  as  relying
on a technological monitoring or blocking solution.

The surprising large number of calls and contacts we do get about the Digital Cit-
izen  Project  and  its  findings  confirms  our  belief  that  a  National  Center  on
downloading  issues  should  be  funded  and  created  at  Illinois  State  University.  All
of  higher  education  is  laboring  with  a  lack  of  reliable  information  on  what  to  do,
what  works,  and—more  importantly—what  doesn’t  work.  Such  a  Center  as  we  pro-
pose  could  provide  reliable,  tested,  replicable  information  on  products,  softwares,
educational programs, and more.
Q2. You mention that ISU would like the Digital Citizen Project to be a ‘‘consumer-
reports-like’’  study  on  ways  to  reduce  illegal  filesharing.  Could  you  explain  this
in  more  detail?  How  would  such  a  study  work  and  what  type  of  results  might
it  produce?  How  would  you  integrate  new  technology  products  into  the  study
throughout its duration?

A2. The ‘‘consumer-reports-like’’ study refers to an aspect of our study wherein Illi-
nois State could capitalize on its strong working relationships with multiple associa-
tions and vendors to compare and contrast the capabilities of the emerging software
and hardware products that are appearing almost weekly. The ‘‘reports,’’ as we con-
ceive  of  them  at  present,  would  involve  testing  each  product—first  on  a  test  net-
working  and  then  on  a  segment  of  our  live  network  such  as  a  residence  hall  com-
plex—and determine the effectiveness of the product from a variety of benchmarked
perspectives.  These  elements  might  include  ease  of  installation,  size  of  the  music
and  movie  library,  compatibility  with  Macs  and  PCs,  ability  to  stand  alone  versus
requiring  another  software  or  program  to  work.  While  the  early  focus  would  be  on
monitoring  systems  and  escalated  response  programs,  it  could  easily  be  expanded
to  include  an  evaluation  of  legal  media  downloading  services  or  K–12  educational
programs.

It  is  important  to  remember  that  many  of  these  products  were  originally  devel-
oped for other uses than tracking filesharing but are being adapted to meet this new
challenge. Also, in most cases they are products for a commercial environment. ISU
is  testing  these  in  a  live  networked  higher  education  environment  to  identify  their
strengths  and  weaknesses  for  reducing  illegal  filesharing.  Each  product  will  be  set
up for at least a semester through our residence hall network. Results expected vary
depending  on  the  sophistication  of  the  product  but  may  include:  does  the  product
identify copyrighted downloads and stop uploads, can the product tell the difference
between  copyrighted  and  non-copyrighted  material,  how  much  of  downloads  are
being missed, and does it recognize metadata.

It  is  also  important  to  note  that  some  of  these  products  can  be  tested  on  a  live
network  while  others  absolutely  cannot.  Certain  programs  cannot  because  their
technology needs to alter the make-up of the ISU network so drastically as to make
the ISU network profile so different that it could potentially change daily academic
and  business  uses  of  the  live  ISUNet  network  or  bring  the  network  down  all  to-
gether. (This highlights a crucial reason that independent testing and evaluation is

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

sorely  needed  by  higher  education.  No  institution  can  afford  to  destabilize  its  net-
work in installing a product, nor can it change its network architecture to meet the
demands  of  a  new  technology.)  For  those  not  able  to  be  on  a  live  network,  a  test
network  is  essential,  so  Illinois  State  is  seeking  funding  to  create  a  small  test  net-
work to provide a safe environment for study and evaluation.

When  the  Project  leaders  become  aware  of  new  products,  the  new  vendor  is  con-
tacted  and  invited  to  join  the  project  immediately.  A  product  can  be  added  at  any
time.

The  timetable  for  the  Digital  Citizen  Study  covers  several  years.  The  first  phase
of the study will be completed in June 2008. Existing funding extends only through
that  date.  At  that  time  we  will  have  completed  the  early  testing  of  two  to  three
monitoring  products,  several  surveys  of  college  students’  behavior  and  motivations
regarding  downloading,  initial  release  of  an  escalated  response  system  just  devel-
oped  at  Illinois  State,  and  put  in  place  legal  media  downloading  services.  The  long
term  effects  of  this  will  not  be  known  because  we  will  have  just  barely  gotten  all
the elements of the Project started by the end of this first phase. The results of this
first  phase  will  be  the  foundation  to  build  the  solution  for  this  problem  in  the  next
phase.

We  are  seeking  funding  from  private  foundations,  from  the  entertainment  indus-
try, and from the public sector to undertake succeeding phases that include studying
downloading behaviors in the K–12 age ranges and developing educational modules
for  the  kindergarten  through  senior  in  high  school  level  that  will  successfully  cap-
ture  their  attention  and  positively  impact  their  behaviors.  We  believe  that  through
education at this younger level, with technological barriers in place, a long term so-
lution is possible. These educational modules must appeal to the younger generation
and be able to be integrated into an already crowded curriculum easily for teachers
to  incorporate  them  at  point  of  need.  Research  in  conjunction  with  Illinois  State
University’s  College  of  Education  faculty  using  our  elementary  and  secondary  lab-
oratory schools provides us an excellent opportunity to develop these modules. More-
over,  ISU  has  institutional  agreements  with  seven  professional  development
schools—existing  K–12  school  districts—throughout  the  state  representing  demo-
graphics  from  rural  to  inner-city,  from  poor  to  wealthy.  This  phase  is  a  three  year
project.

Other phases of the Project that would get underway concurrently include further
testing  of  monitoring  systems  with  feedback  both  to  industry  and  vendors  as  well
as  higher  education  decision-makers,  exploration  of  financial  models  that  might
make  systems  on  campuses  more  affordable  and  defensible,  development  of  better
public  relations  programs  through  a  clearinghouse  exchange  of  successes  and  best
practices  with  other  colleges  and  universities,  and  a  comparison  of  existing  edu-
cational programs available throughout the marketplace.

The biggest barrier to Digital Citizen Project is money and time. Money and time.
The  work  undertaken  is  labor-intensive,  uses  a  lot  of  expensive  technology,  and  re-
quires  a  wide  spectrum  of  expertise  from  network  engineering  to  behavioral  re-
search  to  effective  marketing  to  classroom  excellence.  Without  additional  funding,
the  Project  will  begin  shutting  down  in  March  2008.  With  additional  funding,  the
Project can expand and adapt as rapidly as the downloading issues themselves.

Questions submitted by Representative Ralph M. Hall
Q1. Dr. Wight’s testimony highlights the exemption of copyright for certain nonprofit
education  purposes.  Please  elaborate  on  how  copyrighted  works  are  used  in
course  work  on  your  campus.  Does  your  university  employ  specific  software  to
allow  educational  use  without  risking  broader  distribution?  What  is  the  scope
of this type of fair use on your campus and how can educational fair use be dif-
ferentiated from infringing traffic?

A1. The Project leaders at Illinois State would certainly echo Dr. Wight’s testimony
regarding  legal,  educational  uses  of  copyrighted  media.  At  Illinois  State  University
and  on  other  college  campuses,  downloading  and  peer-to-peer  technology  is  used
heavily  in  distance  education  applications,  in  legitimate  sharing  of  data  and  re-
search through scholarly exchange of information online, in legal software upgrades
for important programs such as Linux, for digital files housed in the university’s li-
brary and shared for class reserves, and more. Our course management software on
campus is WebCT through which students access many of the course materials, syl-
labi,  and  other  course-related  documents.  WebCT  allows  faculty  to  post  (with  copy-
right  permission)  electronic  journals,  digitized  chapter  in  books,  images,  film  clips,
audio files, and more—all with password protection so only authorized students can
access  the  items.  All  these  legal  uses  of  downloading  technology  must  be  protected.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

To do less would be to cripple the academic enterprise. That is one of the many rea-
sons that Illinois State chose not to block peer-to-peer traffic unilaterally.

Illinois State University has, for almost seven years, used Packeteer to shape the
traffic  on  our  network  and  give  highest  priority  for  academic  and  administrative
purposes. The university’s library and campus technology’s working groups have de-
veloped methods for password-protecting files from images to film clips to electronic
journal  articles  to  data  files  so  that  only  a  given  class  or  other  specified  group  can
gain access to material available for legal use through copyright permissions.

The  Digital  Citizen  Project’s  leaders  feel  strongly  that  the  faculty  model  the  be-
havior  adopted  by  their  students.  If  a  faculty  member  bootlegs  an  opera  or  a  play
or  a  film,  then  the  students  will  think  it  must  be  okay.  We  must  make  legal  use
of films, music, and all digital media easier by creating better avenues for securing
copyright  permissions.  This  can  be  illustrated  with  an  experience  straight  from  the
Project’s history. We were creating a brief training session for all incoming freshmen
about the dangers of downloading and the fact that not ‘‘everyone does it.’’ We asked
RIAA  to  help  us  in  getting  permission  to  use  a  couple  of  minutes  of  a  copyrighted
music  video  popular  at  that  time.  We  started  the  process  in  April,  and  in  August
we still could not get that permission—even with the help of the industry’s own as-
sociation!  We  must  develop  and  adopt  distribution  systems  that  make  it  easier  for
faculty to open a computer file and have a legal copy of a film, show, or song deliv-
ered  to  a  classroom  than  it  is  for  that  faculty  member  to  bring  in  his  own  copy  for
classroom use—a practice not presently permitted under DMCA.
Q2. Many of the witnesses described their support for offering students ‘‘a legitimate
illegal
online  service,  one 
filesharing.’’  Does  your  university  offer  this  service  to  their  students?  If  so,  how
many  students  use  this  product  and  what  feedback  have  you  received  from
them? If not, has your university considered their use before? What are the prin-
cipal factors that affect the decision to provide legal alternatives?

inexpensive  alternative 

that  provides  an 

to 

A2. Illinois  State  University  has,  in  the  course  of  the  Digital  Citizen  Project,  ex-
plored formal agreements to provide legal media downloading services. We even got
to  the  point  of  negotiating  contracts  with  two  different  services,  but  those  were
never signed. Two crucial factors halted that initiative.

First,  the  commercial  legal  vendors  have  come  and  gone  so  fast  that  it’s  difficult
to be assured the deal is the best one or that the company will still be in existence
at the end of the contract. One company with whom we negotiated changed its busi-
ness  model  five  times  in  15  months—from  costing  $40,000  for  our  campus  and  re-
quiring  a  formal  contract  to  being  free  and  open  to  anyone  with  an  .edu  e-mail  ad-
dress.  Further,  there  are  still  no  solid  services  with  a  broad  and  deep  film  library.
ISU  will  be  approaching  Blockbuster  and  Netflix  this  fall  about  creating  a  college
program with us, but that’s still speculative.

The  second  factor  is  driven  by  our  study  of  high  school  seniors  coming  to  Illinois
State as freshmen over the last two summers. In summer of 2007, 80 percent of re-
spondents  report  they  are  bringing  an  iPod  to  campus.  iPods  still  only  work  with
Apple  compatible  services,  and  the  only  legal  Apple  service  is  iTunes.  The  leading
campus  companies,  most  notably  Ruckus,  are  not  compatible  with  iPods,  so  to  se-
cure  a  single  service  would  be  to  disenfranchise  the  vast  majority  of  our  students.
Instead  of  bringing  one  or  more  legal  services  to  campus,  the  Digital  Citizen
Project  proposes  to  inform  students—almost  relentlessly—about  all  the  legal  media
services  we  can  identify.  Anecdotally,  when  one  of  the  researchers  asked  Project
focus  groups  to  name  one  legal  service,  no  one  in  the  groups  could.  They  even
thought iTunes was an illegal service. However, the students in the focus group uni-
versally  said  they  would  happily  use  legal  downloading  services  if  they  knew  what
they  were—and  if  they  were  easy  to  use,  free  or  inexpensive,  and  had  the  library
of  songs  and  movies  they  wanted.  There  is  a  huge  marketing  opportunity  here.  If
we can point the students in the right direction and find a funding model that may
work for the individual and for the University, then we may be able to begin a slow
shift in downloading behaviors.
Q3. You state in your testimony that, ‘‘if Congress asks all 4,000 colleges and univer-
sities. . .to  implement  monitoring  systems  over  a  very  short  period  of  time—
from  our  experience  it  would  seem  impossible  for  vendors  to  supply  our  needs.’’
What leads you to this conclusion? In your opinion, how many years would ven-
dors need to overcome these obstacles?

A3. The  Project  leaders  have  come  to  the  conclusion  that—at  this  point  in  time—
vendors could not supply or service 4,000 college campuses because, in our opinion,
they aren’t ready. This is based on the experience of the Project itself. For example,
Red  Lambda  is  a  monitoring  system  often  mentioned  in  Congressional  hearings  as

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

a  potential  monitoring  system  to  reduce  downloading.  Red  Lambda  was  the  first
monitoring system we began working with in October 2004. In January 2005 Illinois
State gave Red Lambda $5,000 in installation fees to bring them to campus. Thirty
months later, Red Lambda will make its first trip to campus (July 11, 2007) in prep-
aration  for  installing  their  program  on  part  of  our  network  for  testing  and  evalua-
tion.  When  asked  whether  they  have  installations  beyond  the  campus  where  Red
Lambda was developed as Icarus, they can name only one or two that are in devel-
opment  or  at  the  talking  stage.  Audible  Magic,  at  last  report,  had  about  60  cus-
tomers (both business and higher ed), and they are the industry leader. Other com-
panies  like  Allot,  eTelemetry,  Safe  Media,  and  others  either  have  no  customers  of
record or less than a handful.

These  systems  are  also  labor  intensive  to  install  and  maintain.  Each  and  every
campus network is different in its architecture, its needs, and its capabilities. Some
installations  appear  to  change  network  settings  or  registration  procedures  that  can
cause  chaos  on  a  live  network.  There  is  very  little  available  from  these  companies
in the way of technical support either online, in person, or by phone.

The existing monitoring systems that track by individual songs or films also can-
not  find  every  copyrighted  item.  Even  the  largest  libraries  of  electronically
signatured media still only capture 51 percent of the songs (up from 11 percent two
years  ago,  however)  and  about  two  percent  of  the  movies.  Campuses  cannot  catch
and block what they cannot find. Until the tracking systems are more universal and
comprehensive, the technology will not be as effective as the industry hopes.

It  should  be  noted  that  as  monitoring  systems  become  better,  so  will  the  efforts
to  get  around  them.  One  of  the  aspects  of  downloading  that  Illinois  State  research-
ers would ultimately like to tackle is how long it takes users to find ways to defeat
any  given  monitoring  system—whether  through  encryption  or  other  means.  The  in-
dustry  is  going  to  have  to  constantly  change  its  focus  and  methods  in  order  to  stay
ahead of the downloaders technologically—which is why education and changing be-
havior becomes so much more crucial to reducing downloading.

Should  Congress  decide  to  impose  a  requirement  that  all  college  campuses  have
monitoring  systems  in  place  to  reduce  illegal  downloading,  the  Digital  Citizen
Project  respectfully,  but  strongly,  recommends  that  campuses  be  given  a  generous
lead time because vendors will need to gear up significantly to provide systems and
support services that will be essential if there is to be any success.

Question submitted by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson
Q1. You  are  an  advocate  that  we  must  educate  students  about  the  issue  of  illegal
filesharing.  You  also  mention  that  most  incoming  ISU  students  have  already
‘‘learned’’  this  behavior  while  in  elementary  and  high  school.  What  sort  of  edu-
cation  programs  should  be  instituted  in  K–12  schools  about  illegal  filesharing?
A1. Illinois  State  University  researchers  know  that  students  in  the  K–12  learning
environment  today  are  already  far  more  technologically  savvy  students  than  those
that have come before them. Many learn from their siblings or peers—or even their
parents—very  early  how  to  download.  Our  research  tells  us  some  learn  as  early  as
third  grade,  but  most  know  how  certainly  by  their  junior  high  years.  With  that
being the case, our Project is committed to developing interesting and effective edu-
cational  modules—short  technological  teachable  moments—that  teachers  could  use
in the classroom or tech teachers could use in their classes when they are teaching
a  particular  assignment.  As  one  example,  imagine  a  teacher  as  a  class  sponsor  for
a sixth-grade dance group, and the students want to download music from on of the
popular downloading sites to use for their upcoming performance. This would be an
opportunity for the teacher to take a few minutes to help those young people under-
stand that taking music through an online source is illegal as well as morally uneth-
ical.  She  or  he  could  use  one  of  the  many  ‘‘teachable  moments’’  curricula  developed
by the Digital Citizen Project that would be fast, fun, and educational. However, at
the same time we want to take care to help the students understand that their edu-
cational uses of music and media can be fair use while their entertainment uses are
not and, therefore, they must pay for them.

Classrooms  are  already  crammed  with  all  sorts  of  requirements.  Teachers  are
overwhelmed. Educational materials are expensive. If the Digital Citizen Project can
develop  quick,  point-of-use  materials  that  can  be  woven  into  any  classroom  subject
or setting, and if those materials are only a click away, and—better yet—if they are
free,  then  there  is  a  much  better  chance  the  information  will  get  to  the  students.
Lessons on illegal downloading can also be incorporated in the many cyber-safety
curricula  that  are  available  or  in  development.  Being  safe  and  being  legal  on  the
Internet are very compatible subjects for discussion in classrooms.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

Questions submitted by Representative Michael McCaul
Q1. Do you believe that the availability of a certain technology should automatically
legitimize  the  activity  undertaken  on  it?  In  preparing  students  for  an  increas-
ingly  technological  world,  does  it  help  or  hurt  them  when  they  are  not  ade-
quately punished for abusing the school’s network and computing resources and
privileges?

A1. The  Digital  Citizen  Project  leaders  believe  students  should  obey  laws,  appro-
priate  use  policies,  and  other  rules  for  using  university  resources.  The  availability
of  technology  should  not  absolve  a  user  of  responsibility  for  its  use.  Just  as  the  in-
vention  of  the  match  doesn’t  legitimize  burning  down  a  building,  the  invention  of
illegal filesharing technology and the audio/video capabilities of a computer don’t le-
gitimize stealing music, games, or movies. Students must know the rules and abide
by them. In the past we’ve heard that young people ‘‘didn’t know’’ that downloading
was  illegal.  The  Digital  Citizen  Project  research  has  confirmed  that,  in  fact,  stu-
dents DO know downloading and filesharing is illegal—but they do it anyway.

Rather  than  ‘‘adequately  punish’’  students  for  downloading,  the  Digital  Citizen
Project  seeks  to  interweave  monitoring  and  enforcement—the  punishment  side  of
the  program—with  education  and  behavioral  change,  while  at  the  same  time  help-
ing  students  FIND  the  legal  media  services  available  to  them.  The  Digital  Citizen
research has demonstrated that punishing them—kids ‘‘getting caught’’—only has a
short  term  impact  on  student  behavior,  and  they’ll  go  back  to  their  old  habits  once
memory  fades.  If  the  industry  and  higher  education  truly  wants  to  solve  this  prob-
lem, then a combination of approaches will be much more effective.

We’re facing a long-term cultural change. Think about seat belts. Congress passed
the  first  seat  belt  laws  in  1963.  In  2006  seat  belt  use—something  that  can  save  a
person’s  own  life—was  only  at  80  percent.  Laws,  fines,  and  other  penalties  along
with some intensive marketing campaigns have only slowly moved people to change
their  behaviors.  Downloading  may  be  just  such  a  cultural  change  that  will  take  20
years to effect.

Students  must  be  prepared  to  function  well  in  today’s  technologically  changing
work and home environment. It is education’s role, and that of parents, to teach stu-
dents  all  through  the  grades  that  legal  online  behavior  is  essential.  This  isn’t  just
a college campus issue. Downloading begins long before students come onto campus.
A comprehensive answer must be sought.
Q2. Is  it  appropriate  for  taxpayers  to  fund  school  networks  that  are  widely  used  to
facilitate  theft?  Is  it  appropriate  for  school  networks—created  and  intended  for
academic use—to be slowed and clogged by illegal activity?

A2. It  is  appropriate  for  taxpayers  to  support  computer  networks  for  educational
and  research  functions  at  all  levels  of  education.  Like  it  or  not,  without  computers
and  the  Internet  today,  the  work  of  any  university  would  come  to  a  halt.  Packet-
shaping  technology  has  gone  a  long  way  in  the  last  few  years  to  segregate  and
prioritize  a  variety  of  uses  of  Internet  capabilities  on  campuses.  Of  the  millions  of
messages  and  transactions  that  go  across  our  campus  network  every  day,
downloading  still  represents  a  very  small  percentage  from  the  research  our  project
has done.

The  Digital  Citizen  Project  is  examining  a  number  of  funding  options  that  may
develop into means of supporting bandwidth for legal downloading by those who ac-
tually  use  it.  On  ISUNet,  our  network  snapshots  have  shown  that  only  about  26
percent  of  the  computers  on  our  network  engage  in  any  kind  of  downloading  activ-
ity. Are there ways that only those who download pay for the privilege? Could there
be  a 
‘‘reconnect’’  fee  for  those  whose  privileges  are  suspended  for  illegal
downloading?  Is  it  appropriate  to  charge  a  fee  to  students  much  like  cable  TV  is
supported? All these are options that are being explored.

Illinois State University has more students living on-campus (and thus using Uni-
versity network resources in their academic AND living spaces) than most campuses
due to a two-year residency requirement for all freshmen and sophomores. However,
even  with  such  a  policy,  approximately  two-thirds  of  ISU  students  live  off-campus.
While  these  students  do  use  University  network  resources  while  on-campus,  much
of  their  entertainment  resources  come  from  commercial  Internet  Service  Providers.
The  point  is  on  most  campuses,  control  and  command  of  University  networks  only
impact a percentage of students’ filesharing activity.

We  agree  with  Congressman  McCaul  that  it  is  no  more  appropriate  to  fund  net-
works  for  theft  than  to  provide  them  for  spam,  worms,  bank  fraud,  solicitation,  or
pornography. Unfortunately, all these things happen on any network. Education, en-
forcement  of  policies,  and  knowledge  of  how  to  acquire  digital  media  legally  are  all
pieces of the puzzle to be solved.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

Q3. We  have  heard  that  technological  measures  exist  that  reduce  or  prevent  illegal
filesharing,  reduce  the  network  bandwidth  wasted  by  such  activity,  secure  the
network against viruses and spyware, and decrease the amount of time spent by
administrators responding to infringement notices. Doesn’t the cost benefit of ad-
dressing  these  problems  justify  the  cost  of  implementing  effective  network  tech-
nology?  If  not,  what  type  of  analysis  have  you  used  to  arrive  at  your  decision?
A3. The  costs  of  illegal  downloading  to  college  campuses  are  potentially  very  large.
Many  hidden  costs  combine  with  the  more  overt  or  identifiable  expenses  to  add  up
quickly,  especially  when  campuses  receive  hundreds  of  DMCA  complaints  every
year.  Anecdotal  industry  estimates  of  costs  associated  with  managing  one  DMCA
complaint  two  years  ago  were  about  $1,200.  One  of  the  things  the  Digital  Citizen
Project researchers want to examine more thoroughly is the actual cost of a DMCA
complaint.  Initial  studies  show  something  much  lower  than  $1,200.  Rather,  the
overt  costs  are  more  in  the  range  of  $75–$146.  Obviously,  this  needs  much  more
study.

However,  the  technology  to  reduce  illegal  downloading  is  also  expensive.  Initial
costs for implementing Red Lambda two years ago were approximately $85,000 per
year  for  a  campus  of  20,000  students.  Audible  Magic  hardware  and  software  costs
$50,000 per box with multiple boxes needed to adequately cover campus online traf-
fic. That’s just the hardware costs. Ongoing expenses for staffing, maintenance, and
other monitoring support activities are significant. Most colleges cannot find the on-
going  funds  to  support  that  without  passing  those  costs  on,  once  again,  to  the  stu-
dent. In an age of double-digit tuition increases, campuses understandably are reluc-
tant to raise anything they can avoid.

As  described  in  Question  #2  above,  Illinois  State’s  researchers  are  exploring  how
to  make  implementing  monitoring  systems,  providing  legal  digital  services,  and  of-
fering  effective  education  cost-effective.  Downloading  is  an  ingrained,  cultural  way
of  life  for  young  people  today.  A  lot  of  factors—including  entertainment  industry
business models and delivery systems—will have to change as we work on the asso-
ciated problems.
Q4. Rather than purchasing a commercially available technology, some schools, such
as  Ohio  University  have  used  internal  technological  solutions  to  block  some  or
all of the illegal music, movies, and software on their networks. Ohio University
went  a  step  beyond  blocking  illegal  peer-to-peer  programs  and  shut  down  a
‘‘darknet,’’ which is a private hub that allowed students to trade music and mov-
ies on the local area network without connecting to the wider Internet. What type
of  action  has  your  university  taken  to  address  the  issue  of  darknets  operating
on your internal system? What are some of the solutions to finding and shutting
down darknets?

A4. About eighteen months ago the RIAA shared with Illinois State project leaders
that they believed about 45 percent of the illegal downloading traffic was happening
on  ‘‘darknets,’’  within  the  campus  network  where  they  could  not  reach.  Illinois
State’s  own  network  engineers  believed  that  darknet  traffic  was  more  like  five  per-
cent. ISUNet is constantly monitored for unapproved servers or server-like activity,
so many felt there was little chance much was happening on our campus in the way
of  darknets.  However,  when  our  Audible  Magic  box  was  placed  on  one  floor  of  one
dorm for a brief darknet ‘‘snapshot,’’ darknet traffic constituted about 16 percent of
the activity. Assuredly, this is a tiny sample, but it is indicative of the need for more
extensive  documentation  so  we  all  can  have  accurate  measures  rather  than  relying
on anecdote and supposition.

When  our  network  architecture  was  analyzed  by  Audible  Magic  for  ways  to  ad-
dress  possible  darknet,  on-campus  downloading  activity,  it  was  suggested  that  we
needed  a  minimum  of  eight  boxes  (at  $50,000  each).  23  or  more  would  be  better.
No  campus  is  going  to  undertake  such  a  massive,  expensive  installation.  Internal
network  monitoring,  escalated  response  with  its  increasing  loss  of  network  privi-
leges  for  repeated  violations,  and  stronger  education  have  the  best  chance  of  com-
bating darknet activity.
Q5. Campus  officials  at  Stanford  University  wrote  a  letter  to  students  last  month
saying  ‘‘Keeping  up  with  the  number  of  filesharing  complaints  coming  in  under
the  DMCA  has  required  almost  three  full-time  Stanford  employees.’’  How  much
time and resources did your institution spend on DMCA notices each year before
implementing a technological solution? How much time does your staff spend on
notices now that you’ve adopted a technological solution? What caused your Uni-
versity to take proactive steps?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

A5. Illinois State University has a team of individuals responsible for managing any
DMCA  copyright  complaints.  While  no  one  person  is  responsible  and  no  one  has
copyright complaints as the sum total of his or her job, many are involved and serve
as  back-ups  to  each  other.  Illinois  State  has  a  federal  copyright  officer,  an  appro-
priate  use  coordinator,  a  designated  network  engineer,  and  several  support  staff
who receive, investigate, identify, notify, and track each individual complaint.

In  2004,  Illinois  State  received  469  DMCA  violation  notices.  Early  in  its  devel-
oping phases in 2005, the Digital Citizen Project participants tracked workload and
analyzed  the  costs  associated  with  the  DMCA  complaints.  The  cost  was  $75.26,  in-
cluding staff time, network resources, and any record-keeping for a first offense. For
a second offense that would involve the on-campus student judicial process the cost
increased  to  $133.29.  In  total,  then,  the  2005  costs  ranged  from  $35,297  to  $62,513
depending on the nature of the offenses. In point of fact, it was the increasing num-
ber  of  DMCA  complaints  and  the  delivery  of  four  federal  subpoenas  that  began  the
Digital Citizen Project. We felt we had to do something proactive, something to bet-
ter  protect  our  students  from  the  possibility  of  being  sued.  Yet  as  a  university  that
firmly  stands  for  and  believes  in  the  principals  of  the  American  Democracy  Project
that  teaches  young  people  to  be  good  citizens  overall  and  to  engage  in  politics  and
take  civic  responsibility  seriously,  we  needed  to  redirect  student  behavior  and
change their culture in this regard.

Illinois State University has not yet implemented a monitoring system, primarily
to  allow  the  research  of  the  Digital  Citizen  Project  to  go  forward  without  any  un-
usual technological influences. New technologies will be tested this fall after a thor-
ough  data  capture  of  network  activity  has  been  done.  Reports  on  the  effectiveness
of the technologies implemented should be available mid-winter.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Gregory A. Jackson, Vice President and Chief Information Officer, Uni-

versity of Chicago

Questions submitted by Chairman Bart Gordon
Q1. How  effective  and  accurate  would  a  technological  system  have  to  be  for  you  to
deploy  it  on  your  campus  to  reduce  illegal  filesharing?  What  technical  capabili-
ties would satisfy you that such a system would be appropriate for your univer-
sity?

A1. Two  technical  measures  are  important:  how  accurately  the  technology  detects
infringing files, and what impact it has on network transmission. Accuracy, in turn,
has  two  components—correctly  catching  infringing  files  (positive  accuracy)  and  cor-
rectly  letting  legal  files  pass  (negative  accuracy).  To  be  useful,  a  screening  tech-
nology must have very high positive accuracy (that is, it must catch most infringing
files), 100 percent negative accuracy (that is, it must never flag legal files as infring-
ing  files),  and  must  have  no  net  negative  effect  on  network  performance  (that  is,
its  operation  must  not  slow  or  otherwise  degrade  network  performance,  or  it  must
enhance  network  performance  enough  to  more  than  compensate  for  any  degrada-
tion).

In  addition,  the  cost  of  the  screening  technology  must  not  divert  resources  from
core network operations. That is, either the cost must be very low, or it must more
than pay for itself by reducing discretionary networking expense.

Questions submitted by Representative Ralph M. Hall
Q1. Dr. Wight’s testimony highlights the exemption of copyright for certain nonprofit
education  purposes.  Please  elaborate  on  how  copyrighted  works  are  used  in
course  work  on  your  campus.  Does  your  university  employ  specific  software  to
allow  educational  use  without  risking  broader  distribution?  What  is  the  scope
of this type of fair use on your campus and how can educational fair use be dif-
ferentiated from infringing traffic?

A1. We  use  all  kinds  of  copyrighted  work  instructionally:  library  material  on  re-
serve,  slide  collections,  films  and  film  excerpts,  music,  recordings  of  concerts,  and
so on.

We  use  various  means  to  ensure  that  our  use  of  these  materials  remains  legal.
In many cases we get formal permission to use the materials; in other cases we rely
on the fair-use exemptions that Dr. Wight discussed.

We  use  two  principal  methods  to  ensure  that  copyrighted  instructional  materials
circulate  no  further.  In  many  cases  we  show  them  in  class  rather  than  distribute
them,  and  otherwise  we  make  the  materials  available  through  our  campus  instruc-
tional  management  system  (chalk.uchicago.edu)  or  our  central  filesharing  service
(webshare.uchicago.edu).  Both  systems  require  users  to  have  University  network
credentials  and  to  be  in  the  relevant  class  or  otherwise  be  authorized  to  view  and
use materials.
Q2. Many of the witnesses described their support for offering students ‘‘a legitimate
illegal
online  service,  one 
filesharing.’’  Does  your  university  offer  this  service  to  their  students?  If  so,  how
many  students  use  this  product  and  what  feedback  have  you  received  from
them? If not, has your university considered their use before? What are the prin-
cipal factors that affect the decision to provide legal alternatives?

inexpensive  alternative 

that  provides  an 

to 

A2. We have considered such services, but have consistently decided not to provide
them at University expense. First, there is no subscription-based service that works
consistently  and  seamlessly  across  different  technologies.  Ruckus,  for  example,  pro-
vides  less  functionality  to  Macintosh  users  than  Windows  users,  and  its  materials
can’t  be  used  on  iPods;  Apple,  conversely,  will  not  provide  site  licenses  and  insists
on charging for each iTunes item, and those items only play on computers or iPods.
Many  of  our  students,  faculty,  and  staff  either  use  free  services  like  Ruckus  or
purchase  movies  and  music  from  Apple  iTunes,  Microsoft  Zune,  or  Real  Networks
at their own expense. There is no reason for the University to involve itself in these
transactions, which are, as they should be, between the vendors of copyrighted ma-
terials and their customers.

We  regularly  ask  students  whether  the  University  should  subscribe  to  a  service,
and  they  regularly  tell  us  they  would  prefer  that  we  spend  on  other  activities  they
value more. If an online service were to provide seamless service across diverse de-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

vices  and  to  assume  liability  for  any  copyright  infringement  within  the  University,
we  might  find  such  a  service  appealing  if  only  as  insurance.  But  such  services  do
not exist today, and we see no prospect that they will in the near future.

Questions submitted by Representative Michael McCaul
Q1. Do you believe that the availability of a certain technology should automatically
legitimize  the  activity  undertaken  on  it?  In  preparing  students  for  an  increas-
ingly  technological  world,  does  it  help  or  hurt  them  when  they  are  not  ade-
quately punished for abusing the school’s network and computing resources and
privileges?

A1. A  few  years  back  our  car  was  stolen.  The  thieves  used  Chicago  city  streets  to
gain access to the car, to remove it from our premises without permission, and three
days later to total the vehicle while being pursued by police. The availability of city
streets  enabled  this  criminal  act  to  take  place,  but  did  not  legitimize  it.  Similarly,
the  increasing  scope  and  speed  of  digital  networks  enables  an  immense  scale  and
variety  of  uses,  most  of  which  are  legal  but  some  of  which  aren’t;  the  network  no
more legitimizes the latter than the Chicago streets legitimized the theft of our car.
In  each  case—streets  and  car  theft,  networks  and  copyright  infringement—we  as
a  society  must  educate  our  citizens  as  to  what  is  legal  and  why,  we  must  ensure
that our laws advance our society, and we must take appropriate steps to apprehend
and punish offenders commensurately with their offenses. This is true regardless of
what technology enabled the offense. Our focus must remain on the offense and the
offender rather than on the conduit involved.
Q2. Is  it  appropriate  for  taxpayers  to  fund  school  networks  that  are  widely  used  to
facilitate  theft?  Is  it  appropriate  for  school  networks—created  and  intended  for
academic use—to be slowed and clogged by illegal activity?

A2. High-performance networks, such as those found on most university campuses,
are  configured  and  provisioned  to  handle  very  high  data  flows  as  necessary  for  in-
struction or research, even though those very high data flows only happen occasion-
ally.  As  one  of  my  colleagues  pointed  out,  provisioning  data  networks  is  much  like
managing  snow  clearance:  the  network  capacity  or  snowplow  equipment  is  essen-
tially  idle  most  of  the  time,  but  when  they’re  needed  they  must  be  ready  to  handle
huge loads very quickly.

As a result of this use pattern, it’s very rare that copyright-infringing traffic inter-
feres with network operations. The principal exception to this is the border between
campus networks and the regular Internet. It’s certainly inappropriate for academic
resources—be  they  funded  by  taxpayers  or  tuition—to  be  diverted  to  non-academic
purposes,  and  that’s  especially  true  for  illegal  purposes.  Technological  conflict  be-
tween academic and non-academic use is not common on most university networks,
and  when  it  is  relatively  simple  network  configuration  or  management  strategies
keep everything sorted out.
Q3. We  have  heard  that  technological  measures  exist  that  reduce  or  prevent  illegal
filesharing,  reduce  the  network  bandwidth  wasted  by  such  activity,  secure  the
network against viruses and spyware, and decrease the amount of time spent by
administrators responding to infringement notices. Doesn’t the cost benefit of ad-
dressing  these  problems  justify  the  cost  of  implementing  effective  network  tech-
nology?  If  not,  what  type  of  analysis  have  you  used  to  arrive  at  your  decision?
A3. As I commented above, implementing expensive technologies might well reduce
copyright  infringement,  but  given  the  provisioning  of  university  networks  it  would
not yield any appreciable saving on network operations or administration. There are
good reasons to implement reasonable technologies to reduce infringement, but sav-
ing money isn’t one of them.
Q4. Rather than purchasing a commercially available technology, some schools, such
as  Ohio  University,  have  used  internal  technological  solutions  to  block  some  or
all of the illegal music, movies, and software on their networks. Ohio University
went  a  step  beyond  blocking  illegal  peer-to-peer  programs  and  shut  down  a
‘‘darknet,’’ which is a private hub that allowed students to trade music and mov-
ies on the local area network without connecting to the wider Internet. What type
of  action  has  your  university  taken  to  address  the  issue  of  darknets  operating
on your internal system? What are some of the solutions to finding and shutting
down darknets?

A4. Good  network  managers  monitor  traffic  patterns  throughout  their  networks,
taking  steps  to  understand  large  flows  and  to  resolve  conflicts  and  choke  points.  A

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

darknet that becomes active will begin generating large, detectable data flows. Net-
work managers watch for changes like this, exploring their origin and nature to de-
termine whether the right response is adding capacity or suppressing the flow. None
of this is peculiar to darknets or copyright infringement. Video, students legally let-
ting  others  hear  (but  not  copy)  their  music  collections,  Skype,  Microsoft  patches—
all of these can produce unexpected data flows, and trigger responses from network
managers.  We  shut  down  problematic  flows  quite  frequently,  including  the  occa-
sional darknet and many, many improperly secured computers that have been taken
over by outsiders and used to send spam or mount denial-of-service attacks.
Q5. Campus  officials  at  Stanford  University  wrote  a  letter  to  students  last  month
saying  ‘‘Keeping  up  with  the  number  of  filesharing  complaints  coming  in  under
the  DMCA  has  required  almost  three  full-time  Stanford  employees.’’  How  much
time and resources did your institution spend on DMCA notices each year before
implementing a technological solution? How much time does your staff spend on
notices now that you’ve adopted a technological solution? What caused your Uni-
versity to take proactive steps?

A5. I’m  baffled  by  this  Stanford  statistic.  At  the  University  of  Chicago  the  typical
DMCA complaint takes about an hour of security-officer time to log and verify, and
the  discipline  process  for  a  first  offender  typically  takes  an  hour  of  a  Dean’s  or  a
personnel  officer’s  time.  As  I  said  at  the  hearing,  we  expect  to  receive  100  or  so
DMCA complaints this year, which translates into 200 hours or of professional han-
dling  time,  or  about  10  percent  of  a  full-time-equivalent  professional  staff  member.
If  we  took  no  traffic-management  steps,  that  number  might  double,  but  even  then
the total falls far short of the Stanford statistic.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(73)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

STATEMENT OF MR. SAFWAT FAHMY

CEO AND FOUNDER

SAFEMEDIA CORPORATION

Chairman Gordon, Ranking Member Hall, I want to commend you and your com-
mittee  for  calling  this  important  hearing  on  ‘‘Using  Technology  to  Reduce  Digital
Copyright Violations on Campus.’’

My  name  is  Safwat  Fahmy,  and  I  am  the  CEO  and  Founder  of  SafeMedia  Cor-
poration.  Prior  to  founding  SafeMedia,  I  spent  more  than  30  years  in  computer  ar-
chitecture  design  and  software  product  development.  I  founded  and  served  as  the
Chairman  of  the  Board  for  WIZNET,  a  business  to  business  (‘‘B2B’’)  e-Commerce
content firm and have developed GIS systems for federal and local governments and
IBM’s IPCS/MAPICS.

My testimony addresses two issues: (1) the privacy risks and other dangers to con-
sumers, students and other users posed by many popular P2P filesharing programs
as  outlined  by  a  recent  report  issued  by  the  United  States  Patent  and  Trademark
Office;  and  (2)  technology  developed  by  my  company  to  address  illegal  sharing  of
copyrighted  materials  on  P2P  networks.  While  I  understand  that  the  former  is  not
the focus of today’s hearing, I believe it is vitally important that the Committee bet-
ter understands how many popular P2P programs operate as you examine how tech-
nology can be used to reduce digital copyright violations on campus.

SafeMedia’s  mission  is  to  provide  an  effective,  cost-efficient  and  easily  imple-
mented  solution  for  preventing  illegal  transfers  of  copyrighted  digital  material  via
peer-to-peer  networks,  and  to  restore  and  preserve  copyright  holders’  asset  value.
As you know, since 2002, numerous Congressional Committees have addressed il-
legal piracy on college campuses through peer to peer (P2P) filesharing and the seri-
ous privacy and security risks posed by many popular P2P filesharing programs. As
early  as  September  of  2002,  Congressman  Robert  Wexler,  my  home-district  Con-
gressman, stated at a hearing before the House Judiciary Subcommittee on Courts,
Intellectual  Property  and  the  Internet  that  2.6  billion  songs  and  12  to  18  million
movies  were  being  downloaded  illegally  every  month.  Perhaps  as  important  as  the
loss  of  economic  value,  is  the  attendant  loss  of  moral  leadership  and  cultural  deg-
radation when intellectual property theft is ignored or even defended.

Starting  in  March  of  2003,  the  House  Government  Reform  and  Oversight  Com-
mittee held a series of hearings on the threats to privacy and security on filesharing
networks.  Later  that  year,  the  House  passed  legislation  authored  by  Representa-
tives  Henry  Waxman  and  Tom  Davis  requiring  federal  agencies  to  develop  and  im-
plement  plans  to  protect  the  security  and  privacy  of  government  computer  systems
from the risks posed by P2P filesharing. Among Congress’ findings in the Waxman/
Davis legislation were the following:

‘‘Peer to peer filesharing can pose security and privacy threats to computers and
networks by—

• Exposing  classified  and  sensitive  information  that  are  stored  on  com-
puters or networks; Acting as a point of entry for viruses and other mali-
cious programs;
• Consuming network resources, which may result in a degradation of net-
• Exposing  identifying  information  about  host  computers  that  can  be  used

work performance; and

by hackers to select potential targets.’’

The reality and severity of these risks, to those inside and outside of government,
remain today and were most recently documented in a U.S. Patent and Trademark
Office  (‘‘USPTO’’)  report  released  last  month  entitled,  FilesharinQ  Programs  and
‘‘Technological Features to Induce Users to Share.’’ 1 Researchers analyzed more than
six years of data, claims and counterclaims of five popular filesharing programs. The
report addressed whether filesharing programs ‘‘deployed features that had a known
or  obvious  propensity  to  trick  users  into  uploading  infringing  files  inadvertently.’’
The  study  painstakingly  examined  ‘‘technological  features’’  that  ‘‘induce’’  users  to
‘‘share’’ copyrighted material. In addition to features such as ‘‘share-folder,’’ ‘‘search
wizard’’  and  ‘‘partial-uninstall,’’  such  coercive  features  include:  (1)  redistribution  by
default—which causes users to ‘‘share’’ all files that they downloaded; and (2) forced-
sharing—which  compels  users  to  store  and  share  their  private  folders  and  docu-
ments.  which  may  include  copyrighted  material  such  as  personal  audio  files  from

1 http://www.uspto.gov/web/offices/dcom/olia/copyright/

oir¥report¥on¥inadvertent¥sharing¥v1012.pdf

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

paid  downloads  or  purchased  CDs  as  well  as  sensitive  personal  information  located
in consumers’ ‘‘My Documents’’ folders.

The  report  also  noted  that  even  if  a  user  is  sophisticated  enough  to  understand
that  he  or  she  has  become  an  unwitting  participant  in  pirating,  disabling  the  fea-
tures is no simple process. In fact, the report warned that software distributors cre-
ate, ‘‘technological barriers’’ to ensure that ‘‘Disabling filesharing. . .can be very dif-
ficult  and  perhaps  an  impossible  task  for  all  but  the  most  expert  computer  users.’’
The Report exhaustively examines how these features were designed and deployed
primarily  during  the  period  from  2003  to  2006,  well  after  legal  actions  were  being
initiated against users. Users, young or older, naive or experienced, are literally lay-
ing  open  their  networks  and  files  once  they  install  a  P2P  filesharing  program.  The
Report also recounts mounting evidence from security companies, government agen-
cies,  and  television  network  investigations,  demonstrating  the  serious  security  and
privacy risks posed by P2P filesharing networks. In one example, ‘‘a woman’s credit-
card information was found in such disparate places as Troy, Michigan, Tobago, Slo-
venia,  and  a  dozen  other  places.  Her  music-downloading  application  was  in  fact
making  readily  available  her  entire  ‘My  Documents’  folder  to  that  application’s  en-
tire  P2P  audience,  24  hours  per  day.’’  This  example  and  others  like  it  demonstrate
why  the  U.S.  Patent  and  Trademark  Office  said,  ‘‘They  [filesharing  programs]  pose
a real and documented threat to the security of personal, corporate, and government
data.’’

The  Report  carefully  avoids  blaming  distributors  of  P2P  software  for  deceiving
consumers,  but  noted  that  available  public  information  made  clear  that  their  pro-
grams  utilized  such  technological  features.  Incredibly,  the  companies  whose
filesharing  software  USPTO  analyzed  have  not  refuted  any  of  the  report’s  allega-
tions.  And  in  the  final  analysis,  does  it  really  matter  to  P2P  networks  users  whose
identity or taxpayer information is stolen or whose legally obtained music has been
illegally  distributed  without  their  consent,  whether  the  software  designers  inten-
tionally  meant  to  harm  them  or  did  so  by  ‘‘accident?’’  The  simple  fact  is  that  the
most  popular  P2P  services  cannot  thrive  without  ‘‘cooperation’’  from  users  sharing
their  files.  If  that  cooperation  cannot  be  obtained  willingly,  as  the  report’s  analysis
shows,  it  will  be  obtained  through  ‘‘technological  features’’  that  ‘‘induce’’  users  to
‘‘share.’’

With my background in computer architecture design and software product devel-
opment,  I  became  acutely  aware  of  the  serious  privacy  and  security  risks  posed  by
some  P2P  filesharing  networks  and  the  significant  economic  losses  that  are  being
sustained through illegal filesharing on certain P2P networks. I also recognized that
technology  could  serve  as  an  important  part  of  the  solution  and  so  in  October  of
2003,  I  came  out  of  retirement  to  found  SafeMedia  corporation.  I  understood  that
any  technological  solution  had  to  distinguish  between  P2P  networks  that  utilize
seemingly  inadvertent  and  anonymous  filesharing  and  services  such  as  BitTorrent
which  require  identification  and  consent  of  peers  prior  to  the  sharing  of  files.  I  set
forth a number of additional criteria for a technologically sound solution and deter-
mined that any device or program addressing these issues had to:

• protect user privacy,
• provide 100 percent accuracy with no false positives,
• easily adapt to small or large network environments,
• cause no slowdowns for legitimate network traffic,
• self-correct  with  no  additional  administrative  burdens  to  network  managers,
• adapt quickly to changes in illegal P2P networks and transmissions,
• install easily, and
• perhaps most important, has to be available at an affordable price.

Mr. Chairman, I am happy to report that after years of hard work, we were able
to  utilize  a  combination  of  breakthrough  core  technologies  to  take  this  effort  in  a
new  direction.  In  fact,  our  solution  will  prevent  illegal  P2P  filesharing  networks
from  forming  in  the  first  place.  We’ve  labeled  it  ‘‘P2P  Disaggregator’’  (P2PD)  tech-
nology.  It  can  be  deployed  at  end-user  sites,  either  integrated  into  network  devices
installed  in  edge  routers/modems  or  subnet  edge  routers  and  concentrators,  or  as
an independent network appliance which I will focus on today.

Our  device:  ‘‘Clouseau’’  is  a  network  appliance  that  detects  and  prohibits  illegal
P2P traffic while allowing the passage of legal P2P such as BitTorrent and all other
Internet  transmissions.  Clouseau  is  inexpensive  and  smaller  than  a  phone  book—
users  simply  plug  it  in  between  the  Internet  and  their  computer  network,  and  it
goes  to  work.  With  Clouseau,  we  have  addressed  and  solved  the  weaknesses  inher-
ent in other technological approaches to this problem:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

• No Invasion of User Privacy: Clouseau detection does not invade user privacy,
never  captures  or  records  user  IDs,  does  not  decrypt  any  traffic,  and  allows
the  execution  of  all  current  security  techniques  (Tunneling,  SSH,  etc.).
Clouseau never opens packets to determine file legality or illegality. That de-
termination  is  based  solely  upon  the  type  of  transmission—it  never  invades
user privacy by looking at the content of a file.
• Accuracy:  Clouseau  is  fully  effective  at  forensically  discriminating  between
legal  and  illegal  P2P  traffic  with  no  false  positives  (i.e.,  identifying  another
protocol as the targeted protocol) whether encrypted or not. It prohibits send-
ing  and  receiving  all  illegal  P2P  files,  and  prevents  the  flow  of  copyrighted
digital  files  from  legal  Internet  services,  DVDs  and  CDs  to  P2P  networks
where they are totally accessible to millions of users to pirate.
• Scalability: With little or no latency and nearly perfect accuracy, Clouseau op-
erates  at  network  speed  processing  large  traffic  volumes  on  the  order  of  sev-
eral  hundred  thousands  to  several  million  connections  at  a  time  (depending
on model) with minimal computation expense.
• Robustness:  The  P2P  community  is  constantly  devising  new  strategies  to
cloak  their  activities  including  launching  new  protocols,  double  and  triple-
layering  encryptions,  and  frequently  changing  servers.  SafeMedia  vigilantly
monitors all these rapidly changing characteristics. Clouseau is provided with
a  remotely  secure  update  every  three  hours  ensuring  its  constant  ability  to
meet these dynamic challenges.
• Network  Appliance  Advantages:  In  addition  to  the  above,  Clouseau  also  pro-

vides some unique improvements to the appliance model, such as:

Æ Lights-Out  Management—Clouseau  has  been  designed  as  a  zero-mainte-
nance  appliance  from  the  user’s  perspective.  All  updates  are  done  auto-
matically and do not require operator/administrative intervention.

Æ Network  Invisibility—Clouseau  operates  in  a  stealth  mode  when  per-
forming P2P filtering. This feature allows the appliance to be completely
invisible to attacks that may be launched on the device.

Æ Resilient  and  Self-healing—In  the  event  of  physical  attack  or  hardware
or  software  failure,  numerous  internal  fault-tolerant,  self-protection
measures are in place to protect the device from undesirable changes af-
fecting the appliance’s functionality. Should deprecation of the module or
corruption of a file system be discovered, Clouseau will self-heal by auto-
matically  restoring  corrupted  files.  Clouseau  reboots  in  the  event  of
power  loss  (in  approximately  45  seconds)  to  ensure  system  and  network
security  and  functionality.  Thus,  using  a  combination  of  resilient  oper-
ations,  self-healing  techniques  and  built-in  fail-safes,  Clouseau  is  able  to
protect  itself  from  multiple  types  of  attacks  that  may  be  imposed  on  it.
Æ Plug and Play—Clouseau is very easy to install and requires no changes

to existing network topology.

How  does  Clouseau  work?  I  will  do  my  best  to  explain  in  layman’s  terms  the  fol-

lowing technologies utilized by Clouseau:

• Adaptive  Finger  Printing  and  DNA  Markers—SafeMedia’s  filtering  system
utilizes proprietary finger printing techniques to identify specific P2P clients/
protocols.  By  using  these  DNA  markers,  Clouseau  is  able  to  uniquely  iden-
tify whether a packet is part of a P2P transaction or regular Internet traffic.
By  studying  the  details  in-depth,  SafeMedia  is  able  to  avoid  false-positives.
• Adaptive  Network  Patterns—Not  all  protocols  can  be  easily  identified  with
single packets. As such, Clouseau  is able to monitor packet flows and adapt
its  filtering  based  on  what  it  has  already  seen  and  now  sees.  This  extensible
system utilizes a technique called experience libraries.
• Experience  Libraries—P2P  clients  and  protocols  will  change  every  day.  The
process of adapting to this change and constantly being updated with the lat-
est  knowledge  of  such  clients/protocols  is  the  responsibility  of  the  experience
library.  SafeMedia’s  network  operations  trains  these  libraries  with  new  pat-
terns and DNA markers and push these new libraries to Clouseau units out
in the field.
• Update—No  P2P  filtering  appliance  will  function  without  constant  updates.
All of the methods described above are constantly evolving and SafeMedia uti-
lizes  the  Akamai  network  to  push  new  updates  through  the  Internet  Using
a  highly  scalable  network  such  as  Akamai  allows  SafeMedia  to  off-load  the
deployment of updates to a well-established content-distribution network.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

Clouseau has been effectively installed for clients in Florida, California, Oklahoma
and Texas in a variety of educational and commercial settings. We are currently de-
ployed  at  Florida  Atlantic  University.  We  continue  to  expand  our  higher  education
efforts  and  hope  to  announce  soon  that  we  will  install  the  product  at  a  number  of
additional colleges and universities.

As you know some colleges and universities have been reluctant to adopt effective
policies  to  deal  with  illegal  filesharing.  Some  cite  student  privacy  as  a  concern  for
refusing  to  stop  clearly  illegal  filesharing,  but  they  need  to  be  challenged  with  this
question:  How  does  it  protect  student  privacy  to  allow  P2P  filesharing  services  to
roam  student’s  computer  hard  drives  for  private  folders  and  documents  without
their  explicit  permission?  I  would  further  ask  if  there  isn’t  a  double  standard  at
work. Colleges and universities fiercely protect their own intellectual property. Why
are they so cavalier when it comes to the intellectual property of others?

Mr.  Chairman,  we  welcome  the  insights  and  assistance  that  can  be  given  to  this
issue by the Science and Technology Committee and would be happy to answer any
questions  you  may  have  regarding  Clouseau  or  the  issues  that  have  been  raised  in
my testimony.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

REPUBLICAN BRIEFING MEMO

Reducing copyright infringement on campus networks

HEARING OF THE HOUSE COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

JUNE 5TH, 2007 AT 2 P.M., 2318 RAYBURN

The  Full  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology  will  meet  to  hear  testimony  on
technologies, available and under development, designed to reduce the movement of
copyrighted material across university and college networks.

Piracy of digitally available media has become a large concern as more and more
intellectual  and  creative  works  are  available  in  easily-transferred,  digital  format
and  access  to  high  bandwidth  networks  has  spread.  Users  can  now  easily  access
software  allowing  illegal  filesharing  of  music,  movies,  software,  and  other  content.
Colleges  and  universities  hold  a  unique  perspective,  being  both  creators  of  intellec-
tual  property  and  Internet  service  providers  to  a  large  and  technically  savvy  group
of students and staff.

A  number  of  other  committees  have  met  to  discuss  aspects  of  this  problem.  This
hearing  will  examine  one  detail  of  the  larger  intellectual  property  enforcement  de-
bate,  narrowly  focusing  on  the  efficacy  of  technological  solutions  to  stopping  illegal
filesharing.  The  witnesses  all  have  expertise  on  the  details  of  campus  networking
and various methods that might be used to curtail illegal behavior, including efforts
at education and providing legitimate alternatives.
Witnesses

Charles  Wight,  Associate  Vice  President,  University  of  Utah,  and  Adrian
Sannier,  Vice  President  and  University  Technology  Officer,  Arizona  State  Univer-
sity.  Dr.  Wight  and  Dr.  Sannier  will  discuss  their  campuses’  experiences  with  net-
work-filtering  technologies,  and  what  technical  issues/concerns  remain  from  their
perspective.

Vance lkezoye, President and CEO, Audible Magic Corporation. Mr. Ikezoye will
discuss his company’s network-filtering technology, and comment on what technical
issues  may  have  arisen  from  its  deployment  on  campuses  across  the  country  and
what capabilities these technologies are likely to have in the near future.

Cheryl Asper Elzy, Dean of University Libraries, Illinois State University. Dean
Elzy  will  discuss  the  Digital  Citizen  Project,  a  joint  project  between  ISU  and  the
copyright-holder  community  to  act  as  a  live  campus  testbed  for  a  variety  of  ap-
proaches  to  reducing  digital  copyright  violations,  including  network-filtering  tech-
nologies.

Greg  Jackson,  Vice  President  and  Chief  Information  Office,  University  of  Chi-
cago.  Dr.  Jackson  will  discuss  the  University  of  Chicago’s  technological  and  other
approaches to reducing copyright-infringing activity on campus networks.

Background

Piracy  occurs  when  an  individual  unlawfully  distributes  copyrighted  content.  As
more  and  more  intellectual  and  creative  works  are  available  in  easily-transferred,
digital  format  and  access  to  high  bandwidth  networks  has  spread,  copyright  in-
fringement has become a technically trivial process. In addition, while earlier piracy
operations  were  often  linked  to  single  servers  offering  free  access  to  material,  to-
day’s piracy occurs mostly in distributed networks that lack a central software serv-
er.  These  peer-to-peer  (P2P)  networks  draw  on  the  resources  of  every  computer  on
the  network  and  cannot  be  centrally  maintained  or  regulated.  While  exact  data  for
the amount of piracy is not available, the widespread use of P2P programs suggests
a significant amount of infringement.

In  responding  to  piracy,  colleges  and  universities  are  treated  in  a  like  manner
with  commercial  Internet  service  providers.  Under  provisions  of  the  Digital  Millen-
nium  Copyright  Act  (DMCA),  colleges  and  universities  are  exempted  from  liability
for  copyright  infringement  on  their  networks  as  long  as  they  appropriately  respond
to notifications of unauthorized distribution. Earlier this year, the Recording Indus-
try  Association  of  America,  RIAA,  released  a  list  of  the  23  schools  that  the  record
industry  had  sent  the  most  notices  to,  alleging  infringing  activity  by  students  or
staff. A few weeks later the Motion Picture Association of America, MPAA, produced
another  list,  detailing  the  25  institutions  that  received  the  most  notices  from  their
member  companies.  Both  lists  are  included  at  the  end  of  this  document.  While  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

methodology  has  been  criticized  by  some  schools,  these  events  have  served  to  high-
light  the  continuing  problem  of  piracy  on  both  campus  and  commercial  networks.
Joint Higher Education/Entertainment Industry Committee

Recognizing  piracy  as  a  serious  and  continuing  issue,  representatives  from  col-
leges and universities and the recording industry first met in late 2002 as the Joint
Higher  Education/Entertainment  Industry  Committee  (Joint  Committee).  The  Joint
Committee  was  formed  to  allow  content  holders  and  higher  education,  (1)  to  exam-
ine  ways  to  reduce  the  inappropriate  use  on  campuses  of  P2P  filesharing  tech-
nologies, and (2) to explore the prospects for narrowing their differences on existing
and  proposed  federal  intellectual  property  legislation.  A  summary  of  the  actions  of
the Joint Committee can be found at the end of this document. In October 2006 and
again  in  April  of  2007,  technology  experts  representing  members  of  the  Joint  Com-
mittee  and  software  vendors  met  to  refine  requirements  for  filtering  illegal  traffic
from  campus  networks.  A  consensus  document  detailing  the  readiness  of  current
technology and remaining obstacles is expected in late June, 2007.
Current Technology

A number of vendors have proposed or developed technologies that may aide net-
work  administrators  in  their  efforts  to  combat  piracy.  These  technologies  generally
fall  into  three  categories:  1)  network  filtering,  2)  secure,  legal  distribution,  and  3)
legitimate alternatives.

Network  filtering  technologies  use  various  methods  to  identify  and  stop  network
traffic that carries copyrighted data. A number of companies offer different products
in  this  area.  These  include  tools  that  slow  large  downloads  to  deter  piracy,  that
block  all  P2P  activity  without  consideration  of  content,  and  those,  like  Audible
Magic, that attempt to identify content as copyrighted. The witnesses will each dis-
cuss costs and benefits to various approaches. Surveys have shown that over 80 per-
cent of colleges and universities engage in some type of filtering or blocking.1

In  addition  to  filtering  out  copyrighted  material,  colleges  and  universities  must
also  allow  legal  distribution  of  copyrighted  content.  In  particular,  educational  use
of  digital  articles,  books,  films,  and  music  is  allowed  and  essential  to  higher  edu-
cation’s  core  mission.  Again,  various  vendors  have  technologies  to  provide  students
with course materials without risking wider, unauthorized distribution.

Finally, the commercial market for legal procurement of digital media is growing.
In addition to widely known businesses like Apple’s iTunes and Amazon.com, small-
er companies have created entertainment packages that directly target colleges and
universities.

All  three  of  these  classes  of  technology  significantly  interact,  with  both  positive
and  negative  effects.  The  availability  of  legal  alternatives  poses  challenges  to  fil-
tering  technologies  to  allow  their  content,  while  blocking  others.  Alternately,  the
availability of a secure distribution system for course materials may enable network
administrators to filter out infringing activity more easily.
Digital Citizen Project

The  diversity  of  products  proposed  or  currently  available  to  colleges  and  univer-
sities  to  combat  piracy  presents  opportunities  and  challenges.  Network  administra-
tors may find integrating separate systems within the campus network particularly
difficult.  However,  administrators  also  have  wide  latitude  to  choose  products  that
meet both the technical and policy requirements of their institutions.

One  specific  barrier  to  further  implementation  has  been  a  lack  of  data  on  the  ef-
fectiveness  and  utility  of  various  vendor  technologies.  Illinois  State  University  has
embarked  on  a  project  specifically  designed  to  evaluate  these  technologies  and  dis-
seminate their results to other higher education institutions.

The Digital Citizen Project began in January, 2007 and aims to use,

a comprehensive approach to confront pervasive attitudes and behaviors in peer-
to-peer  downloading  of  movies,  music,  and  media  we  address  ethical  and  legal
issues through the following: educating our college students, self monitoring and
enforcement, providing multiple legal digital media services, marketing and pub-
lic  relations  of  our  program  and  services,  investigating  K–16  use  of  peer-to-peer

1 Campus Computing survey for 2006 (http://www.campuscomputing.net/) reports that over 80
percent  of  respondents  have  policies  related  to  downloading  music  and  videos.  EDUCAUSE
‘‘Core Data Service’’ survey (http://www.educause.edu/coredata/) shows that nearly 95 percent
of  respondents  shape  or  track  bandwidth  utilization.  The  2006  RESNET  survey  (http://
www.resnetsymposium.org/surveys/2006securitysurvey.htm) indicates that roughly 80 percent of
respondents  ‘‘block,  filter,  or  otherwise  restrict’’  P2P  traffic  between  residence  halls  and  the
Internet.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

software  use  and  developing  a  curriculum  component  to  combat  illegal
downloads,  working  with  industry  leaders  to  create  educational  fair  use  media
definitions and faster copyright use, providing rewards for our students.2

Dean Cheryl Elzy will testify further about the project.

Issues
Are  products  currently  available  that  meet  the  requirements  of  campus
network environments?

No  single,  silver-bullet,  solution  is  available  to  stop  unauthorized  distribution  of
digital  media  while  allowing  authorized  traffic.  The  variety  of  campus  network
needs and policies with respect to the proper role of the institution in policing users
leads  to  a  highly  heterogeneous  environment  for  vendors.  However,  recent  work  by
the  Joint  Committee  has  helped  build  an  understanding  of  these  varied  require-
ments and given technology companies insight into how their products might better
meet campus needs. In addition, many mature products are available that can con-
tribute  in  part  to  a  holistic  anti-piracy  solution.  Many  campuses  already  use  some
type  of  filtering  tools  in  all  or  part  of  there  network.  In  addition,  the  availability
of  legitimate  alternatives  for  entertainment  content  and  secure  methods  for  trans-
ferring teaching material has grown significantly in recent years.
Does peer-to-peer (P2P) software have non-infringing use?

It  is  clear  that  a  great  deal  of  P2P  traffic  involves  copyrighted  content;  however
significant,  legal  uses  of  the  technology  are  also  available.  Some  examples  include:
BitTorrent,  a  general  file-transfer  protocol  that  has  been  implemented  for  legal
downloads  of  software  and  movies,  Skype,  an  Internet  telephony  program,  and
Vudu,  producer  of  a  tv  set-top  box  providing  movie  screenings  via  P2P  downloads.
Therefore,  many  campuses  are  reluctant  to  censor  all  P2P  traffic  and  prefer  solu-
tions  that  try  to  identify  specific  infringing  activity.  Due  to  the  complexity  of  the
copyright  system,  however,  differentiating  infringing  use  from  allowed  use  remains
technologically difficult. The witnesses will be able to discuss what options are avail-
able that block piracy while allowing the transfer of educational materials.
What role should education about copyright play and at what level?

Many  colleges  and  universities  report  undertaking  some  kind  of  education  cam-
paign, particularly geared towards incoming freshmen classes. Education techniques
may  range  from  simple  notifications  of  campus  policy  on  copyright  infringement  to
short video segments defining student’s rights and responsibilities or ongoing aware-
ness  campaigns.  Many  colleges  and  universities  contend  that  piracy  is  established
as a social norm before students enter collegiate study, and that education on what
is and is not allowed under copyright law should begin in a K–12 setting. One goal
of  the  Digital  Citizens  Project  will  be  to  systematically  study  education  campaigns
for their effectiveness.
What can campus efforts to combat piracy tell us about broader piracy con-
trols?

Campus  networks  comprise  just  part  of  the  larger  piracy  problem.  Commercial
providers of Internet service have also seen growing complaints from copyright hold-
ers  and  many  colleges  contend  that  piracy  begins  well  before  students  arrive  on
campus.  Commercial  networks  could  implement  similar  controls,  and  would  face
similar  social  and  technological  challenges,  to  those  used  by  colleges  and  univer-
sities.
What rights do higher education institutions have to use copyrighted mate-
rial?

Under  the  Copyright  Act,  teachers  are  exempt  from  infringement  for  performing
copyrighted  works  in  certain  educational  contexts.  Performance  of  a  work  done  in
the  course  of  face-to-face  instruction  in  a  classroom,  or  performances  done  as  part
of  instructional  activities  of  a  nonprofit  institution,  may  not  be  an  infringement  of
copyright.3
What rights do users have to use copyrighted material?

Although  most  uses  of  copyrighted  materials  require  permission  from  the  copy-
right  holder,  the  Copyright  Act  of  1976  provides  several  exceptions  for  the  use  of

2 Digital Citizen Project. http://www.digitalcitizen.ilstu.edu/summary/
3 Yeh, B.T. Congressional Research Service. RL33631—Copyright Licensing in Music Distribu-

tion, Reproduction, and Public Performance.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

copyrighted  material,  regardless  of  the  holder’s  permission.  The  doctrine  of  ‘‘fair
use’’ recognizes the right of the public to make reasonable use of copyrighted mate-
rial,  in  special  instances,  without  the  copyright  holder’s  consent.  Because  the  lan-
guage of the fair use statute is illustrative, determinations of fair use are often dif-
ficult  to  make  in  advance.  However,  the  statute  recognizes  fair  use  ‘‘for  purposes
such  as  criticism,  comment,  news  reporting,  teaching,  scholarship,  or  research.’’  A
determination of fair use considers four factors:

* The purpose and character of the use, including whether such use is of a com-

mercial nature or is for nonprofit educational purposes.

* The nature of the copyrighted work.
* The  amount  and  substantiality  of  the  portion  used  in  relation  to  the  copy-

righted work as a whole.

* The effect of the use upon the potential market for/or value of the copyrighted

work.

The U.S. Supreme Court has previously explained that this four-factor test cannot
be simplified by ‘‘bright-line rules,’’ but rather that the doctrine of fair use calls for
‘‘case-by-case’’ analysis. In the context of digital music downloads and transmissions,
some  alleged  copyright  infringers  have  attempted  to  use  the  doctrine  of  fair  use  to
avoid  liability  for  activities  such  as  sampling,  ‘‘space  shifting,’’  and  peer-to-peer
filesharing. These attempts have not been very successful: several federal appellate
courts  have  ruled  against  the  applicability  of  the  fair  use  doctrine  for  these  pur-
poses.  The  difficulty  behind  any  fair  use  determination,  however,  is  the  irresolute
nature  of  the  exception—one  court’s  determination  of  fair  use  may  be  another’s  de-
termination of infringement.4

4 Yeh, B.T. Congressional Research Service. RL33631—Copyright Licensing in Music Distribu-

tion, Reproduction, and Public Performance.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

Higher  Education  Actions  to  Address  Illegal  Campus  Peer-to-Peer

Filesharing

History and Past Activities

• Formation of the Joint Committee of the Higher Education and Entertainment
Communities: The higher education community joined with the entertainment
industry  to  form  the  Joint  Committee,  operating  through  the  support  and
guidance  of  the  American  Council  on  Education  (ACE),  the  Association  of
American  Universities  (AAU),  EDUCAUSE,  the  Recording  Industry  Associa-
tion  of  America  (RIAA),  and  the  Motion  Picture  Association  of  America
(MPAA) [December, 2002]

• Work of higher education through the Joint Committee

Æ Distribution  to  colleges  and  universities  of  Background  Discussion  of
Copyright  Law  and  Potential  Liability  for  Students  Engaged  in  P2P
Filesharing on University Networks [August, 2003]

Æ Joint  Committee-sponsored  meeting  of  higher  education  and  entertain-
ment  association  officials,  representatives  of  entertainment  companies
and  online  digital  delivery  services  to  discuss  how  these  sectors  can  col-
laborate to reduce illegal and promote legal P2P [June, 2003]

Æ Report  to  colleges  and  universities  of  results  of  Request  for  Information
on technologies that may assist in reducing unauthorized P2P filesharing
[October, 2003]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

Æ Report to colleges and universities on legitimate online digital content de-
livery  services  that  might  be  engaged  as  alternatives  to  unauthorized
P2P filesharing programs [December, 2003]

Æ Distribution  of  University  Policies  and  Practices  Addressing  Improper

Peer-to-Peer Filesharing [April, 2004]

Æ Collaboration  with  RIAA  to  produce  and  distribute  a  video  on  P2P  in-

tended for college freshmen orientation [spring–summer, 2006]

Æ Meeting of university, entertainment industry, and technology vendor of-
ficials  to  examine  network  technologies  to  reduce  illegal  P2P  filesharing
[October, 2006]

Æ Distribution  of  updated  paper  on  legal  aspects  of  campus  P2P,  Back-
ground  Discussion  of  Copyright  Law  and  Potential  Liability  for  Students
Engaged in P2P Filesharing on University Networks [November, 2006]

Æ Joint Committee meeting to assess past work, current challenges, and fu-

ture steps [November, 2006]

• Numerous  presentations  at  higher  education  association  meetings,  written
communications  to  colleges  and  universities,  about  illegal  campus  P2P
filesharing and reference to resources to address the problem [Ongoing]

Current and Projected Activities

man orientation and promote broad adoption by campuses

cilitate development of effective technologies to reduce campus P2P

• Formed  new  Technology  Task  Force  to  work  with  commercial  vendors  to  fa-
• Formed  campus  officials  group  to  work  with  RIAA  to  revise  video  for  fresh-
• Letter  from  ACE  President  David  Ward  to  college  and  university  presidents
and chancellors transmitting an RIAA letter announcing a new round of law-
suits accompanied by a ‘‘pre-notice plan’’ that allows settlement of claims be-
fore filing of a lawsuit
• Conduct  survey  of  colleges  and  universities  to  identify  effective  policies  and
practices  for  reducing  illegal  P2P  filesharing,  develop  updated  best  practices
recommendations for distribution to colleges and universities
• Continue  to  discuss  P2P  activities  and  share  information  through  national

meetings and written communications

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:53 Nov 16, 2007 Jkt 035706 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\060507\35706 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

